
bg image(blue_p~1.gif)
                  H.P. "Viking" Lillebo's Annotated Guide To
                              NAVY PILOTS' LINGO
                                 Wings of gold
For another thorough resource on this important subject, check out the Tailhook
                            Association's page at:
 http://www.tailhook.org. For general Navy slang enjoy: http://goatlocker.org/
                          resources/nav/navyslang.pdf

┏━━━━━━━━━┯━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┯━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
┃         │                                 │                                 ┃
┃ .       │        Around "The Boat"        │       Aircraft and Flying       ┃
┃         │                                 │                                 ┃
┠─────────┼─────────────────────────────────┼─────────────────────────────────┨
┃         │                                 │                                 ┃
┃   The   │                                 │                                 ┃
┃  Pilot  │         Index of Terms          │                                 ┃
┃   And   │                                 │                                 ┃
┃ Friends │                                 │                                 ┃
┃         │                                 │                                 ┃
┗━━━━━━━━━┷━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┷━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛

Naval Air types: To suggest additions or revisions to this collection send me a
                                     note.
                    All text on this site © H.Paul Lillebo

┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
┃ Return to HPL's Navy Menu ┃
┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛
┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
┃ Return to Blue Ridge Journal ┃
┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛

                                      [1]
━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━

                              Around "The Boat":

              A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z

Abaft          Even farther aft than aft. Behind the boat or whatever. As in, "Honey, is that
               a police car abaft?"

Abeam          In Navy talk, adjacent to, not fore or aft, but toward your 9 o'clock or 3
               o'clock.. The car that's doorhandle to doorhandle with you on the freeway is
               abeam. As in, "Damn, honey! That idiot who cut us off is abeam to port. Watch
               this!"

ACLS           "All-weather Carrier Landing System." A system that uses automated radio inputs
               from the ship to control stick and throttle on an aircraft's final approach to
               a carrier landing. The pilot could be hands-off all the way to landing, but you
               bet he keeps his hands on the controls to override them if needed. A pilot had
               best not use this system all the time, or he'll be rusty at the skill he will
               need when the system fails: the very tricky job of manually bringing the
               aircraft aboard the carrier. (Like back when men were men ...)

Aft            Uh... That's the back end of the boat. Or, adverbially, toward the back of
               anything. For example, "Sweetheart, has your aft section spread just a bit
               lately?"

Air Boss       The Commander in charge of the carrier's flight pattern and flight deck. This
               is no desk job. During flight operations the Air Boss is located in the tower
               in the carrier's "island," and runs flight ops in the immediate vicinity of the
               carrier, where his word is law. Has access to scary loud loudspeakers. He
               believes   rightly   that humiliation is a great teacher, so as you (the pilot)
               cross the flight deck after you've landed following some airborne flub, you
               (and everyone else on the deck) are likely to hear some choice words over said
               loudspeakers referring to your aviation skills. But to be fair, the Air Boss
               will just as quickly praise extraordinary professionalism with an "Attaboy".

Air wing       The aviation squadrons and aircraft aboard a carrier (except for the rescue
               helos). The air wing is under the command of "CAG" (once "Commander, Air Group"
               - but now "Commander, Air Wing" but still "CAG")   a senior Commander, and
               joins the carrier for the duration of a cruise. At the end of the cruise the
               carrier goes to the yard to be glued back together, while the air wing
               squadrons may scatter to several airfields. For the next half year or more, the
               squadrons operate more or less independently, fiddling with paperwork, until
               the time comes to go to sea again. Then they meet the carrier for another
               cruise, and become one happy air wing again, under a new CAG.

Alpha strike   A major, supposedly coordinated, air-to-ground strike, involving much of the
               air wing (see above), perhaps 50 aircraft or more. Getting all those aircraft "
               rendezvous'ed" and on their way to the target is always a minor miracle.

"Anchors       Sure, we love this old Navy ceremonial march, but what's it doing here? First
   Aweigh"     of all, it's the tune every Navy man (and others) hears whenever the ship
               leaves home port, so it's a part of every cruise. But the real reason: I know
               you've been wondering forever about why these anchors are going away. Now hear
               this: they're not going away, they're not going anywhere! It's not "Anchors
               away", it's Anchors AWEIGH! That is, we're weighing anchor, meaning we're
               pulling the anchor up. See? You just had a life-changing insight, right? Now,
               make it stick   hear the tune:

                    embed(http://www.youtube.com/v/acnt3r6z5ns&hl=en&fs=1&rel=0&border=1)


Angel          The carrier's rescue helicopter, which hovers off the starboard (that's "right"
               to landlubbers) side of the ship during all launch and landing (recovery)
               operations. Every Navy pilot's best friend. Angels is an entirely different
               word.

Angled deck    "The Angle" for short. A brilliant WWII era invention, originally British,
               though it took the U.S. Navy to make it work. Setting the landing area at an
               angle (10-12°) to the ship's axis allows for low wave-offs and bolters without
               plowing into aircraft and crew on the forward part of the flight deck, like
               they used to back in the day... On the other hand, the pilot on final approach
               has to line up on a centerline that's wandering off to his right. So he has to
               crab the aircraft all the way to touchdown. That gives you the hazard of
               right-to-left drift on touchdown, with a very real danger of the aircraft going
               over the left side of the deck, even if the hook has caught a wire. And then
               there's the problem of wind. So see that.

AOOGA          One of the many delightful sounds heard aboard Navy ships, intended to let you
               know that something's about to happen. If you could only remember what it
               means! It sounds about like this (click the link in the box):
               ┏━━━━━━━━━┓
               ┃ AOOOOGA ┃
               ┗━━━━━━━━━┛

Arrested       A successful carrier landing; a "trap". The worst intentional abuse of the body
   landing     a Navy pilot experiences. Literally a controlled crash into the deck, with
               shoulder straps jerking you from 150 mph (about 170 mph in the Crusader back
               when men were men) to zero in about 2 seconds. It's a ride! Special heavy duty
               landing gear and suspensions distinguish naval aircraft. Here's why: At the
               moment of touchdown, the vertical speed of the Navy jet is about 13 feet per
               second. For the pilot it's like being strapped into a chair, lifted 6 feet into
               the air, and dropped. Tough on the back   my lumbar disks still feel it. A
               pilot may say, "Whew! Had 5 arrests yesterday." It's an appropriate term.

Arresting      The 4 cables ("wires" to the aviator) stretched across the landing area of the
    gear       carrier; the aim of the aircraft's tailhook. The ideal pass catches the No.3
               wire. If you snag the 1-wire (closest to the ramp) the LSO (Landing Signal
               Officer) is unhappy. The cables are spooled below deck onto huge hydraulic
               braking engines, which are adjusted for the weight and speed of each aircraft
               coming on board. If the setting is too tight, it can rip the tailhook out of
               the aircraft. If too loose, the cable will play out too far and the aircraft
               can go over the side or, if it caught the 4-wire, off the end of the angle
               deck. Often just "gear," as in "Finally caught the gear at bingo fuel."

Astern         A lot like "abaft". Back there, off the stern. In the picture just below (at
               "The Ball"), we're located astern the ship.

Athwart        Or "athwartships." Across the ship, from side to side. Across anything, really,
               as in: "Wow, honey. Little Billy's foot measures five inches athwart!"

"Attaboy"      The highest praise from the Air Boss. You've saved an airplane, or performed a
               minor miracle, or perhaps just looked less hopeless than the day before. The
               only time the Air Boss uses his loudspeakers without sounding PO'ed.

The Ball       Also "Meatball." The amber light in the ship's mirror which gives the
               pilot glideslope information. When it drifts low it turns red. A red
               ball is a call for action, if you plan to survive the landing. The
               Ball is such a presence in a naval aviator's life that where the
               average human says, "See ya later," the aviator says, "Fly the ball." * 
               [final]
               In the scene at right, on final approach about 3 seconds from
               touchdown on USS Shangri-La, the mirror is seen forward on the port
               side. The ball is close to centered (just a bit low), and we're about
               on centerline. Looks pretty good, but add a little power to bring it
               up a skosh.

Ball call      The carrier pilot's radio call to the LSO on final approach, as he rolls into
               the "groove" and sights the ball. The call includes the aircraft's callsign,
               type, and fuel state, which the Arresting Gear Officer will use to set the
               gear's braking power. For example, "Thunder 204, Hornet, Ball, State Three
               Point Five"   meaning the aircraft's an F/A-18 (a "Hornet") of the squadron
               using the "Thunder" callsign, with 3,500 pounds of fuel. The LSO may answer
               "Roger, ball" and Roger Ball has become the prototypical name for a carrier
               pilot. (Wonder if there's ever been a real one...)

Barricade      A 12-15 foot high contraption of vertical nylon straps that can be raised
               across the carrier landing area to trap an aircraft with a malfunctioning hook
               or landing gear. Going into the barricade often results in some minor skin
               damage. To the aircraft, that is. The pilot will be good as new as soon as the
               skivvies are laundered.

Beach          1. Ashore. "On the beach" means "In town," or anywhere but on the ship. To "hit
               the beach" is to go ashore. "I'll be on the beach the next two days" (Transl:
               I'll be riding out a drunk in the squadron's admin).
               2. When flying, "Over the beach" means "Over land". Radio report: "Feet dry."

Bells          The ship's bell has kept time at sea since bells were invented. The bell is
               struck every half hour and divides the 24-hour day into six 4-hour periods or
               watches. After midnight, 1 strike of the bell gives 0030; at 0100 two bells are
               struck, and so forth until 8 bells at 0400. Then the sequence begins again with
               1 bell at 0430. Whole hours get an even number of bells, half hours odd. (I'm
               reminded that onboard ship the Navy thoughtfully avoids broadcasting the bells
               on the shipboard speaker system between 2200 and 0600.) So when a Navy husband
               says, "I'll be home at six bells, love," he means he'll be back at 7 p.m. Or
               eleven. Or 3 a.m. Perhaps this convenient ambiguity explains the origin of the
               system.

Below          You can't say "downstairs" on a ship. It's Below, or Down Below. A Navy man
               would never say "downstairs" at home, either. Like, "Billy, run below and get
               my hammer." (Of course he would no more say "upstairs": "Billy, if you don't
               find it below, check topside." And of course there aren't "stairs" onboard
               ship.)

Bingo          "Divert to alternate landing field." Verb, noun, adjective, and expletive. In
               peacetime operations, carriers nearly always have a divert (bingo) field
               available. An accident can lead to a fouled deck, requiring all airborne A/C to
               bingo, or a single A/C may have a problem that prevents shipboard landing. The
               most common reason for bingo'ing is low fuel. At each flight, pilots are
               briefed on the bingo fuel state: the minimum fuel level with which you can
               safely reach the bingo field. If you reach bingo fuel and you're still in the
               air, you'll hear, "Your signal bingo." Sayonara. The Navy spouse needs to know
               this term, because during the 3rd movement of a Mahler symphony, the aviator
               hubby will almost certainly say, "Let's bingo."

Black-ass      Darker than just black. There is nothing blacker than a moonless, overcast,
               black-ass night in the middle of the ocean. That's when CAG doesn't fly. It's
               not the flying. It's bringing it back aboard! Nothing raises the pulse rate and
               pucker factor more than a carrier landing on a black-ass night. That's true.
               It's been measured. (The pulse rate, not the pucker factor   the world waits
               for a device to measure the latter.)  Scarier than combat!

The Boat       A blackshoe sailor never calls a ship a "boat". An aviator never calls it
               anything else. To him, everything that floats is a boat. But the carrier is "
               The Boat".

Boat officer   One of the 4-hour watches a junior aviator may be assigned aboard the carrier.
               An in-port watch: you're officer-in-charge of a liberty boat taking sailors
               ashore and back. Can be OK in daylight and good weather; you actually get to
               know some of the sailors.  Can also be hell on a midnight return trip with
               5-foot swells and 30 drunken sailors onboard. (Do see the "Liberty boat" link.)

Bolter         An intended arrested landing where the hook fails to engage a wire, so the
               pilot has to go around for another attempt. There can be several reasons for
               this, but the most common is simply being high (not like on drugs!) on the
               glideslope and missing the 4-wire. Other reasons can be hook-skip (more often
               an excuse) or a damaged hook. A habit of frequent bolters is bothersome,
               because each bolter stretches out the carrier's recovery time and upsets the
               Cyclic Ops timing. Nobody wants to be the squadron Bolter King.

Bulkhead       There aren't "walls" aboard a Navy ship. They may look like walls but they're
               bulkheads. If you're married to a Navy man, you've probably heard, "Where on
               this bulkhead should we hang this picture, honey?" And you learn to live with
               it.

Burble         An area of air turbulence in the final approach groove right behind the
               carrier, caused by the island structure, particularly when the ship makes its
               own wind. You need to be prepared to add power when going through the burble;
               it acts like the proverbial "air pocket." (When there's enough natural wind
               that the relative wind comes down the angle deck, the burble will be away from
               the groove, to starboard, and is no problem. That is, there's only the normal
               turbulence caused by a giant floating building in a strong wind.)

CAG            "Commander, Air Group." The Commander of the Air Wing (earlier "Air Group"),
               i.e., all the aviation squadrons aboard the carrier. Now officially "CAW," but
               nobody says that. CAG (rhymes with "rag") flies aircraft from all or several of
               his squadrons, and his name adorns each squadron's endearingly yclept "
               Doublenuts" bird.

CarQuals       (Pronounced "care-quals" or "C-Q"): Carrier Qualifications; really a
   (CQ)        shore-based activity. For a Navy pilot, sea tours alternate with shore duty.
               After a tour ashore, the pilot has to carrier re-qualify by spending time
               practicing MLP's and performing a number of arrested landings on a carrier,
               before going to sea. (Initial CarQuals is one of the scariest moments in a
               student pilot's training. If you make it past this, you'll probably make it to
               the fleet. Worst is Night CQ. For a good description of a young pilot's first
               acquaintance with this frightening phenomenon, follow this link.)

Carrier        This shouldn't even need an entry; a "carrier" is of course an "aircraft
               carrier," a capital ship. But while we're here ... American carriers have
               traditionally been named for 1. Politicians, 2. Battles, or 3. Inspirational/
               memorial/patriotic buzzwords. I include some nicknames (some of them slightly
               ironic) and radio callsigns of some of the ships, as recently reported by
               aviators who flew from them. (Duplicate ship names are not uncommon, as a later
               ship memorializes an earlier, often one lost in battle. And why multiple
               callsigns? During war time, "callsigns were shifted around to confuse the
               enemy"   aviation author Barrett Tillman):

               Politicians.  These days new carriers are all named after politicians,
               including some congressional military budget committee chairmen   but of course
               this is not for the purpose of flattering or securing funding:

                   USS Randolph, CV-15, Callsign: "Johnstown"
                   Hancock, CV-19 (fondly "Hannah Maru" or "Han-job"), Callsign: "Rampage"
                   F.D. Roosevelt, CV-42 ("FDR", "Rosie"), Callsign: "Youngster" & "Riptide"
                   Forrestal, CV-59 ("Fidlip", "Fid"), Callsign: "Handbook" & "Bullhorn"
                   Kennedy, CV-67 ("JFK"), Callsign: "Eagle cliff"
                   Eisenhower, CVN-69 ("Ike")
                   (Committee chairman) Vinson, CVN-70
                   T.R. Roosevelt, CVN-71
                   Lincoln, CVN-72
                   Washington, CVN-73
                   (Committee chairman) Stennis, CVN-74
                   Truman, CVN-75,
                   Reagan, CVN-76,
                   (George H.W.) Bush, CVN-77 (commissioned January 10, 2009)
                   (Gerald) Ford, CVN-78 (under construction, commissioning in 2015   see
                   artist's image

                   And not to be confused with the above group is one actually named for a
                   career Navy man:

                   (Admiral Chester) Nimitz, CVN 68

               Battles This has been out of fashion for about 40 years; why waste a good
               opportunity to grease the political wheels?:

                   Yorktown, CV-10, Callsign: "Cactus" & "Steamboat" & "Ocean Wave"
                   Ticonderoga, CV-14 ("Tico"), Callsign: "Panther"
                   Lexington, CV-16 ("Lady Lex"), Callsign: "Spartan"
                   Bennington, CV-20, Callsign: "Big boy"
                   Oriskany, CV-34 ("O-boat", "Big-O"), Callsign: "Sea Lord" & "Childplay"
                   Antietam, CV-36, Callsign: "Eskimo"
                   Lake Champlain, CV-39, Callsign: "Nighthawk"
                   Midway, CV-41, Callsign: "Schoolboy"
                   Coral Sea, CV-43 ("Cora Maru"), Callsign: "Barktree" & "Mustang"
                   Valley Forge, CV-45, Callsign: "Cherry tree"
                   Iwo Jima, CV-46
                   Philippine Sea, CV-47
                   Saipan, CVL-48
                   Saratoga, CV-60 ("Sara"), Callsign: "Fairfield"

               Inspirational/memorial/patriotic, etc. This isn't fashionable anymore either;
               perhaps for the same reason:

                   Wasp, CV-7
                   Hornet, CV-8
                   Essex, CV-9, Callsign: "Undermine" & "Banknote" & "Hellbender"
                   Intrepid, CV-11 ("Fighting I"), Callsign: "Atlas" & "Carmel"
                   Hornet, CV-12, Callsign: "Wimpy" & "Judo"
                   Wasp, CV-18, Callsign: "Bloodshot" & "Rebel"
                   Boxer, CV-21, Callsign: "Buzzsaw"
                   Bon Homme Richard, CV-31 ("Bonnie Dick"), Callsign: "Rocket" & "Trust fund"
                   Kearsarge, CV-33, Callsign: "Wildcat"
                   Shangri-La, CV-38 ("Shang"), Callsign: "Allstar"
                   Ranger, CV-61, Callsign: "Grey Eagle" & "Spitfire"
                   Independence, CV-62 ("Indy"), Callsign: "Gun train"
                   Kitty Hawk, CV-63 ("Hawk"), Callsign: "Pawtucket" & "Panther"
                   Constellation, CV-64 ("Connie"), Callsign: "War Chief"
                   Enterprise, CVN-65 ("Big E"), Callsign: "Climax"
                   America, CV-66, Callsign: "Courage" & "Broadsword"

               Carriers are designated by the letters "CV" (V for fixed-wing), e.g., CV-8, the
               original "Hornet." The letter "N" is added to the carrier's designation to
               indicate nuclear power, e.g., USS Enterprise (CVN-65)   the first nuclear
               carrier (which will finally be relieved by USS Ford (CVN-78) after 50 years (!)
               of service in 2015.  A further refinement was the letter "A" for Attack
               (meaning fighter and attack type aircraft), or "S" for anti-submarine warfare.
               USS Shangri-La is an example of many carriers, particularly of 1940s and 50's
               vintage, whose designation and role changed, from CVA-38 in earlier days to
               CVS-38 in later years, when the demands of late generation fighters and attack
               A/C outstripped the ship's ability to accommodate them. In the 1970's the
               designations of Attack carriers were changed to indicate a multi-mission
               capability, and CVA's became simply CV's again.

Catapult       Usually just "Cat." There may be up to four steam cats on a         Crusader
   or "Cat"    carrier: two on the angle deck and two on the bow. The cat tosses   launching
               aircraft into the sky by accelerating the A/C to around 200 mph     from port
               in about 2 seconds. This is more fun during the day than on a       cat
               black night, but it scrambles your brain day or night. It               F-8
               literally takes about a quarter second to collect your senses        Crusader
               after you're flying on your own. Fighter pilots count on this to  *  launching
               excuse a lot of behavior.                                            from port
                                                                                       cat
               The installation some decades ago of steam cats, which apply
               force fairly evenly throughout the stroke, was a blessed relief
               for pilots   back when men were men, etc.   who had been beaten
               black and blue by the all-at-once whammo of the former hydraulic
               cats. The initial G force back then was off the chart.

Catapult       A brave man. One of many on the flight deck. The cat officer stands on the
   officer     flight deck between the catapults during launch, and gives the signal to fire
               the catapult after ensuring readiness of the pilot, the A/C, the bow, and the
               deck. He uses flamboyant signals, to be unambiguous. When the pilot is ready to
               launch he salutes the cat officer, who returns the salute. Quickly checking the
               cat track, the movement of the bow, and whatever else is on his list, the cat
               officer then touches the deck with his hand, usually with a flourish, followed
               by pointing down the cat track toward the bow, which finally constitutes the
               signal for the operator to fire the catapult. (The test of the cat officer's
               nerve comes when a pilot needs to abort the launch - yes, before the cat shot,
               of course. The pilot signals the cat officer with a shake of the head; the cat
               officer signals this to the cat operator by crossed forearms. He then signals
               to release tension on the cat, and steps in front of the wing of the aircraft.
               This A/C is still at full power, perhaps in afterburner. This takes nads. Only
               after the cat officer is in front of the wing does he signal to the pilot to
               reduce power.)

Centurion      An aviator who has made 100 landings on a given carrier. Even if you're a
               nugget, when you get your 100th trap you're given a tiny bit of respect. And
               then there are double, triple, and quadruple centurions. The respect increment
               falls off; much more than 300 traps on a given boat and it goes negative. They
               start to wonder why you're stuck on this ship.

Chopper        Any helicopter.

Clara          Simply means:"Can't see the ball." When a pilot rolls into the groove, the LSO
               expects a ball call within a couple of seconds. If he doesn't get it, we hear
               on the radio: LSO: "In the groove; call the ball." Pilot: "Clara." This usually
               happens on a straight-in instrument approach, at night or in the soup, where
               the pilot has to transition from flying on instruments to looking out of the
               cockpit for the ball for the final 30 seconds or so of the approach. It's a
               tricky transition.

Clear deck     The opposite of "fouled deck". It means the carrier's flight deck is ready to
               receive the next aircraft. The previous a/c has cleared the landing area, and a
               green light is shown to the LSO. In "cyclic" landing operations the "clear
               deck" light may come just seconds before the next landing.

Clearing       When launched off the carrier's bow catapults, the pilot makes a quick jog to
   turn        port or starboard, depending on which catapult he is launched from. The idea is
               that if the aircraft experiences a problem requiring it to ditch, it won't get
               run over by the ship. Clearing turns were evidently thought up by the brass,
               since they make little sense: If an aircraft is in danger of going in the drink
               , executing a turn loses lift and will exacerbate its condition and make it
               more likely it'll ditch. No way is a pilot in extremis to stay airborne going
               to do a clearing turn. Let the Captain turn the ship! As a result, clearing
               turns are made by all the aircraft that are not in any danger of going in the
               drink. It's a nice custom anyway. Sort of a polite wave back at the Captain.

COD            "Carrier Onboard Delivery," pronounced like the fish.  [Yes, yes, I know
               there's no fish called "Carrieronboarddelivery." Don't write me about it.]
               The transport airplane that ferries mail and VIP visitors between the carrier
               and terra firma, evacuates medical cases and performs "other duties as
               required." For decades the COD was synonymous with the S-2F aircraft   the
               "Stoof"   a 2-engine prop A/C and one of the ugliest A/C anywhere. But it had
               the Volkswagen kind of ugliness: you could love it for it. (Many old Navy
               Stoofs are now distinguishing themselves as forest fire tankers.) Lately, the
               2-engine jet S-3 Viking has taken over the COD tasks. Faster, better looking
               than the Stoof, but with a lot less soul. (And no sooner said than gone. The
               S-3 was retired from the Navy in January 2009.)

Cold cat       A catapult shot that gives the aircraft less than flying speed. The aircraft,
               of course, goes in the drink. While always rare, they're a lot more rare now
               than they were in the days of the hydraulic cats. Reasons for cold cats have
               included flawed holdback fittings which broke before full power developed in
               the cat stroke, wrong weight settings, and failures in the catapult mechanism.

Cut pass       Tsk, tsk. You're in the Ready Room after making a suspicious landing.
               Unfortunately the rules require that you remain in the Ready Room until the LSO
               comes by to verbally and publicly proclaim the landing grades. You got a No.1-
               wire, with a red ball in close. In other words, you were LOW, you almost hit
               the ramp, you endangered several million bucks worth of Navy property. (That
               includes the pilot.) LSO comes: Your grade: "CUT." Worst landing grade.
               Publicly shamed. Scarlet letter. A few more of those and you'll get remedial
               training. (Shipboard is a lot like prison: Little rewards and punishments make
               all the difference.) See "OK."

Cyclic Ops     Cyclic Operations: The dance of the carrier task force. Let's say the carrier
               wants to stay in roughly the same area during flight ops, which may last all
               day. Here's roughly how it works: The carrier must steam into the wind to
               launch & recover aircraft. This may take, say, 45 minutes. The ship then turns
               180° and steams downwind for roughly the same period of time, until it's time
               to recover the previous launch. Then the carrier turns into the wind again, in
               approximately the same place where it was located an hour and a half ago.
               Launch & recover aircraft. Repeat. Repeat again, all day.

Davy Jones'    The depths of the seven seas, as in a grave. Honored final resting place of
   Locker      tens of thousands of ships and hundreds of thousands of seafarers.
               (The origin of Davy Jones and his locker is lost, as I understand it, but the
               legend has persisted for centuries. It was described by Tobias Smollett in "The
               Adventures of Peregrine Pickle," 1751: "...according to the mythology of
               sailors, the fiend that presides over all the evil spirits of the deep, and is
               often seen in various shapes, perching among the rigging on the eve of
               hurricanes, ship-wrecks, and other disasters to which sea-faring life is
               exposed, warning ... of death and woe." And Mr.Jones' appearance? "I'll be
               damned if it was not Davy Jones himself. I know him by his saucer eyes, his
               three rows of teeth, his tail, and the blue smoke that came out of his nostrils
               .")
               Just trying to help, in case you should happen to meet...

Deck           1. Of course it means what we expect it to mean: A "floor" on a ship. On the
               carrier the Hangar Deck is deck "1", with the lower decks numbered downward
               from the hangar deck: The deck just below the hangar deck is deck "2", etc.
               Decks above the hangar deck are numbered upward, preceded by the letter "O" (as
               in "Over"). The Flight deck is normally "O-3"   the third deck up from the
               hangar deck. And not just on a ship: If you grew up in a Navy family, how many
               times did your dad say, "Quit whimpering and get up off the deck!"
               2. When you're flying, "The Deck" usually means the ground, as in: "After the
               GIB barfed during the zero G maneuver, I was glad to get back on the deck and
               get hosed off." On ACM (dogfighting) training hops squadron policy may require
               pilots to observe a "deck" at 10,000 feet. The idea is to pretend that 10K is
               the ground, so if you dip below it you've crashed and lost the fight. Of course
               no one ever admits to busting "the deck," but (shh ... don't tell) you do what
               you have to do to win.

Deep six       Whatever gets "deep six'ed" is on its way to the bottom of the ocean. Like:
               "Pay me the $5 you owe me or I'll deep-six your girlie mag." The "deep six"
               phrase apparently derives from the original "Six seas".

Dip            There are dips and there are dips. This dip is a common but completely
               unauthorized maneuver by a pilot on final approach to the carrier. Just about
               when passing over the ramp, the pilot makes a quick coordinated move with stick
               and throttle: Slightly relax back pressure on the stick, while easing off the
               throttle. Then reestablish. Takes about 1/5 of a second, and drops you perhaps
               a foot on the glide slope. If you're quick enough the LSO may not notice, but
               he probably will. (Sometimes known as a CAG-dip, 'cause CAG is often a master
               at it.)

Dog            Most hatches on the carrier can be secured against flooding or fire with a
               system of pivoting steel levers ("dogs"), either on the edges of the hatch or
               on the surrounding bulkhead. When a lever is moved, the short end of the lever
               is wedged against the opposing surface, securing the hatch. Dog is also a verb;
               you dog the hatch.

The Drink      The Sea. Going into the drink is not a good thing. Not in an airplane.

Engagement     Has nothing to do with prospective marriage. In pilot lingo, this has a couple
               of different meanings:
               1. The tailhook catching a wire on a carrier landing. A good engagement is a
               trap. You've engaged the arresting gear. An inflight engagement makes for a
               really bad day.
               2. In tactics, an engagement means "engaging the enemy aircraft," e.g., a "
               dogfight." Used both in real battles and in training flights. A "Hassle."

Expansion      This Dante'esque invention deserves to be better known. An aircraft carrier is
   joint       made to bend in the pitch axis in a couple of places along its hull. This is
               accomplished by building in "expansion joints," transverse spaces running the
               width of the hull, one fore and one aft, nominally about 3 feet in width, that
               have overlapping side plates, allowing the spaces to contract and the hull to
               "bend" in heavy seas. No one would care about this except that these expansion
               joints are also passageways. (That's Navy for "corridors.") More particularly,
               they're passageways that have led to my stateroom! (Keep calm, Paul.) So you
               innocently step out of your stateroom in heavy seas, into the passageway,
               because you've been ordered to make a flight to defend the country, when
               without warning the bulkheads ("walls" to you landlubbers) of the passageway
               squeeze inward and threaten to impact your body with some 200 thousand gross
               tons of force, and you're hoping the engineers have correctly figured that it
               won't quite squeeze your head to the size of a turnip. Keep calm, you say??

Fantail        The back end of the 'boat'. The stern. I know where it's at. Somebody else
               knows why it's called a "fantail." (Isn't that a kind of pigeon?)

Final checker  A good idea in every quality assurance program, this individual gives the final
               OK on a finished maintenance job. He brings responsible good sense and overview
               to a job that up until then has perhaps been handled by specialists, each of
               whom has approved their own job. On the flight deck, the F.C. gets "thumbs-up"
               from the small army of specialists scurrying under and around the aircraft as
               it is on the catapult awaiting launch: One hooks up the catapult holdback and
               checks the alignment of the A/C on the cat, others pull ordnance safety pins
               and show them to the F.C., one checks for leaks under the A/C, etc. The F.C.
               checks the overall condition of the A/C (tires, gear struts, canopy, wing flaps
               or position, fire ?!, etc.). The F.C., identified by his white shirt or jacket,
               then gives the final thumbs up to the catapult officer. All this happens in
               less than ten seconds. The F.C. is usually a Chief Petty Officer or a
               Maintenance First Class P.O.

Fire           Nothing gets your attention aboard the carrier like the rapidly repeated bell
               over the loudspeakers, followed by "Fire, fire, there's a fire in space ...."
               Fortunately, the ship's emergency procedures are usually equal to the
               situation, and the small fire is put out. (Let's not talk about the BIG fires,
               the ones we all worry about. The ones on the Forrestal and Oriskany, that took
               hundreds of lives.) We may even get a little blasé about fire calls onboard. No
               matter, as long as you're on the carrier, with its constant fueling and
               ordnance-handling operations, fire will be your chief nightmare.

Flat-top       An aircraft carrier.

Flight deck    The business district of the carrier, about 60-70 feet above the sea surface.
               Includes the angle deck landing area and the forward catapult take-off area.
               The 70-some A/C of the carrier's air wing are parked aft on the deck in
               preparation for take-off on the catapults. During the landing phase, A/C are
               taxied forward after landing and parked on the bow end, leaving the landing
               area free. Huge elevators carry A/C to the Flight deck from the Hangar deck,
               where maintenance is performed. No film representation can do justice to the
               deafening sound level, the constantly hazardous interaction of men and
               machines, and the precise application of immense power that is Flight deck
               operations. There is nothing else on land or sea remotely like it. The flight
               deck is coated with a "non-skid" substance, which is slightly tacky when dry,
               and which when sprayed with salt water, jet fuel, and oil   as it almost always
               is   becomes the slipperiest surface known to man. When the ship heels, heaves,
               yaws, and pitches, which it does in spite of stabilization, aircraft on the
               deck want to move in undesirable directions. And they have. (For this reason,
               all aircraft aboard ship are tied down with chains at all times when not being
               moved.)

Fore           Forward or front. Used mainly in phrases like fore & aft, viz. "Fore-and-aft
               cap."

Fouled deck    The carrier's landing area is "fouled" when it is not ready to land aircraft.
               During landing ("recovery") operations, aircraft may come aboard with less than
               30 seconds interval. During that time the previous aircraft must clear the
               landing area. Until it has cleared, the deck is fouled, and a red light
               indicates this to the LSO. If the deck is not "clear" before the incoming a/c
               reaches a critical decision point (just a few seconds from the ramp), the LSO
               will wave off the a/c in the groove.

Fox Corpen     The carrier's heading for flight operations. Normally, if there's natural wind,
               there's only one ideal heading for launch: straight into the wind. For recovery
               the ship would turn slightly to starboard to get the wind down the angle deck.
               (Hearsay: "Corpen" indicates course, while "Fox" stands for the "F" in "Flight
               ops." Analogously, "Romeo Corpen" means the course steered during an "Unrep"  
               Underway Replenishment   operation.)

Fresnel lens   An ingenious arrangement of prismatic lenses, invented by the Frenchman
               Augustin Fresnel (pronounced frenél) early in the 19th century. After decades
               of use in lighthouses, the technology became standard for U.S. carrier OLS only
               in the 1960's. Provides a more powerful, narrower beam than the traditional
               mirror, and is more readily stabilized. If technically interested, check this
               site: http://www.lanternroom.com/misc/freslens.htm

Galley         The word "kitchen" doesn't exist in the Navy. It's a 'galley.' Naturally, to a
               career Navy man the room in his house with the stove and fridge is also a
               galley.

General        "Boing, boing boing" reverberates throughout the ship, followed by: "General
   Quarters    Quarters, General Quarters, all hands man your battle stations. This is not a
               drill." G.Q. is the ship's battle readiness and emergency condition. The ship
               goes to G.Q. when there is serious danger of battle damage, from within or
               without. At G.Q. each sailor and officer has an assigned station. Pilots muster
               in the squadron's ready room.

GQ             General Quarters, as above. Used colloquially to indicate an overreaction: "She
               went to GQ when I told her I had donated her ugly red shoes."

Groove         The aircraft's final, visual approach to the ship, when the pilot picks up the
               "ball" on the ship's OLS. The pilot makes his ball call, adjusts the angle of
               attack, and concentrates on the ball, controlling speed with the stick and rate
               of descent with the throttle, unless using autothrottle, in which case it's
               backwards, or ACLS, in which case he "monitors" with hands on. In the groove
               the (perfect) pilot does not look at the deck, except for quick scans for
               line-up, but "flies the ball" all the way to touchdown.

Hangar deck    The carrier's vast cavern of a deck, enclosed and running nearly the length of
               the ship a couple of decks below the Flight deck, where aircraft are brought
               for maintenance, or tucked away in bad weather or when the Flight deck needs to
               be clear for any reason. The Hangar deck has space for all the carrier's
               aircraft. The Hangar deck is labeled the #1 deck of the ship; lower decks are
               numbered 2,3, etc. downward, while decks above the Hangar deck are numbered
               O-1, O-2, etc, upward. (The Flight deck is typically deck O-3.) Each squadron
               has its assigned areas on the Hangar deck. Almost any level of maintenance
               short of a total rebuild can be done here. Three huge A/C elevators allow
               movement of aircraft between the Hangar deck and the Flight deck. For curious
               etymological note, see "Hangar".

Hatch          There aren't "doors" onboard a Navy ship. Even if it looks like a door, it's a
               "hatch." Most hatches have a method of watertight closure by, say, four to
               eight dogs around the perimeter of the hatch. The high-speed type is tightened
               (or "dogged") quickly with a turn of a wheel centered on the hatch, which
               wedges the dogs against the surrounding bulkhead. An old-salt sailor will
               naturally call a door in his house a hatch.

Head           It's said that "a dear child has many names."  If so, this spot must be dear
               indeed.  Known to landlubbers by such names as John, comfort station, commode,
               throne, rest room, wash room, W.C., closet, toilet, crapper, and various less
               gentile appellations, onboard ship there's one and only one term for the little
               room in question:  The Head.  The name is said to have originated on ancient
               square-rigged sailing vessels, where the sailors relieved themselves at what
               was then called the head of the ship: the bow, off the bowsprit. Now this may
               sound crazy. My blessed grandmother always told me, "Never piss off the bow!"
               and I've found that to be reliable advice. So what were these square-rigged
               sailors doing? Well, the answer lies in the relative wind. My granny was used
               to motorboats, where the wind usually comes over the bow. If you relieve
               yourself over the bow on a motor ship you may get a face-full of it. On a
               sailing ship, on the other hand, the wind normally comes from behind or off a
               rear quarter, so the bow is the perfect place to let go a stream, which is
               gracefully carried off in a forward direction.
               [An alternate etymology has been suggested (but only by me, here and now, as
               far as I know): Doesn't common sense, not to mention common experience, suggest
               that the term reflects the key decisions, the profound plans, the inspired
               stratagems, that have a way of clarifying themselves at that special moment in
               this special space?]
               In any case, it goes without saying that   be it thirty years after a Navy
               career   whether in a California split level or a classic Cape Cod, this
               special place will always be "the Head" to a Navy man.

Helo           Helicopter. Around the carrier, "The Helo" is the rescue helicopter (angel),
               always airborne during flight ops.

Holdback       The lowly holdback fitting stands (or hangs) between the pilot and a cold cat
               shot. It's a solid steel rod, 6-7 inches long, with a machined collar at either
               end. As the aircraft taxis onto the catapult track, the forward end of the
               holdback is fitted into a receptacle in the aircraft's belly.F-8 Crusader
               holdback fitting The aft end is secured to a cable from the deck. The A/C is
               inched forward very slowly to take up the slack in the cable. (If this is done
               too quickly the holdback can be stressed, and the A/C must be pushed back and a
               new holdback fitted. An unpopular mistake by the pilot.) As the aircraft turns
               up to full power, the holdback fitting is the weak link in the high-tension
               train that holds the A/C back. And here's the idea of the holdback: At one
               point the rod is machined down to a smaller diameter which gives a weak point.
               When the catapult fires, the force of the cat stroke breaks the holdback
               fitting at the weak point, and the A/C is free to be pulled down the cat track.
               Simple, but the Navy pays a lot for holdback fittings because the tolerances
               and quality control must be perfect. The tensile strength of the steel must be
               exact, and the tensile breaking point at the weak groove must be precisely
               known. The holdback fitting (which is specific to each type of aircraft) must
               break at the right millisecond during the pressure build-up phase of the cat's
               power stroke. Too soon, you may have a cold cat shot. Too late, you can tear
               the aircraft apart or smack the pilot silly. The aircrew's lives literally
               hinge on the holdback manufacturer's quality assurance program.

Hook-skip      Every Navy pilot's favorite excuse for a bolter. If the pneumatic bungee
               pressure (or whatever) holding the hook extended is low, the hook may bounce
               upon hitting the deck, and will probably not catch a wire. A worn hook point
               may give the same result, or, worse, may spit a wire.

Hook-to-       The critical vertical distance between the tailhook point and the
   ramp        ramp on carrier landings. These few feet of distance can easily
               evaporate to nothing in the case of a pitching deck                     Low at
                                                                                     * the
               On the smaller (27C class) carriers like the Shangri-La (right) the     ramp
               hook-to-ramp was minimal (8-9 ft) even on a perfect pass. Catch a
               1-wire and you barely cheated the devil.

"Huffer"       The jet engine start cart, used on the carrier, and ashore if no fixed airhose
(start cart)   is available. The jet engine compressor needs to turn at perhaps 20% RPM before
               it'll sustain ignition, and since fighters don't have starter motors (too
               heavy), the huffer does the job by blowing a high velocity air stream through a
               special fitting to turn the engine. The pilot signals with a two-finger
               "turn-up" sign to the plane captain to start turning the engine.

Inflight       No, not romance on United Airlines, but an even more hazardous adventure: On a
engagement     carrier landing, the tailhook catching a wire before the wheels touch the deck.
               Ooh. A bad moment in store. The arresting gear slows the still flying A/C
               abruptly to below flying speed, and unceremoniously slams it to the deck.
               Usually busts the landing gear and much of the rest of the airplane, not to
               mention the pilot's back. How do we get into this scrape? Probably a wave-off
               in close (too close), scraping the deck with the hook, and the aircraft in a
               nose high attitude, desperately seeking succor.

Integrity      When flight ops aboard the carrier are secured and civilized folk hit the rack
   watch       for the night, an "integrity watch" crew patrols the flight deck and hangar
               deck to ensure safety and proper tie-down of the aircraft, which can work
               themselves loose in a heavy sea. Nominally in charge of the watch is the
               integrity watch officer (of course a chief is really in charge of the crew, as
               always), a job that falls mainly to the nuggets in the squadron. It's a lonely
               watch, wandering the decks for four hours in the middle of the night, the time
               ticked off by the bells each half hour; and it usually comes when you're
               scheduled for three hops the next day. What the hell. Sleep some other night.

Island         The carrier's superstructure, rising from the Flight Deck on the starboard
               side. Contains the bridge, "Pri-Fly" and other mysteries. Messes up airflow on
               final approach. See Burble.

JBD            Jet Blast Deflector. Large steel plates that pivot up out of the flight deck
               behind a catapult, to protect from the blast from an aircraft at full power on
               the cat.

Kneeknocker    Busted knees are a Navy man's occupational hazard. Ship-board passageways are
               interrupted at regular intervals by waterproof, airproof, fireproof hatches,
               which supposedly will prevent the ship from sinking or going up in a
               conflagration. Well, the lip of the hatch is just below knee level. If you lift
               your legs just right you'll make it through; if you don't your knees are toast.

Ladder         Onboard ship, what you would elsewhere call stairs is a ladder. A Navy man
               calls stairs a "ladder" even in his house.

Launch         The first phase of a carrier's cyclic flight operations. (See Recovery.) At the
               start of the launch sequence, the A/C are parked on the aft half of the flight
               deck. As launch operations begin, A/C are taxied forward and directed by Yellow
               Shirts onto the next available catapult. Typically, a catapult stands idle for
               only a few seconds before the next bird is being hooked up.

Leeward        The side of the ship away from the wind, or in the downwind direction.
               Pronounced "loo-erd". Opposite of Windward.

Liberty        Shore leave for the crew when the ship is in port. For the enlisted crew this
               is strictly enforced as a given number of hours ashore. (For the excitement of
               getting ashore, see "Liberty boat," below.) For the officers, there's more
               leeway. (Here's a mariners' term, by the way: leeway   the space between the
               ship and any downwind obstruction, like a rocky coastline.) Lots more leeway;
               see "admin."

Liberty boat   When the carrier visits a foreign port, it does not tie up to a pier. For
               reasons of security and operational readiness the Captain anchors outside the
               harbor, usually 1/2 mile to a mile offshore. But the ship has 5-6000 sailors
               and officers who have been promised liberty ashore. The solution is liberty
               boats, open inboard engine mass movers that hold 30-40+ human sardines.
               Operating the boats merges two factors which can lead to more excitement than
               you need: 1. There is often a sea state that makes the boats bob up and down
               several feet (which the carrier does not), so that to step from the boat's
               gunwale to the small platform at the bottom of the ladder hanging over the
               ship's side and moving up and down relative to the boat requires a sure and
               deft step; and 2. On the returning boats, in the black of night, most of the
               sailors are dead drunk! One or two sailors at the bottom of the ladder, tied
               with lifelines and outfitted with rescue equipment, stand ready to assist in
               this disaster-waiting-to-happen. If the sea state is too great, the Captain may
               cancel liberty, but the crew response would be near-mutinous. Also, canceling
               the return boats late at night if the sea picks up would leave the crew
               stranded ashore. There's always an officer riding and nominally in charge of
               the boat: the dreaded Boat officer watch!

Lineup         Lining up the aircraft for landing can be tricky enough on a land-based field,
               if there's a crosswind. On a carrier it's a real bear! The British 1940s
               invention of the angled deck solved the bothersome problem of landing aircraft
               crashing into parked aircraft on deck, if they missed the wires. But you rarely
               get something for nothing, and "The Angle" brought on serious difficulties in
               lining up the aircraft for landing. The offset of the landing deck by 10-12
               degrees brought both the difficulty of providing wind "down the Angle," and the
               awkward fact that the strip you're trying to land on is moving off to your
               right at a speed of perhaps 20-30 knots. Crabbing for both crosswind and the
               moving goal line is an extraordinary challenge, which doesn't get any easier in
               the dark of night. The tendency at touchdown becomes a right-to-left drift,
               with the very real hazard of going over the port edge, hanging by the hook, if
               you've caught the 4-wire and are off centerline.

LSO            Landing Signal Officer, popularly known as "paddles". The LSO
               mans a platform on the port side of the ship during recoveries.
               The LSO is situated such that his eyes are on the glide slope.
               He has primary radio contact with the pilot on final approach,
               and serves both as a backup to the mirror system for the pilot
               and as an early warning of impending trouble. The LSO is able
               to detect power and attitude changes in the landing aircraft,
               and issue a call for adjustments. In close his calls can get           LSO
               pretty animated: "Power! POWER!", followed perhaps by the       [1pix] waves
               wave-off lights, which the LSO controls. LSO's form a tight            Crusader
               community of specially trained Navy pilots. An LSO can only be
               trained by an experienced LSO, and they recognize lineages of
               training descending from masters of the craft (excuse the BS!).
               After a flight recovery, the LSO visits each of the Ready Rooms
               to publicly debrief each pilot on his pass. This is what gives
               the LSO his power; the power of embarrassment. Actually, LSO's
               get a great deal of respect from their fellow aviators, many of
               whom owe their lives to the LSO. See "Cut" pass and "OK."

Marshal        Sometimes used as a synonym for "rendezvous," Marshal (as a noun) usually
               refers to the specific mid-altitude rendezvous point designated for check-in
               with the carrier's 'approach control' (which is called "Marshal"   as in
               "Allstar Marshal, Gruesome One checking in") before returning to the ship to
               land. It's the aircraft holding pattern, typically at about 20,000 feet, from
               which the carrier's radar controllers feed the aircraft into the landing
               pattern. "To marshal" is to show up at the marshal point.

Meatball       See the Ball.

Mess           While the officers' on-board eatery is known as the wardroom, the enlisted
               men's somewhat-less-than-4-star establishment is tellingly called the Mess. But
               officers have a "mess" too; a special round-the-back-of-the-galley greasy spoon
               for watch-standers and pilots between flights, where you are free from protocol
               and from the uniform of the day. You can eat in your flight suit and feel free
               to be as unwashed as you please. In fact you'd better look a little filthy, or
               you're not supposed to be there. A liberating place. (And see "midrats",
               below.)

Midrats        "Midnight rations." When your former fighter pilot hubby rolls out of bed in
               the middle of the night and you hear the frig door open, that's midrats. He's
               just trying to duplicate how it was back in the day....   Scheduled to launch
               in the dark of night, he would stop by the mess (see above) for some midrats
               before taking off. This usually involved downing some undefinable stiff goo,
               mostly made with eggs, perhaps made yesterday. Made you wish you'd get shot
               down and captured.

The Mirror     The optical landing system mounted on the port side of the flight deck, and
               stabilized for the roll, pitch, and yaw of the ship. The pilot keeps an amber
               center light ("the ball") lined up with green "datum lights" to stay on the
               glide slope. (This isn't easy.) It used to be an actual mirror; now a Fresnel
               lens is used but it's still called a mirror.

Moon           Naval aviators' distaste for black-ass night carrier landings makes them all
               expert on the phases of the moon. The moon rises about 50 minutes later each
               day, and savvy carrier pilots know exactly how it will relate to their
               scheduled flight time.

"Mother"       General radio designation for the carrier, the "mother ship". An airborne
               aircraft may hear: "Gruesome four, Mother advises fouled deck; your signal
               delta."

Night Trap     Night landings are a Navy pilot's scariest moments, unless they're pinkies.

"Now hear      It's just like in the movies: The bosun's whistle blows in the ship's speakers,
     this!"    followed by this hallowed phrase, intended to induce respectful and attentive
               listening by the crew. If your dad's a Navy man, you've heard this phrase a
               hundred times at home. You can be the judge of whether it induced respectful
               and attentive listening.

OK             A well-executed carrier landing, as graded by the LSO. The ideal "OK-3" pass
               catches the target No.3 wire. A pass so steady that the LSO suspects the Lord
               himself is at the controls rates an OK-3 [underlined]. An almost-OK pass is "
               (OK)" [in parentheses]. An OK-3 grade by the LSO in everyone's earshot in the
               Ready Room may be the greatest little high you'll have that day. Your chest
               comes out a bit, and that smile just suggests that you'd be willing to instruct
               the others, if there were only time. But for the opposite kind of pass, see "
               Cut."

OLS            Optical Landing System. See "Mirror".

Overhead       Nope. Bad guess. Has nothing to do with cost of doing business. The overhead is
               precisely what you landlubbers would call a "ceiling": "Easing out the
               champagne cork with his thumbs, Ensign Dumbo heard a loud crack as it impacted
               the overhead." Of course it works as an adjective, too: "Sufferin' catfish! if
               the overhead light ain't burned out again!"

Paddles        A sort of endearing term for the LSO, from the
               days when LSO's used a paddle in each hand to
               "wave" aircraft aboard (see illustration).
               Actual paddles can still be used if the mirror
               fails, or under no-radio conditions, though
               modern pilots and LSO's get dangerously little          paddles-TBM  
               training in this critical back-up procedure.            Avenger

               At right, a TBM Avenger at the ramp, with
               Paddles. This was the type a/c flown by Naval
               Aviator George H.W. Bush (the father, not the
               son!) in WWII.

Pass           Naval Aviators have been known to make various kinds of passes, but onboard
               ship, it means an attempt at a carrier landing. Often successful, but some
               pilots ...uh... like to make two or three passes (see "bolter") before making a
               trap.

Passageway     There aren't hallways or corridors on board ship. If it looks like a hallway or
               corridor it's a "passageway." (To a Navy man, of course, the hallway in his
               house is a passageway, too.) Things you're likely to see in a passageway
               include hatches, bulkheads, spaces, ladders, kneeknockers, and dogs, and none
               of them mean whatever they sound like.

Pattern        By itself this word usually refers to the daytime VFR flight pattern (landing
               pattern) around the ship (or the field).  This is the place for the squadron to
               look good.  The landing pattern of a carrier is a very specific
               four-dimensional flight path designed to get all aircraft aboard in the minimum
               amount of time, because the carrier is especially vulnerable during launch and
               recovery operations, as it has to steam at a steady course and speed and the
               recovering aircraft are low on fuel.  The landing pattern is closely
               coordinated with the holding pattern A flight of four (say) approaches the
               carrier from abaft, passing close abeam the starboard side of the ship at 400+
               knots, 800' altitude, in starboard echelon. The drill is to make the coolest
               sound you can as you enter the break. (Some years ago, opening the "oil cooler
               door" on the F-8 Crusader would give a very cool wolf-howl-like sound. Coming
               to idle just before reaching the ship gives an eerie silence.) Each A/C breaks
               hard left with a few seconds interval between each. With power at idle and
               speed brakes out, speed bleeds off in the 180° turn, and the A/C levels
               downwind off the port beam of the ship, which is headed in the opposite
               direction at up to 30 knots. When abeam the fantail (at the "One-eighty"
               position) at an altitude of 600 feet, you start your port descending turn
               toward the ship, which is still pulling away. About halfway through your turn,
               at the 90° position (the "90"), you should be on speed and at about 450'. You
               intentionally overshoot the ship's wake by about 10° to line up with the angle
               deck, roll out in the groove, acquire the ball, reduce power to establish your
               rate of descent (because now you're wings level and need less power for the
               same descent rate), and make your ball call to the LSO. Then you merely stay
               precisely on glideslope, speed, and centerline of the deck which is moving away
               and to the right at perhaps 30 knots. The pass is perfect; you go to full power
               on touchdown, power to idle when you're stopped. As you touch down the next A/C
               is at the 90° position (the "90") in the pattern, ready to roll into the
               groove. You're pulled backward by the arresting cable. The yellow shirt signals
               hook up. You raise the hook and follow his signals to move forward, fold the
               wings, and turn right. He passes you on to the next director who signals you to
               speed up. You cross the yellow foul line on the deck. A red light on the LSO
               platform has indicated "fouled deck" since you touched down. Now you're clear
               and the green "ready deck" light comes on. By this time the next A/C may be
               just 5 seconds from touchdown. A landing will occur every 20-some seconds
               during recovery. And that's the pattern. (YouTube has a reasonable demo at:
               http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BjX1Qa22AqA )

Pinky          A daylight flight that lands just after sunset, giving you credit for a night
               landing while you essentially still have daylight. The squadron flight officer
               had better be equitable with giving out pinkies, or fights are likely to
               develop. (There are occasional rumors that CAG, an older and wiser man than
               most, often has important meetings later in the evening and finds it necessary
               to get his quota of night traps earlier in the day, i.e., a pinky, but we think
               that's just malicious gossip. Wouldn't happen. Eh?)

Pitching deck  This is when you really need the LSO. What am I doing flying off the carrier in
               a storm, anyway? Well, OK, "operational necessity"... But in spite of
               stabilization of the ship, the flight deck will rise and fall. And since the
               OLS is stabilized to the glide slope, all that pitching is hidden from the
               pilot. The LSO's visual call is still the best way to avoid a meeting of the
               aircraft with a rising deck. Even if a ramp strike does not occur, the rising
               deck can crush an aircraft's landing gear.

Plane captain  The "PC" is usually a junior enlisted man with a great responsibility. His
               assignment as plane captain for a particular aircraft means he ensures that the
               aircraft is preflighted and ready for flight when the pilot comes to man. The
               PC assists the pilot in getting strapped in, and directs the start-up sequence
               from the deck. The PC's name is often painted on his aircraft, which is a great
               source of pride.

Plane guard    Normally, when an aircraft carrier is conducting flight operations, a
               destroyer of the task group takes a "plane guard" position a half mile or
               so aft of the carrier, safely out of the flight pattern. The purpose is
               simply safety: To pick any eventual crash victims out of the water. (In a
               crash the "angel" helo is usually there first, but you never know; the
               COD could crash with a bunch of folks.) The plane guard serves other                 [Howard-Ste]
               incidental purposes for the pilot: In the VFR flight pattern it's a
               convenient line-up aid, since it's in a dependable position. And it makes
               it (a little) easier to pick up the carrier visually from a distance. All
               in all a good addition to the safety procedures. To the right: Destroyer
               USS Howard in plane guard position aft of USS Stennis.

PLAT           "Pilot's Landing Aid Television." (Or something like that.) A typical Navy
               acronym for a very scary "Pilot's Landing Aid." The camera for this demonic
               device is buried in the flight deck, looking up the glide slope. Each landing
               on the ship is televised live in the Ready Room. How motivational is this? I've
               watched several aircraft go up in flames on the PLAT before going out flying.

Poopy Suit     Or "bag." It's not what it sounds like, whatever that is. Formally an
               "Antiexposure suit", exposing yourself in this contraption would be damn near
               impossible. Relieving yourself is equally impossible. Plan an extra ten minutes
               in the Ready Room to get this monstrosity on. This rubber coverall fits, more
               or less, over the standard flight suit, and is required flying gear over water
               whenever the air-and-water temperature goes below what the chart says. Without
               it, should you go in the drink, you'd be flounder-food in a hurry. In temperate
               climates the "bag" will normally be worn throughout the winter months on
               carrier-based flights.

Port           Now let's learn this once for all: Port is LEFT. Starboard is the other way.
               Because the steering oar was on the right in old (viking age) ships, they
               docked the ship with the left side to the pier   or port. So that was the
               "port" side of the ship.

Pri-fly        "Primary Flight Control." This is the carrier's 'control tower'. The domain of
               the Air Boss, the god of the flight traffic pattern. Pri-fly is also staffed
               with experienced pilots who can advise on emergency procedures if needed.

Ramp           This is the part of the carrier you hit and kill yourself on if you're low on
               landing.

Ramp Strike    This is when you hit the above with your airplane. Often results
               in a memorial service, or at least a busted landing gear. Don't  [1pix] [rampstrike]
               be low ... no one likes memorial services. In this ramp strike
               at 170 mph, the pilot miraculously survived:

Ready Room     A spartan room on the carrier (or in the hangar, when ashore) where the pilots
               spend much of their time yabbering. Contains a desk for the SDO (Squadron Duty
               Officer), a black-and-white TV set (the PLAT) that shows all landings from a
               camera buried in the flight deck, and a reclinable chair for each squadron
               officer, to do with as he likes. Flight briefs and debriefs, personality
               clashes, and games of Ace-deuce take place here daily.

Recognition    An entertaining slide show-slash-quiz which the AIO puts on from time to time
               in the Ready Room. It consists mostly of endless dozens of slides with fuzzy
               black-and-white photos of "enemy" ships. You're supposed to learn to tell them
               apart, so you can report back in the flight debrief. (But it's a generic trait
               among pilots that they don't care about ships. They recognize three kinds:
               Flat-tops, subs, and "others." The AIO eventually just gives them a camera.)
               The second best part of the show is that the AIO turns off the lights in the
               Ready Room so you can sleep. The best part is that your squadron mates' howls
               will wake you up when the spicy shots come up on the screen. No matter how long
               the ship has been at sea, the guys have no recognition problem with these uh
               ... hulls. An AIO who fails to spice up his Rec. show would be shunned, since
               he has no other known redeeming social value.

Recovery       A carrier's cyclic flight operations is separated into launch and recovery
               (landing) phases. During the recovery phase the flight deck starts clear of
               aircraft. Upon landing, each A/C is taxied forward and parked clear of the
               landing area. An aircraft will land every 20-some seconds during the recovery
               phase.


                   HEY!  WANT TO RIDE ALONG ON AN APPROACH AND RECOVERY?  REALLY!  YOU CAN LOG
                   A CARRIER LANDING! JUST CLICK THIS LONG LINK.

Red Ball       When the pilot is low on the glide slope, the ball turns red. Red like blood.
               Better do something about it. Like add power. Lots of power. Now!

Romeo          means the ship's heading during underway replenishment ("unrep" - you're now
   Corpen      one of very few who know this; go out and impress someone). See the analogous "
               Fox Corpen."

Rounddown      The Ramp, Fantail, the hurtin' zone of the carrier deck. But if you don't hit
               IT, it won't hurt YOU.

Sand Crabs     Usually plural. Civilian so-called workers who are contracted to do repair work
               on the ship, often in a foreign port. In most countries they're laggards. In
               Japan they're real workers.

Shooter        Slang for the Catapult Officer.

Space          More often "spaces." Any or all rooms or areas on board ship, in or around a
               hangar, etc. Each room or segment of a passageway or deck has a space number.
               "The Chief will inspect the Avionics spaces at 0800." A Navy dad will naturally
               say, "Not until you've cleaned your space, Billy." (That would be Billy's
               room.)

Spaghetti      The "wires," collectively, on the carrier. The arresting gear; the landing
               area.

Spit a wire    The steel point of the tailhook works in a violent environment, and needs
               frequent replacement. If it becomes worn, the hook may initially catch a wire,
               but fail to hold it when the pressure builds as the aircraft decelerates. If
               the hook "spits" or releases the cable at this point, the aircraft will
               probably not regain flying speed and will likely end up going in the drink. A
               serious, sometimes fatal, consequence of overlooking a small part.

Spotting       A nasty habit. Like in baseball, taking your eye off the ball is a bad idea in
   the deck    carrier landings. "Spotting the deck", or switching your attention to the deck
               for even the last second before touchdown will usually result in an increased
               sink rate and often a three-point landing and overstressed landing gear. LSO's
               uniformly condemn the practice, but nevertheless it thrives. Especially after a
               couple of bolters when it's "Get aboard or bingo." All this said, many
               experienced Naval Aviators routinely spot the deck, using the dip method to get
               aboard, often safely.

Stabilization  More or less successful efforts to fool Mother Nature. The carrier is
               stabilized to reduce pitch and roll movements. The result may be unpredictable
               figure-8-like movements of the ramp. The mirror is stabilized to the glide
               slope. The result is a ramp that can rise without the pilot having any clue.
               The aircraft is also stabilized in pitch and yaw, by systems that can and do go
               out of control. You can't fool Mother Nature.

Starboard      The Right side of the ship or whatever. Dates from the viking ships, where the
               steering oar was mounted on the right ("steerboard" - or "styrbord" in
               vikingese) side. And see "Port", if you feel like it.

Stash          A theoretical term for booze illegally stashed in pilots' staterooms. This
               would be a violation of Navy Regulations, and therefore is thought by some to
               not actually happen.

Stateroom      Senior pilots get their own room, but don't have any fun. Junior pilots share a
               stateroom, and that's where the parties are, such parties as you can have with
               a bunch of sleepless zombies.

Steam          The U.S. Navy is not known to operate steam vessels any longer, but still the
               ships all "steam" when they're underway. [No sooner do I make this fine ironic
               point than Dave "Fireball" Johnson points out that nuclear ships run by steam
               (!)   correct, of course, but I ask you, is a nuke a steam ship?]  Navy ships
               at sea spend a fair amount of time just ... being, but like sharks they have to
               keep moving so what's there to do but ... steam?

Tailhook       Or just "Hook". What distinguishes a naval aircraft. A steel hook lowered
               hydraulically or pneumatically from the rear of the aircraft, intended to
               engage a cable of the carrier's arresting gear to bring the aircraft to a quick
               stop. Attaches to the aircraft via a flexible fitting required to take the full
               force of bringing a 25 ton aircraft from 150+ mph to zero in about 2 seconds.
               Its engineering is one of the marvels of modern technology.

Three-point    Busted nose gearOuch! A Navy jet is built to land on its two main mounts. After
   landing     touchdown the hook catches a wire and slams the nose gear down. But landing on
               the three mounts together is a bad deal; it may well collapse the nose gear.
               You get into this predicament when you're high on the glide slope. Seeing the
               meatball climb on the mirror you try to correct down with a poorly executed dip
               . Your nose gets low, your sink rate's high, and before you're reestablished
               you hit the deck with all three mounts. If you're lucky, the hook will catch a
               wire, and though the nose gear may collapse, as on the grim-looking Crusader at
               right, at least you're aboard. If you're less lucky, with the hook farther from
               the deck than in the normal landing attitude the hook may skip, the A/C may
               bounce, and you're back in the air with a busted nose gear. You'se in big
               trouble, boy.

Tilly          A wheeled crane used on the flight deck. Painted yellow, like all moveable
               (nonflying) flight deck equipment, the tilly is compact but powerful, able to
               clear disabled aircraft or parts thereof from the landing area in a hurry.

Topside        You just can't say "upstairs" onboard a ship. It's Topside. Navy folks use this
               term ashore, too. (You can't say "downstairs", either. And of course there
               aren't "stairs" onboard ship.)

A Trap         An arrested landing. Navy pilots practice carrier landing techniques constantly
               when ashore. See MLP.

Unrep          Underway Replenishment. A carrier can stay at sea for months at a time, but
               needs a steady supply of groceries, razor blades and toilet paper. And one or
               two other things, like fuel if it's oil burning, and jet fuel in any case.
               While some high priority items may be delivered by COD, most supplies come
               aboard from a cargo ship or oiler which rendezvous'es (?) with the carrier at
               sea. The at-sea resupply "evolution" (the Unrep) can be more exciting than you
               really want when the high seas are really high (sea state of 5 is the max for
               Unrep), as the two ships are steaming side by side, connected by one or more
               high lines or fuel hoses, with about 160 feet of separation. (As a bonus
               factoid for trivia buffs, the Unrep heading is known as the "Romeo Corpen.")

Wardroom       The officers' dining room onboard. Chipped beef is a real favorite. And coffee
               made with water that tastes of jet fuel. (The ship makes its unique "fresh"
               water from the polluted salt water it's steaming through. It also disposes of
               its wastes in the same waters. During "cyclic ops" the ship steams back and
               forth in the same sea lane, dumping waste and making drinking water.) You're
               expected to behave in the wardroom, a challenge for most aviators. (But if
               you're in-between flights in a sweaty flight suit you can go to the dirty-shirt
               mess and not have to behave at all.) You're not supposed to talk about
               politics, sex, or religion in the wardroom. It often gets very quiet there.

Watch          A period, usually 4 hours, when the young fighter pilot is actually asked to do
               something other than eat, sleep, swear, fart, and fly.  All young fighter
               pilots take offense at being told to stand a watch;  it seems an inexcusable
               waste of their immeasurable talents.  Onboard ship their least favorite watches
               are the Boat Officer Watch, the Integrity Watch, and the all-day Squadron Duty
               Officer (SDO) watch, also known by the Stalinesque-sounding appellation ""The
               Duty"".
               [Now here's a scoop   the logic is complex, but try to follow it:  The Navy
               needs Landing Signal Officers (LSO's) to keep their pilots alive.  LSO's
               regularly stand an often miserable and always hazardous watch on the LSO
               platform, out in the weather and practically under the wingtip of landing
               aircraft.  Now, no one in their right mind would volunteer for that.  (Let's
               dismiss the puling claim that no one in their right mind flies jets off
               boats...)  Except that the LSO is a hero among his peers.  He has powers  
               seemingly magical   and for many he's the reason they're still alive.  And if
               there's one thing more precious than life itself to a fighter pilot, it's
               getting the respect of his peers.  (Are you with me so far?)  Ergo, an LSO
               doesn't have to stand any other watches, like the great unwashed masses of
               young aviators do.  So, the bottom line is:  A J.O. is motivated to get out of
               these crappy watches that waste his exceptional talents by becoming an LSO and
               getting peer respect!  And that's why these watches exist.  (You read it here
               first!)  All this was figured out decades ago by the brass, and I take back
               everything I've said about them.  They're obviously brilliant.]

Wave           Traditional term for what the LSO (Landing Signal Officer) does. As in "Who's
               waving this recovery?" The LSO doesn't usually wave his arms any longer, but
               used to be he waved a pair of paddles to indicate glide slope and lineup
               information to the pilot on final approach to the carrier. The paddles were
               obviated by development of the landing mirror, but LSOs still need to learn to
               work the paddles, in case the mirror goes down. And pilots need to learn to fly
               by the paddles   being literally waved aboard. This skill is not sufficiently
               practiced nowadays, so losing the mirror is now an emergency condition.

Wave-off       An aborted carrier pass, where the pilot adds power and climbs back in the
               landing pattern. A hazardous condition may have developed   such as the deck
               pitching up, or the deck was fouled, or the pilot's pass was unsafe. Usually
               the command to wave off a pass is issued by the LSO, but the pilot can make his
               own choice to wave it off.

Wind           The aircraft carrier likes to have close to 30 knots of wind down the deck for
               aircraft launch and landings. If there's natural wind, the Captain heads the
               carrier into the wind to launch. For landings, you want the wind to come down
               the angle deck, 10-12° off the ship's axis, to reduce the need to crab on final
               approach. So for landings, the Captain will head the ship a few degrees to
               starboard of the natural wind. If there's no natural wind, the Captain makes
               wind. It's not what it sounds like. He does this by steaming at 25-30 knots;
               but in this case the wind relative to the carrier will come down the axis of
               the ship, giving the pilots a starboard cross wind on final approach and
               bringing the burble into the groove.

Windward       The side of the ship closest to the wind, or in the upwind direction. If you're
               planning to relieve yourself over the rail, select the leeward side instead.

Wire           "The Wires" is the set of 4 heavy wound steel cables comprising the Arresting
               Gear. They're numbered from 1 (furthest aft) to 4. On the ideal landing the
               hook snags the 3-wire. Miss all 4 and you bolter. Each wire has a personality.
               The 1-wire: You don't want to catch this. The LSO's unhappy and you may get a
               cut pass. You're too low at the ramp and putting the aircraft in danger. The
               2-wire: This isn't necessarily bad [the LSO may mark it "(OK)" in his book]. It
               just isn't perfect. You'd like a little more ramp clearance. The 3-wire: This
               is the target wire. Your hook-to-ramp clearance is normative. An "OK-3" grade
               from the LSO is the goal. If you're "on rails" down the glide slope to an OK-3,
               your grade is underlined and you gain stature in the Ready Room. A 4-wire is
               usually safe, though you're high on the glide slope. But if your glide slope is
               leveling in close, or you have a right-to-left drift, you may get an inflight
               engagement, or wind up at or over the port side scupper of the flight deck,
               hanging by the hook (more a problem on older, smaller carriers), or worse. "
               Fly-by-wire" is something else altogether.

Yellow Shirt   The enlisted flight deck directors who have control of movement of A/C on the
               flight deck. A pilot does not move his aircraft, or any external component of
               his aircraft, without a positive direction from a Yellowshirt. The Yellowshirts
               of course wear yellow shirts. There are also White, Green, Purple, Red, and a
               couple of other color shirts on the flight deck, designating specific roles.
               (Green = maintenance, Purple = fuelers, etc.) These guys work in an
               indescribably hazardous environment, and deserve a lot of the medals the pilots
               get.


                              ┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
                              ┃Go to Top of Page┃
                              ┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛
                                      [1]
━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━

                               Aircraft & Flying

              A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z

AAA            Or "Triple-A". Not an auto club. See "Ack-ack" below.

A/B            Afterburner.

A/C            1. Aircraft. An aircraft may be called an airplane, but never a "plane".
               2. Air conditioning and pressurization system.
               3. Anti-collision light. 'Blinker.' (Blinking red light.)

Ack-ack        Anti-aircraft artillery (AAA   "triple-A"). An unfriendly reception when going
               downtown.

ACM            Air Combat Maneuvering. Informally "Tactics". The traditional essence of
               fighter pilot training.

Acute          In formation flying, if a wingman is forward of his proper position in the
               formation, he's "acute." (Those who paid attention in Geometry might object
               that in this case the angle he makes with the flight is more obtuse, i.e., less
               acute. I say don't worry about it.) If he's too far back (more acute angle)
               he's "sucked." Don't laugh; these are the actual professional terms!

ADF            "Automatic Direction Finding," an obsolete piece of VHF radio direction finding
               equipment. The needle points toward whatever station you've dialed in. When you
               pass above it, the needle goes nuts. Big deal. You turn up the volume and the
               Morse code dits'n'dahs are supposed to tell you what station you've got, if you
               actually remember your dits'n'dahs. Which you probably don't.

Afterburner    (Also A/B, Burner, Blower, Heater, and (Brit) Re-heat.) The go-fast mechanism
               that makes fighter planes unique. The 20 feet of flame shooting out the back on
               a night take-off. Simple in concept, but tricky in design and execution, the
               idea of burning hot air and fuel in a jet exhaust made supersonic flight
               possible. The afterburner is basically an extension of the jet engine exhaust
               pipe. You "simply" spray fuel into the hot exhaust gas (while providing
               back-pressure protection for the engine) and you get yourself a mess of thrust.
               You can get twice the power of the basic engine, but you'll use 3 times the
               fuel. In a tactical environment the 'burner will be selected for short bursts
               of acceleration or climbing power, because fuel management is always critical.
               If you run out of fuel, you may as well have been shot down. (Of course you'll
               use the burner as needed in a dogfight. If you're shot down, you might as well
               have run out of fuel.)

Aileron        These ingenious flight control surfaces on the trailing edge of the wing were
               invented by birds. (Don't write me about pterosaurs being first   they flexed
               the whole wing to bank, though the principle is the same.) When a soaring bird
               wants to turn left, it lowers the trailing flight feathers on the right wing,
               which increases the lift on that wing and raises it relative to the left wing.
               At the same time, the bird raises trailing feathers on the left wing, which
               spoils the lift there and lowers the left wing. These two coordinated movements
               are exactly copied by an aircraft's ailerons when the pilot moves the stick to
               the left, thereby putting the aircraft in a left bank, resulting in a left
               turn. (This is not going to be a lecture on aerodynamics, but the only
               effective way to turn an aircraft is to bank it. Because the lift vector
               generated by the wings is always perpendicular to the plane of the wings  
               i.e., straight up when you're level   when you bank left the vector points up
               and left. The left-pointing vector component drives the aircraft   or the bird
                 to the left.)

Airway         The air equivalent of roads and sea lanes. Airways are defined by TACAN fixes (
               radials and distances), and keep commercial traffic organized. Anyone
               (including military aircraft) flying above 18,000 feet in the U.S. flies under
               air traffic control by FAA, and is normally on an airway. High altitude (jet)
               airways are designated with a "Juliet," as J-22, while low altitude airways are
               designated with a "Victor," as V-20.

Alpha          The letter "A" in radio comm. In squadron and aircraft abbreviations it stands
               for "attack"; e.g., aircraft such as the A-1 Skyraider, the A-3 Skywarrior, the
               A-4 Skyhawk, and the A-7 Corsair II. In squadron designations, together with
               the letter "V" (meaning fixed-wing) it designates attack squadrons, e.g.,
               VA-81, VA-83, etc. Also useful in common naval shorthand such as "The new
               skipper's an Alpha-Hotel."

Alphabet       Don't come here with "D as in David" or "P as in Paul." Here's the proper Navy
  (radio       spelling code (only the entries that have extra comments are linked): Alpha
com.)          (see above), Bravo, Charlie, Delta, Echo, Foxtrot, Golf, Hotel, India, Juliet,
               Kilo, Lima, Mike, November, Oscar, Papa, Quebec, Romeo, Sierra, Tango, Uniform,
               Victor, Whiskey, X-ray, Yankee, Zulu.

Altitude       You wouldn't think there would be any dispute about this; it should simply mean
               how high you are.  But there is a small problem:  Standard altimeters work by
               measuring barometric pressure.  Before taking off, the pilot adjusts the
               altimeter to the altitude of the take-off airfield.  And why does he have to do
               that?  Because the local barometric pressure has changed since he landed!  This
               means that all the aircraft in the sky could be operating with different
               altimeter settings, depending on the barometric pressures at their many
               departure airfields.  And that means that my reading of, say, 10,000 feet may
               be widely different from another aircraft's reading of the same altitude.  When
               you're flying IFR that can easily lead to disaster. If you're an American
               Airlines jet with passengers walking in the aisle it's unpopular to be making
               constant violent avoidance maneuvers, so the FAA has come up with the idea of
               standardized "Flight levels" at higher altitudes, to solve the problem.  I
               guess it does solve it, though tossing a few passengers about in the aisle now
               and then used to keep a little excitement in flying.

Angels         'Altitude', in thousands of feet. As in an air controller's: "Gruesome Five,
               Elevator Angels three zero" means: "Gruesome Five (callsign), climb (or
               descend) to altitude 30,000 feet."

Angle of       The angle between the plane of the wing (yes, the plane of the wing of the
   attack      plane) and the relative wind as the aircraft flies. At low speeds, a higher
               angle of attack is needed to give enough lift, and the aircraft will fly with a
               nose-high attitude. To avoid landing in that attitute, we extend flaps and
               slats to increase the lift from the wing, and level the aircraft's attitude,
               allowing the pilot better visibility for landing. (The most drastic measure to
               achieve this was perhaps that of the nonpareil F-8 Crusader, where the pilot
               would pivot the wing up   or the fuselage down, actually   to be able to see to
               land.) On final approach, naval aircraft use Angle of attack as the primary
               indicator of proper landing speed. (See "indexer lights" for the pilot's
               traditional "heads up" display of 'AoA'.) Its advantage over using the airspeed
               indicator is that the correct angle of attack for landing does not vary with
               the aircraft's weight, whereas the landing airspeed varies with fuel load. So
               the pilot flies a constant 14 units, say, of angle of attack on every landing
               pass. The aim, rarely realized, is routine repetition   as in bowling.

Attitude       Not the pilot's but the aircraft's. Refers to the pitch angle of the aircraft;
               nose high or low. On a carrier landing, the LSO, a man of few words, may
               transmit the one word: "Attitude!" to mean "Raise your nose!" Again, the
               aircraft's, not the pilot's.

Auger in       To drill a hole in the ground (or the sea) with your airplane, while still in
               it. Unfailingly fatal, and it rarely happens where a hole needs to be drilled.

Autothrottle   A system that's nice to have when it works, but can lull the pilot into
(APC)          complacency. On final approach to the carrier, the pilot engages the
               autothrottle ("Approach Power Compensator"), which will keep a constant angle
               of attack (i.e., speed control) while the pilot controls rate of descent with
               the stick. Problem is, when the APC isn't working right the pilot has to revert
               to a manual approach, which means controlling speed with the nose attitude
               (i.e., with the stick) and rate of descent with the throttle, an opposite
               procedure. The Air Wing or squadron requires their pilots to regularly make
               "manual" approaches, to maintain a level of proficiency. You just won't be as
               proficient. Every silver lining has a cloud.

Bag            1. n. The Poopy Suit.
               2. n. The Instrument Hood.
               3. v. To bag an enemy aircraft is to shoot it down. You try to avoid getting
               bagged yourself in the process.

Balanced       Being balanced is a good thing. And in formation flying, being balanced makes
               the flying a little easier. The term refers to a four-plane cruise or parade
               formation where the No.2 aircraft has crossed over to the port side. In a
               parade formation, this result in a "finger four." The reason it's easier for
               wingmen (and especially the section leader) to fly a balanced formation is that
               four aircraft in echelon is always stressful. It requires much more constant
               correction and fine control of the formation, which takes its toll. And
               therefore the balanced formation is more relaxing for the flight leader as
               well. A good flight lead doesn't keep a 4-plane in echelon longer than
               necessary.

Balbo          [balbo-indy]A huge formation of aircraft, organized for some non-operational
               purpose, such as to impress dignitaries or scare the enemy. (After Italian
               general Italo Balbo   a sometime buddy of Mussolini   who led a daring, and
               unquestionably impressive, flight of 24 Italian "Savoia S55X" Flying Boats from
               Rome to Chicago and back in 1933. He became so famous and popular in Italy that
               Il Duce packed him off to be Governor of Libya.) The balbo at right (I count 44
               a/c) was to impress NATO brass visiting the Independence in the Mediterranean
               in 1968, in connection with NATO turning 20.  (Taken from the Shangri-La, which
               was part of the celebration, sort of.  Don't think any of the bigwigs visited
               the Shang, though.  Pity; the brass never gets to see things that don't work.)

Bandit         An aircraft positively identified as enemy.

Banner         The air-to-air gunnery target. You arrive at the squadron (this is a
               shore-based exercise) to find out that on your first hop of the day you'll be
               the tow pilot for an air-to-air gunnery flight. You try to think of what you've
               done to the Flight Schedules officer to tick him off. There isn't much you hate
               about flying, but towing the banner (you're known as the "tractor") is right
               there. (See the Gunnery link.) So you brief with the flight and find out that
               it's a year since any of them did this, one of the most intricate and hazardous
               exercises in the fleet. You launch first as the tow. You meet the Ordnance crew
               at the end of the runway, where they have laid out the approx. 8' by 35' nylon
               banner (which weighs a bunch as it's weighted and stabilized with metal bars)
               and the 1200 foot cable that you hope will keep the bullets at a distance. The
               crew hook up the cable to your tailhook fitting, you take up the slack, and
               you're off   in afterburner to clear the area quickly. But you can't go over
               250 knots to avoid fraying the banner or tearing it loose, so you're nose
               sky-high staggering through the air with this non-aerodynamic contraption
               dragging behind you. You hope the banner doesn't fall off (that's happened); it
               could kill a few folks. A chase plane from the flight has launched with you to
               discourage other aircraft from driving into your cable.

               Arriving at the gunnery range you spend 30 harrowing minutes watching the
               would-be gunners struggle with the pattern. The pattern's important because if
               the shooter comes in "sucked"   from too far aft   you'll be seeing bullets
               flying by the cockpit. It's not unheard of that the tow plane gets hit. Now the
               banner needs to be recovered because it's scored: Each shooting a/c has bullets
               painted a different color, and the color can (usually) be distinguished on the
               frays around each bullet hole. So, back at the field you line up over the grass
               strip next to the runway, and on the signal "Drop" from the tower you lower the
               hook. The idea is that the weight of the hook breaks the fitting that holds the
               cable, and the banner falls free. Usually that works, but if it doesn't you
               have an emergency. You're flying around, probably over civilians, with a
               weakened fitting, to try another drop. You could try to drag it off in the
               bushes... And if eventually you may have to land with the banner dragging...
               well, let's not talk about it. All in all, a flight where everything can go
               wrong.

Barberpole     barberpoleTraditional cockpit indicators of the status of landing gear, flaps,
               etc., show "UP" when the gear is up and locked, "DOWN" (or "DN") when it's down
               and locked (are you following this?), and a hash-mark indication, similar to
               the classic barber pole, when the gear is in transit. Most aviators will at
               some time experience seeing a barberpole when the gear is supposed to be down
               and locked for landing. It may just indicate a sticky sensing switch in the
               wheel well, but it may equally well be an unsafe landing gear. Procedures when
               you get a barberpole include cycling the gear, jostling the a/c with various G
               loads, and getting a visual inspection of the gear from a wingman or the tower.
               Landing with an actually unsafe gear is a genuine emergency, which is
               multiplied if landing on a carrier. Aviators may refer to someone whose legs
               are less than fully functional as having barberpole main gear.

BarCAP         "Barrier Combat Air Patrol."  See "CAP".

Barf-bag       Just as some concert pianists never get over stage-fright, some fighter pilots
               never get over barfing. They're still great pilots.

Basic engine   The jet engine without the afterburner. The basic engine performance is shown
               in the cockpit on a tach (RPM gage) as percent of the rotor's rated full speed,
               so full basic engine power is shown as "100%." We call this "MRT" (Military
               Rated Thrust), in contrast to "CRT" (Combat Rated Thrust) which is full
               afterburner power. No matter how powerful your basic engine is, once you've
               felt the kick of afterburner power, it somehow seems pretty wimpy.

Basket         The Air Force has a good method for aerial refueling. The Navy doesn't. The Air
               Force's stabilized tanker boom, guided to the refueling probe by an airman on
               the tanker aircraft works fine if you have a tanker the size of a mid-sized
               building. Since the Navy's tankers have to operate off carriers, they're small,
               no room for a boom or boom-crew. So the system leaves the onus of maneuvering
               on the pilot of the receiving aircraft. And on a black-ass night in the middle
               of the ocean with critical fuel state, that'll raise the pucker factor. The
               fuel hose extends some 30 feet aft of the tanker, ending in a padded cone (the
               Basket   also evocatively known as the "beaver") designed to receive your probe
               and guide it to a successful coupling. This whole business results in one of
               the trickiest maneuvers in aviation. Never mind that the basket is dancing
               around the cockpit (a hit on the cockpit plexiglass could ruin your whole day),
               the pilot has to hold steady until the basket settles down, then add power   if
               you're lucky, your probe is in the beaver, uh, basket. Thrust drives the probe
               tip deeper in and completes the coupling. (Enough...this is beginning to
               resemble an overwrought romance novel.)

Bearing        1.  The direction of some object from your position, given as a magnetic
               direction in compass degrees. A pilot may hear an air controller report, "The
               bogey bears one five zero at three niner miles." Translation: "The unidentified
               radar contact is on a bearing of 150 degrees on the magnetic compass from your
               position, at a distance of 39 nautical miles." (Note, a bearing is not a
               heading, silly, but it could be the required course.)

               2.  The proper military bearing is never far from the mind of the Naval
               Aviator.                                                                 [duty]
                   (Click on thumbnail for aviator attempting proper military bearing.)

Beaver         In addition to any other slang meanings of this term, it's an aviator's
               endearing appellation for the inflight refueling basket, which see.

Bird           An OK word for airplane.

Black-out      Loss of vision, soon to be followed by loss of consciousness, as a result of
               high G maneuvering. Check the hazards of the high G environment at "tunnel
               vision" and "grey-out." Ignoring the warning sign of "grey-out" may take you to
               this next step on the slide toward unconsciousness. It's just a brief step from
               loss of vision (black-out) to loss of consciousness. If you lose consciousness
               while you're pulling 7 G's the aircraft may depart controlled flight as the
               pilot's grip is lost from the control stick, with possibly violent and
               unpredictable effects in the cockpit and on the airframe. The G-suit is the
               pilot's primary aid in combatting these effects of high G loads.

Blower         "A dear child has many names." Here's yet another for afterburner.

Boards         Speed brakes (or "air brakes", a Brit term not used in the U.S. but which makes
               a lot more sense. I mean, what kind of brake isn't a speed brake? What else
               would you brake but speed??). One or more drag-inducing panels on the fuselage,
               tail, or wings that are hydraulically raised into the breeze to add drag and
               reduce airspeed. Effective enough at high speeds to throw the pilot forward in
               the straps. The boards can be hung almost anywhere on the a/c, as you can see
               below:
                

                 [boards]    [boards]        [boards]
               F-8 Crusader A-4 Skyhawk    A-6 Intruder
                 [boards]    [boards]        [boards]
                F-15 Eagle  F-16 Falcon F-18 Hornet (model)

               (And here's an extra bonus factoid: On final approach to landing, many models
               of jet aircraft are flown with the boards out, intentionally adding drag.
               (Obviously not the models where you'd land on the speed brake, like the F-8!)
               Why? you say. In order to get full power more quickly in case it's needed for a
               a wave-off. Jet engines take a second or more to spool up to full RPM, and the
               power always lags that much behind the throttle movement. By flying the
               approach with a higher power setting, in case of a sudden need for power you'll
               get to full power faster. The speed brake is controlled with a thumb switch on
               the throttle, and you snap them back in hydraulically in a fraction of a second
               as you add full power. So now you know that. You're nearly ready for your check
               flight.)

Bogey          A UFO in a sense; that is to say, an unidentified flying object, seen either on
               radar or visually. Probably an aircraft, but it could be a weather balloon or a
               flight of geese.

Bravo          The letter "B" in radio comm. The phrase "Bravo-Sierra" (BS) is a common and
               useful expletive.

Break          1.  As a verb, this means to roll the aircraft at a high rate of roll to a near
               90° bank, and pulling a hard turn, like "break right" or "break left".
               2.  "The Break": The traditional VFR (visual) flight approach to a Navy field,
               now surviving mainly on the carriers and at airshows. The flight screams down
               the duty runway at an impressive rate of speed, in right echelon and shortly
               beyond "the numbers" (the runway designation painted at the end of the strip,
               like "24L" for the left of two parallel runways in the direction of 240°, as at
               Miramar   "Fightertown USA"   God this is a long parenthesis) the leader rolls
               (breaks) hard left to nearly 90° of bank, closes the throttle, extends the
               speed brakes, and pulls enough Gs to slow the A/C and set up downwind at 600'
               altitude. Wingmen follow suit with several seconds between each break. There
               are variations on this traditional break: In the "fan break" the initial roll
               rate is less, but the entire flight breaks together. The lead pulls max Gs, and
               the following wingmen use a progressively lower G loading. This produces
               separation on the downwind leg. Another variation, pretty much limited to the
               carrier landing pattern, is the pitch-up break. You come screaming in at water
               level, and the hard break to port is accompanied by a climb to the downwind
               altitude of 600 feet. For extra effect it can be combined with the fan break
               into a pitch-up fan break. Potentially spectacular, but when tried by the
               unpracticed it's guaranteed to instead produce a humorous effect. Another
               break, the tuck-under, involves a 270° roll to the right, resulting presumably
               in the aircraft in a 90° left bank. The less said about this the better. If it
               doesn't result in an accident it will probably result in discipline. See also
               The Pattern for more on landing patterns.

Brief          Fooling around in the Ready Room before a flight. No, actually, this is
               sometimes taken pretty seriously: the flight crews gather for a pre-flight
               briefing by the flight leader. In war-tme the AIO may attend and amuse the
               flight crews with what the politicians want them to believe about the mission.
               The brief covers stuff like radio frequencies or radio silence procedures,
               bingo field and bingo fuel, and a detailed preview of the upcoming flight:
               Rendezvous point, mission, target procedures, recovery, and the Emergency of
               the Day.

Buddy          The external fuel tank from which an aiborne tanker feeds fuel to a thirsty
   store       customer. When you're short of fuel, the tanker is your best buddy!

Buffet         Not a cafeteria line, and not pronounced like one. (Good, solid "t"; two t's if
               you want: "Buff-ett.") Even though modern fighters have all sorts of artificial
               stall warnings (see "depart"), it's hard to beat the feel of what the actual
               airplane's doing when you're flying close to the edge. And one thing it will do
               before the wing stalls is to buffet; you pull G's to near the stall point and
               the airframe literally shakes, rattling your teeth. Flying the buffet to the
               max (the edge of the flight envelope) without departing the aircraft takes
               experience and guts. Each airframe buffets differently. Some, like the F-4
               Phantom, have a wide buffet range; you expect to be in heavy airframe buffet in
               every high-G tactical turn. You have to learn to distinguish the point of no
               return. Other airframes have a very narrow buffet range, meaning it comes on
               quickly immediately before the stall. In either case you need a well-trained
               stick hand. These guys spend lonely months at sea. Plenty of time to exercise
               their stick hand.

Bugout         As a fighter pilot, your mission is to a) win the dogfight, and b) live to
               fight another day. When "a" isn't working out, i.e., you're about to get hosed
               or you're running out of fuel, you turn your attention to "b". You need to "bug
               out," to get the hell out of town. The way you do it is your "bugout" maneuver.
               We leave that to you. (For the grammatically inclined, it's both a verb and
               noun, as you see.)

Burner         Short for Afterburner, which has altogether too many syllables.

Buster         Radio command to advance engine power to 100% basic engine, (i.e., "MRT"),
               without afterburner . When used by the flight leader: "Buster ... now" brings
               everyone in the flight to full power simultaneously. (The leader may then come
               back a percent or so as necessary to keep everyone onboard.) Used by an air
               controller it means proceed at maximum basic engine speed.

Button         A radio channel. No matter what the radio selector looks like, a preset channel
               is known as a "button." A flight leader will brief, "Primary frequency will be
               button five, back-up button four." A pilot at home may be heard to say, "Honey,
               you got the remote? Let's check the race on button eight."

Buy the        To get killed, preferably while flying. A lot of Navy pilots have been southern
    farm       farm boys. The modest government insurance money might pay off the farm
               mortgage; that is, buy the farm.

Cage           EyeballAttitude gyroTo an airman "caging" the gyro means resetting and spinning
 (your         up the artificial horizon (or "attitude") gyro instrument (there's usually a
eyeballs)      "push to cage" button) if the instrument goes crazy during sharp maneuvers,
               like aerobatics or a dogfight. Fighter aircraft, though, have gyros that can
               handle pretty much any maneuvers and recage themselves if they get confused. On
               a catapult shot from a carrier, the G force is such that your eyeballs (which
               look a lot like little attitude gyros) seem to get "uncaged" like they're just
               floating there. It takes the better part of a second after you're airborne
               before you can focus again. So the expression "cage your eyeballs!" means
               "focus!" or "pay attention." If you're coming out of a high-G turn where you've
               greyed out and had tunnel vision, it'll also take some milliseconds before your
               eyeballs cage up again.
                                         (Suggested by Ray Rivera.)

Canter         Radio term for "proceed at normal cruise speed." Not much used, since it's a
               default speed. But if the pilot has previously been given a "buster" command
               ("proceed at maximum basic engine setting") from the air controller, "canter"
               will tell him to resume cruise speed. A similar command is "saunter," meaning
               "use fuel conservation power regime."

CAP            Combat Air Patrol. The most common type of CAP is BarCAP (barrier CAP), in
               which a flight of fighters fly a pattern at an altitude, distance, and
               direction from the carrier task group that places the fighters between the task
               group and the threat. The CAP aircraft use their onboard radar to supplement
               the ship's radar in searching for bogeys. Other forms of CAP are TarCAP (target
               CAP) which involves flying fighter escort for a strike group and clearing enemy
               fighters at the target site; and ResCAP (rescue CAP), to suppress enemy
               activity and support SAR (search and rescue) efforts to extract downed aircrew
               from a combat zone. On board the carrier, if the degree of hazard from enemy
               activity is low   as in peace time   a "ready CAP" watch may be maintained on
               deck rather than airborne during non-flying hours. The degree of readiness can
               vary from "hot CAP," where the A/C on watch are manned on the catapults and
               plugged into the start carts, to a "30 minute CAP" watch where the pilots are
               in the ready room. (Every salty Navy fighter pilot has had the experience of
               sitting the hot CAP in miserable weather. It's a pretty lonely feeling,
               strapped in on the port cat on a dark night, the ship's bow regularly burying
               itself in the waves, alternating with the sea coming over the bow, rain and
               salt spray covering the cockpit. You're praying   increasingly toward the end
               of your 2-hour watch   not to hear the air boss' voice over the flight deck
               loudspeakers: "Launch the ready CAP!"  You know you'd never make it back aboard
               in this weather. . .)

CAVU           Weather "Clear And Visibility Unlimited." (Pronounced "cavoo".) Ideal flying
               weather.

Chaff          A World War II defense against radar that's still in use. It wasn't long after
               an effective ground-based anti-aircraft radar ("RAdio Detection And Ranging")
               was achieved by the Brits that some bright soul reasoned that since radar
               mainly detected metal, let's confuse it with irrelevant metal bits. The
               solution was (and is) to drop short strips of metal foil (i.e., "chaff") from
               the aircraft, which gives confusing or multiple returns on the radar operator's
               screen. It's still effective against radar-guided anti-aircraft missiles. The
               Brits, who were also first with perfecting this concept, called it "window",
               and that's still the not-so-secret code word for actuating the chaff.

Charlie        1. Charlie time: The precise scheduled time of an aircraft's arrival at the
               carrier (or airfield) for landing. If you're in a holding pattern, you may
               hear, "Your Charlie 14:45" (translation: Be at the break at a quarter to 3 pm),
               or "Your signal Charlie," meaning get in the landing pattern now. It's the
               flight leader's responsibility to get the flight to the carrier at Charlie, to
               avoid gaps in the landing pattern and a corrective talk with the skipper or the
               Air Boss. See also Final Charlie.
               2. The letter "C" in radio comm. And the letter C has a few meanings: In ship
               designations it stands for "Aircraft Carrier," which see. In aircraft
               designations it means "cargo or passenger A/C," as in "C-45" (the military
               version of the old "DC-3") or "C-130," the Hercules. In squadron designations
               it means "composite," as in VC-7. (The "C" of Composite is identical to the
               former "U" for "Utility," as in "VU-7," once the squadron name.) A composite
               (or utility) squadron flies various kinds of aircraft, carrying out duties such
               as ferrying A/C, flying as intercept bogeys, towing air-to-air gunnery targets
               (banners) etc.

Chevron        On the indexer lights, a high green chevron means your landing speed is slow
               (actually, your angle of attack is too high), while a low red chevron means
               you're too fast. A doughnut means your speed is just right. You'll understand
               this after you look at this indexer lights link, with illustration.

Chocks         The wood or steel blocks that keep the wheels (and the rest of the aircraft)
               from rolling when the a/c is parked. See "Pull chocks" for associated creative
               language.

Church         This code word was all you might hear if you asked about the outcome of a
               flight accident.  The simple meaning:  "There will be a memorial service."

Clean          Landing gear & hook up, flaps & slats retracted; A/C configured for high-speed
               flight. The way the airplane was meant to fly. Clean, not Dirty

Cockpit        A Pit for ... uh, a pilot.

Combat         A pre-engagement or patrolling formation by a section of two aircraft. In this
     spread    formation the two A/C fly abeam one another with several thousand feet of
               lateral separation. The point of the formation is both offensive and defensive.
               On offense, the lateral separation decreases the chance that an enemy aircraft
               will visually pick up both A/C, leading to a great advantage for the section.
               Also, for any engagement commenced by one of the section A/C the other will be
               in good position to maneuver to advantage. Defensively, the combat spread
               formation allows each A/C to check the other's six to a great distance, and in
               any attack on the section one A/C should come out of the first defensive turn
               with a good chance to pressure the attacker.

Compass        The simple, unpretentious magnetic wet compass, anomalous in the modern
               high-tech cockpit, is still the final directional back-up in case of failure of
               GPS, Inertial Navigation, electric Radio Magnetic Indicator or whatever else
               the pilot has available. And for its rare use it gets an inordinate amount of
               attention. The aircraft gets taxied to the Compass Rose (see below) from time
               to time to calibrate the error ("deviation") induced by metals and
               electromagnetic fields in the A/C. Once the compass has been calibrated, to
               find the True Heading from the Compass Heading the pilot or navigator simply
               adds or subtracts the Compass Deviation, which gives the correct Magnetic
               Heading, and then adds or subtracts the published Magnetic Variation at the
               specific point on the Earth where the aircraft is located. Voilà! You've
               arrived at the True Heading. Only, whether to add or subtract depends on
               whether the Magnetic Variation is "east" or "west" variation. A mnemonic is in
               order. Pilots use this to convert from True to Compass headings: "True Virgins
               Make Dull Company   Add Whiskey." Which means, going from True heading through
               Variation, Magnetic heading, and Deviation, to Compass heading, you add "West"
               variation (implying you would subtract "east" variation). The mnemonic for the
               opposite procedure, going from Compass heading to True heading, is the less
               flamboyant "Can Dead Men Vote Twice At Elections?" We'll leave the exercise to
               the reader.

Compass        A good-size circle with precise magnetic headings painted on the tarmac in a
     rose      lonely spot of the airfield, supposedly far from magnetic influences, used to
               calibrate the wet-compass. A J.O. is given the pleasure of taxiing an aircraft
               to the Compass Rose to "swing" the compass. As he lines up the A/C on various
               headings he reads off the indicated compass heading to the maintenance crew,
               who compile a table of compass deviations for the purpose outlined above under
               "Compass." Swinging the compass is hot work on a hot day (and it's cold work on
               a cold day...) and nobody's favorite job.

Con            A contrail (see below), or to leave a contrail behind the aircraft. A fighter
               pilot fears 'the cons' like the plague; his position there is visible for
               miles. A flight member will warn another if he's conning. A slight decrease in
               altitude is usually enough to get out of the cons.

Contrail       This trail of ice crystals forms behind the aircraft from water vapor emitted
               in the engine exhaust. Contrails form under certain conditions of temperature,
               pressure, and water content, usually at 30-some thousand feet. Climb high
               enough and you're out of 'the cons' (see above).

Course         So what's what? "Course, heading, bearing, track..."  It can be confusing.
               You're flying a track over the ground, and your present course is the direction
               (usually magnetic) of that track at the present moment. If there's no cross
               wind, your heading will be your course. If you're going directly to a
               stationary target, such as an airfield, your bearing to the target will be the
               same as the course to the target. But if your target is not stationary, such as
               another aircraft, your course toward an intercept will not be the same as the
               present bearing to the target (unless the target is on the same or opposite
               course). So there you have it. Course, heading, bearing, track. Plain and
               simple.

Crab           1. An airplane goes where it's pointed, except when there's a cross wind (which
               there almost always is, so the airplane hardly ever goes where it's pointed).
               In a cross wind you have to "crab"   to head (or point) partly into the wind  
               in order to get the course you want. Landing on the carrier, you essentially
               always have to crab to starboard, because you're not flying the same course as
               the ship is holding, since the angle deck is offset 10-12° to port. So even if
               the wind is straight down the angle deck the ship is continually slipping away
               to the right, and makes a 'virtual' relative wind. To fly the pass without a
               crab the wind would actually have to come from port relative to the angle deck;
               you'll grow old waiting for that day.
               2. (Constructed as plural: Crabs.) Damnable and persistent arachnid evidence
               that the naval aviator was not as morally upstanding as naval aviators are
               theoretically expected to be, in that last port of call.

Cross-         A nice tradition. Navy pilots need instrument training. You get instrument
   country     training by flying cross-country flights. You're stationed in San Diego, and
               the fresh Maine lobsters are in Maine. You "instrument train" on a hop to
               Maine. You bring back lobster for a squadron party. A nice tradition. And of
               course good instrument training.

Cross-over     The move a wingman makes to cross to the other side of the flight leader in a
               formation. The lead gives a hand signal by raising a fist toward the top of the
               canopy on the side where the wingman is flying. The wingman then reduces power
               to pull just aft of the lead, dips down a few feet, and crosses under - that's
               under, not over! the flight lead to the other side, then moves up and forward
               to take the proper position.

CRT            "Combat Rated Thrust" or "Maximum Thrust"   full power in afterburner. This is
               all you've got. You ain't got no more.

Cruise         1. Or "free cruise." A more relaxed flight formation than "Parade." Wingmen
               have somewhat more separation and are stepped back farther from the  flight
               lead, and fly on a more flexible gouge.
               2. Six to nine months at sea with all the comforts of Alcatraz prison.

Crusader       F-8C launching from Shangri-LaAh, the Crusader. Fighter pilot Nirvana. "The
   (F-8)       last of the gunfighters." One of those few airplanes that linger in the minds
               of its pilots for decades as the ultimate bird. Introduced in the US Navy in
               1957 to replace a bevy of subsonic fighters used by the US Navy (F9F Cougar, FJ
               Fury, F4D Skyray, F3H Demon, and F7U Cutlass), it immediately raised the bar.
               The first US Navy fighter to accelerate to supersonic speed in level flight,
               first production aircraft of any type to exceed 1000 miles per hour, the
               Crusader set a slew of time-to-altitude and speed records, including the
               coast-to-coast speed record   averaging supersonic speeds, including air
               refueling times   (with Major   later Astronaut/Senator   John Glenn, USMC, at
               the controls). Built by Chance-Vought (later "Vought," then "Ling-Temco-Vought"
               or LTV), the 'Sader (or 'Gator) was originally a pure day fighter, with limited
               radar and all-weather capability. In time the airplane was updated with
               longer-range target acquisition and mapping radar, a radar altimeter, and a
               more powerful Pratt & Whitney J57P20 engine. A unique feature of the Crusader
               was its variable incidence wing, mounted at the top of the fuselage, which was
               swivelled up 7° (from a hinge at the back end of the wing) for takeoff and
               landing in order to increase lift with a flatter fuselage attitude, allowing
               the pilot to see the landing area over the nose, and incidentally but
               importantly, to avoid scraping the tail. The Crusader (and this is written with
               a 'Sader driver's passion) was a near-perfect dogfighting platform, handling a
               high G environment smoothly. (OK, it could have used another 5K lbs of thrust,
               and you could wish for more warning of spin-outs, and its slow-speed handling
               characteristics ... well, it never cared for slow speeds. But it was one
               handlin' machine!) The US Navy retired the last active duty F-8 fighter in
               1976, the last F-8 reconnaissance bird in 1982, and the last reserve squadron
               F-8 in 1987. The French Navy finally retired the last Crusaders in active
               service anywhere in late 1999. In addition to the small pictorial tribute to
               the Crusader on this web site, check Dave "Fireball" Johnson's marvelous site
               and home page of the Crusader Association at www.f8crusader.org. (And don't
               look for other aircraft in this Guide. There aren't any.)

                Below is a small sample of the 'Sader at work. For more, enter "F-8 Crusader"
                                                 at YouTube.
                 (That's old friend Phil Wood preflighting   is he gonna throw that thing?)

                       embed(http://www.youtube.com/v/vixK1L1Vi0k&hl=en&fs=1&border=1)


Dead           Dead reckoning, DR for short, means, essentially, navigating without electronic
   reckoning   instruments. It is navigating by means of map, compass, and a watch, with some
               clue about your speed, and if you're flying, hopefully about the wind. Some
               skill at DR can save your life when the instruments fail, as they inevitably
               will if you fly long enough. How many times hasn't an aviator's wife said,
               "Honey, shouldn't we check a map?" only to hear, "We're fine, dear. I'll get us
               there by DR."

Deadstick      A "deadstick landing" is a landing with a dead engine. This works nicely in
               Cessna and Piper light planes and in the Space Shuttle, but forget it in a jet
               fighter. The basic problem is that your average fighter doesn't "glide." It
               falls. It has to do with "wing loading." The NATOPS manual says it's something
               you try if you're unable to abandon the aircraft. In other words, if this
               doesn't work you die. Usually this maneuver involves showing up right above the
               touchdown point of a runway at about 8,000 feet above ground level, then
               executing a precision power-off maneuver to a landing which you have never
               practiced, because NATOPS forbids practicing it. It doesn't help that you're on
               backup electrical power and partial instruments and flight controls. You don't
               do this if you can help it.

Debrief        The most critical part of the flight, even though you're back on Earth (or
               sea). You see, whatever happened up there didn't really happen until it's been
               said and admitted on the deck. If you were on an "air combat maneuvering"
               (dogfighting) training hop against another pilot, you never know how the flight
               will transmogrify in the Ready Room debriefing. Some of the squadron's other
               pilots will be listening. You're just going to have to outshout your opponent:
               "On my six, my ass! I Fox'ed you out of the first turn and you know it." And
               two entirely different version of the hassle get replayed, using the hands as
               aircraft. (Do see the link.)  Oh well. Not much has changed in this area since
               the first fighter flew.

Delta          1. The letter "D" in radio comm.
               2. "Delta pattern": An airborne holding pattern. If there's suddenly a fouled
               deck on the carrier, you may hear, "Your signal Delta." You proceed posthaste
               to the carrier's standard overhead holding pattern, where each squadron has its
               assigned altitude.
               3. A word needed to say "Delta Sierra," one of the most useful epithets in Navy
               lingo.

Depart         1.   The aircraft "departs" from controlled flight when it enters a spin or
               other out-of-control state. A departure most often happens in a high-G
               maneuvering environment, like a hassle, as a result of the wing stalling. (An
               aircraft can theoretically stall at any speed if the angle of attack is
               increased sufficiently by back pressure on the stick. But at high speeds you'd
               pull the wings off the A/C before stalling it.) Typically, pulling too much G
               at the slow-speed top end of a vertical maneuver (perhaps helped by a little
               rudder input to asymmetrize the wing lift), or too much G for the speed in a
               rolling maneuver, are favorite ways to lose control. At the moment of departure
               the A/C may snap rapidly out of control, or at slow speed may "wash" into the
               stall. A departure can be a serious business in swept-wing jets. Most don't
               just fly themselves out of the condition, but require positive pilot actions,
               like activating various combinations of drag chute, speed brakes, slats,
               droops, crossed stick and rudder input, etc. All this while the cockpit is
               behaving like a washing machine agitator. After a departure, it can easily
               require 5-10,000 feet of altitude loss to recover. Fighters also don't
               typically enter a neat predictable spin. They may enter flat spins, inverted
               spins, "falling leaf" maneuvers, and variations where both nose and wings
               gyrate unpredictably up and down through 180° or more. In other words, almost
               anything can happen. A departure is a high pucker factor moment.

               2.   A "departure" is of course also a published route to be followed after
               take-off from an airfield. These are often a pain-in-the-butt to a fighter
               pilot, because they make him fly slow and they prevent flathatting, both of
               which go against his grain. (Actually, just about any prohibition goes against
               a fighter pilot's grain.) The only authorized departure route suitable for a
               fighter pilot was a high-performance burn-out at NAS Miramar, San Diego (back
               when that was still "Fightertown USA"), briefly described as: Afterburner
               takeoff, stand the aircraft on its tailpipe, and disappear straight up.

Diamond        F-8 Crusaders of VF-11 in diamond formation One of the parade formations of
               four aircraft. Wingmen No.2 and 3 fly a parade wing on either side of the
               flight lead, while No.4 tucks just below and behind the lead's tail. It's
               especially exciting in single-engine A/C, where No.4 ("assman") is a few feet
               from the tailpipe of the lead. (Illustration credit: Michael Couture.)

Dirty          Landing configuration of the airplane. Everything's hanging out: Landing gear,
               flaps, slats, droops, hook (at sea), wing swept forward (F-14) or raised (F-8).
               Man, you're dressed to go slow. And you're just not Clean.

Ditch          Landing the aircraft on the water. Only thing is, jet fighters don't land on
               the water. They crash into the water. It's not pretty. It's deadly. As the
               NATOPS manual says, you do this if you're unable to abandon the aircraft. Call
               home base first, and they'll get a head start on arranging the memorial
               service.

Division       A flight of four aircraft flying as a unit. A division, under a division
               leader, may be part of a flight of several divisions, under a flight leader.
               The Division is divided in two Sections of two aircraft each, and in combat
               will normally operate as Sections.

Dogfight       A term not much used by naval aviators, who prefer "hassle." If the fight is
               described as a "dogfight," it was a real DOGFIGHT!

Doublenuts     [doublenuts]A Navy squadron's aircraft carry two-digit tail numbers. From 01 to
               however many there are, say 15, they also carry the names of the squadron
               pilots on the canopy rail, in seniority (or "rocket number") order, starting
               with the skipper on no.01. But in addition there's tail number "00", fondly
               called "Doublenuts." (I leave the etymology to the reader.)  Doublenuts carries
               the name of the Air Wing Commander (CAG). Actual flight assignments don't have
               much to do with the names painted on the A/C, though when CAG wants to fly a
               hop with your squadron it's considered good form to give him Doublenuts if it's
               available.  (VF-53 Doublenuts at right):

Doughnut       A "doughnut" on the indexer lights means you're on speed for landing. A "
               chevron" mean you're fast or slow. See the indexer lights link for explanation
               and illustration.

Down           An aircraft is "down" when it is not safely flyable. (Otherwise it is of course
     (status)  "Up.") Some criteria for down status are listed in the Navy's maintenance
               manuals (e.g., fuel pressure out of limits), others are more subjective (pilot
               reports: "the stick was sticking"). But some gripes are in the grey area. And
               there's conjuring involved: If the Skipper needs sorties to meet the squadron's
               quota, a Down A/C can magically become an Up A/C without any maintenance work
               at all.

Downtown       "Goin' downtown": An airstrike aiming for the center of the enemy's position,
               such as a capital city, where a warm welcome usually awaits. Fireworks and
               everything.

Downwind       In addition to the obvious (I hope) meaning of position and direction indicated
               by this term (we've all been downwind of something we'd rather not have been
               downwind of   the Jacksonville paper mill comes to mind), this has a special
               meaning in the landing pattern. There it means the "downwind leg" of the
               pattern, that is, the position where the aircraft is at about 600 feet above
               the touchdown point and about a nautical mile abeam, heading in the direction
               opposite the landing direction. (Heading downwind, that is, heading in the same
               direction as the wind.) You're ready to start your 180° turn toward the landing
               point, and when you get there you will of course be pointed upwind, i.e.,
               against the wind, prepared to land.

Drag           Drag is really a drag, it's your enemy as a fighter pilot. It prevents you from
               going faster. As you punch a hole in the air with your airplane, you're pushing
               molecules closer together than they like to be. Can't blame them for pushing
               back. Flying is always a battle between thrust and drag.

Echo           The letter "E" in radio comm. In aircraft designations, E stands for electronic
               countermeasures aircraft, such as the E3 Hawkeye, the EA-6 Intruder, and the
               EP-3 Orion. (Echo is otherwise sadly underutilized. There aren't any graphic
               expletives starting with E.)

Echelon        In formation flying, 3 or more aircraft in a straight line angled back from the
               flight lead. Like the right half of a flight of honkers. (Good illustration at
               "Blues".)

Eject          To activate the ejection seat to escape from the cockpit. The normal ejection
               handle is a "face curtain" at the top of the seat, which is pulled down over
               the pilot's face. An automatic sequence is started which jettisons the canopy
               and fires the rocket and/or explosive charge that powers the seat up the seat
               rails and out. The sequence continues with drogue chute, seat separation, and
               main chute deployment. (Where there's a flight crew of two, it gets trickier.
               Some recent a/c have an ejection capsule that essentially ejects the entire
               cockpit intact. But where 2 seats need to fire individually, they are sequenced
               so that the pilot's seat fires a fraction of a second after the other
               crewmember.) Modern ejection seats have a "zero/zero" capability: the pilot can
               successfully eject sitting still on the deck (zero elevation and zero
               airspeed). Pilots put a lot of trust in the guys in the Seat shop and
               "Parachute loft" who maintain the seats and maintain and pack the chutes, and
               usually take care to treat them well. A few bottles of 12 year old Chivas Regal
               may change hands after a successful ejection. Credit for saving thousands of
               lives through successful ejections goes to the hyper-reliable Martin-Baker
               company of England, which first developed ejection seats in the early 1940s,
               and has supplied most military needs globally since then, including essentially
               all U.S. seats.

Elevator       At least 3 important uses:
               1. A verb used by air controllers meaning "Change your altitude to", as in
               "Elevator angels Two Zero," meaning "Climb (or descend) to altitude 20,000
               feet."
               2. An elevator is also a flight control surface on the horizontal stabilizer,
               but not many fighters have distinct elevator surfaces any more. Most are
               designed with a "flying tail" (or "UHT"   unit horizontal tail) where the
               horizontal stabilizer moves as a unit to provide vertical control.
               3. And there are huge aircraft elevators on a carrier, that move a/c between
               the hangar deck and the flight deck.

Envelope       Tactical performance graphs show altitude and speed restrictions for an
               aircraft. Add drag index lines and G limits and you wind up with a graph with
               criss-crossing lines that resembles an envelope, which is what it's called by
               pilots: The Flight Envelope. When you fly the aircraft near its operational
               limits you're "pushing (the limits of) the envelope." Next time you hear
               someone other than a pilot use that term, remember: he/she has no idea what it
               means. Now you do.

Fan break      A fancy way for a 2- to 4-plane formation to execute the break when entering
               the landing pattern at a field or at the carrier. The effect is (or should be)
               the flight of four smoothly rolling into the break together and beautifully
               separating in the turn to the downwind leg. See the break link for more.

Feet dry       Flying over land.

Feet wet       Flying over water.

Fighter        [outof]What's a fighter? An aircraft with an "F" in its designator? Hardly. A
               fighter is an aircraft made for close-in fighting against another aircraft, and
               one that can fight. It's nimble, powerful, and fast. It lives to get to the
               enemy's 6, and it usually does. And to get the job done, it's got a fighter
               pilot trained for the job and the weapons to finish off the enemy. Back in a
               time that now is history (say the late 1960s), the quiet protest decal at the
               right was literally true. We, the last fighter pilots, were flying the last of
               the fighters, the incomparable F-8 Crusader. It was soon to be retired, and no
               further fighter aircraft were planned, the fighter pilots' skills were to be
               shelved and forgotten. Then the Viet Nam war happened and awoke the sleepy
               brass at the Pentagon. Entering the Viet Nam war may not have been the smartest
               thing this country has done, but it served to remind the Pentagon that you
               can't command airspace without fighters and fighter pilots. So today there are
               again good fighters in the inventory, and good fighter pilots to fly them. The
               beat goes on.

Finger Four    A balanced "parade" formation that looks like the four fingertips of your right
               hand (fingers straight & together, palm down): Flight lead ahead (middle
               finger); wingmen #2 on the left and #3 on the right equally spaced, and #4 on
               the right extending the line from the lead to #3.

Flame-out      When a jet engine quits, it "flames out," the fire is gone. A suspenseful
               situation, especially if you've only got one engine. All multi-engine aircraft
               are designed to fly safely with the loss of one engine. If you're multi-engine,
               you'll have bleed air and electrical power from the operating engines to help
               restart the quitter. If you're single engine you'll probably be extending the
               emergency RAT (Ram Air Turbine) package into the air stream to give electrical
               (and perhaps hydraulic) power. The aircraft's airspeed is counted on to turn
               the engine, and if you have fuel, this should do it. The usual causes of
               flame-out are compressor stalls, or slow-speed high throttle setting situations
               where the engine isn't getting enough air, or of course running out of fuel.

Flathatting    The time-honored practice of a pilot scaring the bejeebies out of innocent
               civilians on the ground by swooping as low and as fast as possible, preferably
               over an unsuspecting outdoor assembly, in an ad hoc individual air show. A
               popular target is always one's parents' farm. Less public, but still a lot of
               fun, is back-country flathatting, or terrain-avoidance flying. The occasional
               residence that pops up to be terrified adds satisfaction.
               On the other hand, the occasional powerline!...
               The origin of the term is uncertain, but it may have come from the threat of
               early barnstorming aerobatic pilots to flatten top hats among air show
               bystanders.

(A) Flight     While "a flight" may mean simply the event between a take-off and a landing, in
               this specialized meaning a flight is a coordinated unit of any number of
               aircraft flying under a single flight leader (see next entry), as in "the
               flight is approaching the break." Most operational flights of Navy fighters are
               flown as flights of two (a "section") or four (a "division") aircraft. Other
               types of Navy flights, e.g., anti-submarine (MAD) patrols, are commonly flown
               as a single a/c flights.

Flight Lead    Every Navy flight (see entry above) has a designated flight leader. The flight
               lead is normally the senior aviator in the flight. The lead calls the shots
               (literally and figuratively) in the air. Basta! See Wingman.

Flight Level   A kind of formalized definition of altitude, which see.  For some reason, the
               controllers of the FAA have a problem with aircraft reporting their altitude on
               the basis of their varying local barometric pressures.  The scenario of two
               aircraft assuming they're at different altitudes while actually being in the
               same piece of sky seems to bother them.  They clearly don't have the
               adventuresomeness of the naval aviator.  So to make the FAA (and similar
               world-wide air tyrants) happy, when we venture into space above 18,000 feet, we
               reset the altimeter to the barometric standard 29.92 inches of mercury, and we
               report our altitude as "Flight levels", which, to confuse everyone, is reported
               in 100's of feet!  Thus if we're at 24,000 feet (with a standardized altimeter)
               we're at "Flight Level 240".  That way everybody's altitude reporting is
               consistent, and airline passengers will live a lot longer.  Maybe that's worth
               the bother.

Flight Ops     "Flight operations", of course. For cyclic flight ops on the carrier, see "
               Cyclic Ops".

Flight suit    Pheeuu ... these things stand upright by themselves after a couple of weeks of
               sweaty flights aboard ship. You start with this neat, new, fireproof Nomex
               coverall, then gradually impregnate it with a variety of corporeal exudates.
               There's usually neither mother nor wife aboard ship to remind a young pilot to
               wash his flight suit, so after a few weeks of wearing it all day every day it
               more or less becomes one with him. Has anyone tested the fire resistance at
               this point? We doubt it; we've experienced flight suits where the BO itself was
               about at the flash point. During a cruise all the pilots descend together into
               a communal olfactory coma, where no one offends anybody anymore. What's the
               problem?

Fly-by-wire    An important flight control innovation at one time. Used to be that the stick
               was directly connected to the flight control surfaces (ailerons, elevators) by
               cables and pushrods   as in light planes even today. There was direct feedback
               to the stick from the aerodynamic forces on the flight surfaces. In the 1950s
               hydraulic lines replaced cables in flight controls. Feedback to the stick was
               lost, and was replaced by artificial "feedback" through variable spring
               tensions on the stick. The hydraulics were also much heavier, and more
               vulnerable to combat damage (it's easier to disable a 3000psi hydraulic line
               than a multi-strand steel cable). Therefore dual hydraulic systems became the
               norm, which were heavier still. In the 1970s, "fly-by-wire" became the new rage
               : though the flight surfaces might still be actuated by hydraulics, the
               connection from the stick was now strictly through electrical wiring to the
               actuators. Lots lighter; lighter even than steel cable, but vulnerable to
               disruption of the electrical system. The coming thing is "fly-by-light,"
               optical systems which are lighter yet than electronics and are not affected by
               electromagnetic disturbances.

Flying tail    No, no, no! Here you're already thinking this is another of a pilot's terms of
               endearment for a stewardess. Not at all. We're talking about horizontal flight
               members here. Hm, that didn't help ...
               Sometimes known as "UHT"   unit horizontal tail. Fighter a/c have largely
               abandoned the "elevator" flight control surface on the horizontal stabilizer,
               which provides vertical flight control, in favor of a solid horizontal
               stabilizer ("flying tail") that moves as a unit. Using the entire stabilizer as
               a control surface gives the potential for more rapid control response, but you
               pay for it in having to prevent overcontrolling. It may also increase the
               hazard in a runaway flight control problem.

FOD            (Rhymes with "god.") Originally "Foreign Object Damage" (to engines or
               airframes), now usually the redundant "Foreign Object Debris" (i.e., debris
               that can cause damage). Jet engine air intakes can have enormous suction, and
               are notorious for swallowing up whatever gets in their way, from sailors to
               birds to nuts and bolts left on the deck. Both ashore and aboard the carrier, a
               "FOD walkdown" of the flight line or flight deck is staged daily to pick up
               "FOD."

Formation      A flight of two or more aircraft are always flying in a defined formation. "
               Parade" formation (such as echelon, "finger four", or "diamond" is used to look
               good around the field or the public; Cruise (or "Free Cruise") formation is
               similar but more relaxed with more spacing, both laterally and fore-and-aft,
               between the A/C, and "Combat Spread" or "Loose deuce" and other formations may
               be used in combat, etc.

Fox            The radio call for firing a missile. (Duh...no, we don't call the enemy before
               firing a missile!) Used in training hops and debriefs. A useful verb in
               dogfight debriefs: "I fox'ed you out of the rolling scissors."

Foxtrot        1.  The letter "F" in radio comm.
               2.  In aircraft and squadron designations, F indicates "fighter." The F-4
               Phantom, F-8 Crusader, and F-14 Tomcat are examples. (The designation of the F/
               A-18 Hornet makes the claim of being both a fighter and attack aircraft.) In
               squadron designations, F is combined with "V" (meaning fixed-wing) to indicate
               fighter squadrons, for example, VF-51 and VF-53. Also commonly used in such
               quaint Navy sayings as "Foxtrot Uniform." (Of course this frequently fulsome
               fricative appears without its "foxtrot" garb in such universal acronyms as
               SNAFU and FUBAR ("FU Beyond All Recovery"), but such linguistic esoterica takes
               us far beyond our Navy focus.)

Furball        A dogfight with more a/c than you can keep track of, especially one in close
               quarters, reminiscent of a cartoon cat fight.

G (force)      From what I hear, gravity is everyone's enemy. Not least the fighter pilot's.
               We all normally experience a gravitational force of +1 G on the Earth. (The
               "plus" sign indicates "positive G," i.e., in a direction toward your feet. If
               no sign is shown, the positive direction is understood.) Fighter aircraft are
               designed to subject air crew to 6-9 times the force of gravity. This happens as
               the aircraft turns (the turn is always made in the plane of the wings   in
               other words the aircraft always pulls "up" from the perspective of the seated
               pilot). The tighter the turn, the higher the "G" loading. At +7 G   routine in
               today's fighters   a 200+ lb pilot (counting gear and helmet) weighs over 1500
               lbs. A lot of that weight compresses his spine, and he'll pay for it later in
               life. While flying, the air crew are kept from passing out or losing vision
               (see tunnel vision) at such G loads by wearing a G-suit which inflates air
               bladders around the lower torso and legs, physically restricting blood from
               draining from the brain and pooling in the lower body. The G-suit can add up to
               3 G to a pilot's G-tolerance, though of course it doesn't do anything about
               spinal damage. An aircraft can also experience "negative G" or "zero G," though
               they don't like it a lot. Nor would you.

Gaggle         [gaggle2]Pilots like this word, used for a large flight of aircraft, especially
               a seemingly disorganized one. Unfair to geese, really, who usually stay pretty
               organized.

               See also "Balbo."

Gate           A couple of good meanings:
               1. Radio call for afterburner. The flight lead's call to select A/B is: "Gates
               in   now." Deselecting burner: "Gates out   now." (See   it's useful if the
               whole flight comes in and out of burner together. It avoids having them spread
               over miles of airspace.)
               2. An approach pattern to an airfield or a carrier will often involve a "gate,"
               a defined point on a radial at a specified distance and elevation. The pilot or
               flight leader is responsible for bringing his aircraft or flight to the gate
               with the appropriate heading and airspeed. On a VFR approach to a carrier, for
               example, Approach Control ("Marshal") may ask the flight leader to "report the
               eight mile gate," at which point the flight may be switched to the tower ("
               Pri-fly") radio frequency.

Gator          An endearing name for our favorite aircraft and hero of this site, the
               always-hungry-for-blood F-8 Crusader.

Gear           This obviously can mean a lot of things, but in naval aviation the context
               usually determines whether it's the ship's Arresting gear or the aircraft's
               Landing gear that's meant.

Glide slope    (This term has little to do with gliding. For a jet fighter, a power-off
               "glide" is more like a fall.) Instead, this refers to the vertical angle of the
               final approach to landing. To provide a safe (who are we kidding?) hook-to-ramp
               clearance, Navy carriers use a fairly steep apparent glide slope: about 4°,
               though with the ship's movement taken into account the resulting angle is
               effectively about 3.5°, the same as at most land-based naval air fields. The
               mirror is the pilot's primary glide slope information in close.

Go             F-8 section go, John FitzgeraldOne of many meanings is "launch" (take-off). For
               example, the flight leader may brief: "It'll be a burner go," or "a section
               go...", meaning the take-off will be in afterburner, or it will be a section
               take-off. Or "a section burner go..." (Guess what that means.)

               Illustration of F-8 section go, courtesy John Fitzgerald.

Golf           The letter "G" in radio comm. (Also the aviator's favorite sport, since it only
               involves walking and can be practiced even if you're still faced from the night
               before.)

Grey-out       Under high G loads, as blood drains from the brain, the first effect noted is
               tunnel vision. If too high a G loading is maintained, and/or if your G-suit
               isn't functioning or gets unhooked, in addition to the tunnel effect the pilot
               will lose color vision   he will "grey out." This is a good time to relax the
               G's, because the next effect is black-out.

Gripe          An equipment/maintenance problem noted by the pilot on the "Gripe sheet" or
               "Yellow sheet". The pilot (or maintenance chief) determines whether the gripe
               is an "Up" gripe (meaning the A/C can still fly without fixing the gripe) or a
               "Down" gripe (meaning it can't). All Down gripes are supposed to be signed off
               (corrected or OK'd for flight) before the aircraft flies again. In the Crusader
               a few years ago, this meant that overstress cracks in the skin were circled
               with grease pencil by the maintenance crew and labeled "Crack." Then it was OK
               to fly. You gotta have faith.

Growl          A sound signal transmitted from the heat seeking Sidewinder missile's seeker
               head to the pilot's earphones, indicating the missile is sensing the target.
               (It really sounds like a warning sound from a major feline.) With a good solid
               growl, range in the 1/2 mile to a mile range, G-load and crossing angle within
               limits, you fire. (If you have all that you probably have a hit.) The growl, by
               the way, ceases when the 'Winder leaves the rail. After firing (just like a
               fired bullet   though the 'Winder's a lot smarter) the missile's on its own,
               and doesn't communicate.

Grumman        An endearing (sort of) name for the Grumman Aircraft Co., known for building
Iron Works     good and VERY SOLID (and very heavy) aircraft like the F-9F Panther/Cougar. On
               the other hand, they followed that with the lithe and elegant F-11 Tiger, so .
               . .

G-suit         At high speed an airplane can turn only one way: UP. To go left, you bank left
               and pull UP. So in every turn, there's upward angular momentum, or "centrifugal
               force," driving the pilot's body (and body fluids) down, down, down...   The
               angular momentum is measured in "G's," or multiples of the normal force of
               gravity ("1G"). In a tactical environment, a pilot will pull 6-9 G's for
               extended periods. Unprotected, this would lead to unconsciousness through blood
               draining from the brain to the lower extremities. Thus the "G-suit" (formally
               an "anti-G suit"). This piece of gear, worn over the flight suit from the waist
               down, is a tight-fitting system of air bladders covering the belly and the back
               and front of the calf and thigh. An air hose from the G-suit is hooked up to a
               cockpit bleed air valve. A G-sensitive valve meters air pressure in the G-suit
               proportional to the G forces on the aircraft. Higher G's, more pressure. The
               effect is simply, by pressure in the G-suit air bladders, to prevent the
               migration of blood to the lower torso and extremities   physically keeping the
               blood in the upper body, like the brain! Wearing a G-suit effectively increases
               G tolerance (meaning you don't lose consciousness) by as much as 3 G, and makes
               effective operation of modern fighters possible. (Should we admit here that
               there is no material or engineering restriction that would prevent an airplane
               from pulling 20 G's? The weak physical link is absolutely the pilot.)

Guard          "Guard channel." The emergency radio frequency   UHF 243.0 MHz   always
               monitored by Navy aircraft, no matter what primary frequency they're on. If you
               have an emergency you transmit it on Guard, and the world comes to help.

Gunfighter     1. Radio callsign of VF-124, NAS Miramar, with the proud history of being the
               fleet training squadron for the F-8 Crusader followed by the F-14 Tomcat, two
               great gunfighters.
               2. "Last of the Gunfighters": Slogan for the beloved F-8 Crusader, the Navy's
               top dogfighter with guns at a time when guns were thought pass  by Navy brass.
               (Let it be said that   while the slogan was appropriate for its time   even
               brass can learn, and guns are back on Navy fighters.)

Gunnery        Air-to-air gunnery. Now, there are only four really difficult things that a
               Naval Aviator must master, and this is one of them. (The others, needless to
               say, are carrier landings, swimming, and leaving out expletives in polite
               company.) Air-to-air gunnery practice is one of the most intricate and
               diabolical evolutions in naval air, and is a popular wash-out point in the jet
               pipeline of the aviator training program. In brief, it works about like this: A
               target "banner" (which see) is towed about 1200' behind a tow ("tractor")
               aircraft, which flies straight & level through the gunnery range at 20,000
               feet. The flight of 4 shooters enters a pattern around the tow a/c, where each
               shooter successively rolls in from a high "perch" about 7,000 above the target
               and 2 miles abeam. When the gunnery pattern is established, as "Viking 1," say,
               rolls in from the perch, Viking 2 is halfway up to the perch but ahead of #1
               (the pattern keeps moving forward at the tow a/c speed of 250 knots), #3 has
               completed the shooting run and is close abeam the tow a/c pulling up, and #4 is
               just commencing the tracking of the banner. (Get it? No? Student aviators don't
               either.) It has the appearance of a strictly choreographed aerial ballet, when
               it's done right. Which it sometimes is. All of this is not without hazard,
               especially for the tow pilot, but see at "banner" for that.

Gunsight       On modern   and not so modern   fighter aircraft, gunsight information is
               projected onto an angled glass plate in the pilot's field of vision as he looks
               straight ahead. While newer gunsights add radar lock-on information and greatly
               improve the accuracy of the sight, you don't always have a radar lock-on. Then
               you still have the classical non-radar gunsight, which is ingenious but simple
               in concept: It calculates lead based on G loading (which equates to rate of
               turn), altitude, airspeed, and bank, and shows the aim point as a floating "
               pipper", a small circle which is remarkably resistant to being placed on the
               target. All the pilot is responsible for is achieving steady-state tracking of
               the pipper on the target in the heart of the optimal firing range   say
               1200-1500 feet   (did I mention that this requires outfighting the opponent and
               getting on his tail?) and if he does everything right, has a fair chance of a
               hit.

Hand           A necessity in formation flying. In close section (two-plane) formations, hand
   signals     signals are usually used in preference to radio calls even if radio silence is
               not required. The lead will give the wingman specific hand signals for such
               actions as: Crossover, fall back to cruise formation, commence descent, turn
               left or right or level the wings, level off in a climb or descent, change radio
               channel or frequency and indicate specific channel or frequency, request and
               give fuel state, transfer the flight lead, and much more. It's surprising what
               can be done with just one hand. (All right, knock off the snickering there in
               the back row!) Even specific emergencies can be indicated by hand signals. If
               the wingman is back in a free cruise or other loose position, the leader will
               rock his wings to indicate join-up in parade formation. Some signals, like add
               or reduce power, or select afterburner, are given by head signals, so see that.
               (By the way, the way numbers are indicated is simple and practical, and
               deserves wider use. Numbers 1-5 are indicated as usual with 1-5 fingers of one
               hand held vertically (be sure to start with the index). But since the pilot
               generally only has one hand available for signalling, numbers 6-9 are indicated
               by one through four fingers held horizontally, pointing forward. That is, to
               the number of horizontal fingers you add 5 to get the meaning. (Still not
               clear? You see, a seven is two fingers held horizontally...) Ten is indicated
               as two digits: a 1 followed by a closed fist indicating zero.) Hand signals are
               also used between the pilot and plane captain when starting the A/C and running
               post-start checks, by the Yellowshirt (flight deck director) to move the
               aircraft before launch or after an arrested landing, and by the cat officer to
               actually launch the aircraft.

Hangar         You know what this is, right?  It is, of course, the big open building ashore
               where maintenance is done on the aircraft, and where the flight squadrons have
               their spaces: offices, ready room, etc.  But did you know how to spell it? 
               It's not a "hanger"!  And did you know that it comes from a northern French
               dialect, where it means "cattle pen"?  Nuff sed. (The aircraft carrier analog
               to the hangar is the hangar deck.)

Hassle         Noun and verb: A "dogfight," a tactical engagement with other aircraft. Near
               synonyms: "ACM" and Tactics. "Hassling" is the fighter pilot's bread and
               butter. It's all about getting on the other guy's six. Some years from now,
               when all weapons are launched remotely, pilots with the fighter spirit will
               still go up and hassle.

Heading        This is really too easy. It's just the (usually magnetic) direction that the
               aircraft is pointed. The only reason to include this is to point out that a
               heading is not a bearing, nor a course, of course. In case you thought it was.
               If you're flying to someplace that bears, say, 080° from your position, a
               heading of 080 will only get you there if there's no wind. If there's a wind,
               as there usually is, you have to crab into the wind   take a heading to split
               the difference, so to speak. See, it's a matter of vector geometry. Or
               something.

Head signals   When a flight is flying in close formation, the leader gives hand or head
               signals to his wingmen before every change of flight regime. Some hand signals
               are described above. But certain signals are given by head nods: "Adding power"
               is signaled by the flight lead's head nodding forward (he could also be falling
               asleep), followed immediately by the throttle movement. "Reducing power" is
               signaled by the head in a backward motion (and here, of course, he might be
               waking up again). A turn to the right (or left) is signaled by the leader's
               head making repeated motions to the right (or left). "Select Afterburner" is
               shown by a preparatory head move to the right, and then a quick head "slam" to
               the left. There's a combined hand & head signal for extending the speed brakes
               ("boards"): first the lead's hand makes a preparatory duck-quacking motion (to
               mimic the boards coming out), then a forward nod of the head says, put the
               boards out. If you miss the lead's signal you (as wingman) will go sailing by
               the leader, unable to keep the formation in order. [A personal protest: I
               always thought, as a wingman, that I ought to be able to signal back, say to
               debate the order. But alas, there's no signal for that. Well, there's one, but
               it's impolite.]

Holding        Unlike helicopters, fixed-wing aircraft can't just park in space. When there's
   pattern     a need to wait   as for a ready deck on the carrier   aircraft will be sent to
               an assigned holding pattern. A multi-plane flight will hold together, usually
               flying a loose cruise formation. A holding pattern will often be defined by a
               point in space, given as an altitude and mileage on a TACAN radial from the
               carrier (see also "Marshal"). Each flight will get its unique holding point.
               The flight lead will hit the holding point going inbound on the radial, then
               commence a standard rate left turn for 180 degrees and head outbound for some
               miles, depending on the expected hold time. Turn again and repeat. In a holding
               pattern, fuel state is usually a concern; therefore the flight lead is eager to
               know his expected Charlie time, so he can plan his pattern. Aircraft use more
               fuel when in a bank, but level flight takes them farther from the carrier. In
               VFR conditions around the carrier, a fouled deck will send aircraft already in
               the landing pattern up into a holding pattern centered on the carrier, at
               predetermined altitudes. See "Delta."

Hood           More generally "The Bag": The "Instrument Hood," a devilish device meant to
               confound pilots-in-training. It's simply a curtain fitted to the interior of
               the canopy that pulls over the student pilot (in the back seat of a two-seat
               tandem aircraft) so he cannot see out of the cockpit. The instructor will carry
               out the take-off, then turn the flight controls over to the hapless student who
               is overwhelmed by the idea of flying the airplane on instruments alone. Doesn't
               sound like much to a seasoned pilot, but the average student pilot fears flying
               under the hood like the plague. A common cause of "D.O.R."

Hosed          Only one meaning for a fighter pilot, and as so often, grammar is everything.
               It's all about "active" or "passive". (I mean, look at the verb form! It's
               either imperfectum active, or past participle, isn't it! Fighter pilots have to
               keep this sort of thing in mind at all times. It isn't easy!)  Anyway, if
               you've been hosed (this is the past participle), you've been peppered from
               behind with 20mm Vulcan cannon shot, and your dear airplane is on its way down
               with you in it. If, on the other hand, you just hosed the enemy, you've shot
               your load and he's on his way down.

Hot            Apart from their usual meanings, these terms refer to the state of aircraft
   (& Cold)    armaments or a weapons range. At the bombing range, pilots may hear "The range
               is Cold," meaning no ordnance may be dropped. When the range is ready, the
               range master will transmit "The range is Hot," and the flight lead will order
               armament switches on. The radio call "Gruesome 4 is in Hot" confirms armament
               switches on as this wingman rolls into a bomb run.

Hot CAP        "Hot Combat Air Patrol."  (Rather a "deck" patrol than an "air" patrol.) See "
               CAP".

Hotel          The letter "H" in radio comm. In aircraft, carrier, and squadron designations
               it means Helicopter, as opposed to the letter "V" for fixed-wing aircraft. But
               its greatest utility is in such useful phrases as "Sierra Hotel."

HUD            In modern fighters, the Heads-Up Display, that magical evolution of the old
               gunsight. In looking directly ahead, the pilot looks through an angled glass
               plate on which is projected not only gunsight info but pretty much all the info
               he needs to fly and fight the aircraft: speed, altitude, G loadings, engine
               performance, radar contacts, etc. In earlier days you had to look down on the
               instrument panel for all that. So it frees the pilot to keep his eyes out of
               the cockpit, but it's a monster to master   the pilot has to learn to manage
               potential information overload by filtering out what's not needed at the
               moment.

Hurrevac       Here's some military shorthand that seems to make sense. Odd that it isn't much
               used elsewhere. When a hurricane threatens a Navy airfield, a "hurrevac"
               exercise (or "evolution" as the Navy would call it) springs into action. It
               basically consists of flying all the aircraft to a safe air base, early
               evacuation by ground of everything that needs to be evacuated, and closing
               everything else up tight. Of course, the military has several obvious
               advantages over the civilian world in this type of exercise: they're organized,
               they're using our money and they still get paid, no matter what.

Hypoxia        Spooky and insidious stuff. A lowering of oxygen partial pressure in the lungs,
               blood, and brain from breathing high altitude air, as in case of cockpit
               pressurization failure and/or oxygen mask failure. Blues your nails, makes you
               tingle, puts you to sleep PDQ, kills you in the subsequent crash. (This can
               happen to mountaineers and air passengers just as easily as to pilots. The
               best-remembered case may be the death of golfer Payne Stewart and his party a
               few years ago when their bizjet lost pressurization and flew for hours on
               autopilot, with crew and passengers passed out, before crashing into a
               mountain.)

IFF            The formal name for what's commonly known as a "Transponder". In typical DOD
               bureaucratese, the letters stand for "Identification - Friend or Foe". A black
               box ID transmitter (now used on both military and civilian aircraft) that
               transmits a pilot-selectable code to verify the A/C ID to radar controllers. Of
               course, it verifies your ID to the enemy, too. So in a real war you just forget
               about it and turn it off. (See also "squawk".)

IFR            1. Instrument Flight Rules. The FAA is now requiring IFR flight almost
               everywhere. Also an assessment of the flying conditions: "The weather is junk,
               it's IFR." Contrast VFR.
               2."In-Flight Refueling. Tricky stuff requiring a lot of practice." Check at "
               Plug" and "Probe".

Inboard /      Not boat engines, but the location of something relative to the centerline of
  Outboard     the ship or the aircraft. Or the centerline of the pilot. Such as, Did I put my
               shades in the outboard or inboard pocket of my flight suit? (Naturally this
               transfers to civilian life. In teaching his daughter to drive, dad will of
               course say, "Remember, Jane, for 1st gear you pull the stick inboard, for 5th
               gear push it outboard.")

Indexer        indexer lightsNavy jets use the aircraft's "angle of attack" rather than
   lights      airspeed for the proper landing attitude. But when you're flying the meatball
               to a carrier landing you can't be looking in the cockpit at the 'AoA'
               indicator. Fortunately, some brilliant engineer came up with the indexer
               lights, a "heads-up display" above the instrument panel, in the pilot's field
               of vision as he looks at the ball through the front left portion of the
               windscreen. (The indexers are actuated when the landing gear is extended.) This
               vertical row of shaped lights indicates "on-speed" (that is, on proper AoA) by
               the center orange "doughnut" light, "slow" by the top green "chevron," and
               "fast" by the bottom "red" chevron. The doughnut may light together with either
               chevron to indicate the regime between "on-speed" and fast or slow. The pilot
               sees the display peripherally, and reacts instantly to the color changes. (The
               illustration is from a mock-up of an F/A-18F Super Hornet. The appearence of
               all the lights lit simultaneously doesn't occur in real life.) The indexers are
               repeated as colored lights on the exterior front of the aircraft, so the LSO
               can better judge the aircraft's speed.

Instrument     A version of "parade" flight formation used specifically for instrument flying.
   Parade      When there's no visible horizon, a wingman on the outside of a turn in a parade
               formation can't rotate on his own axis and hold a position horizontal to the
               flight lead, because there's no way to know what's horizontal. So under such
               conditions (at night, or in the soup), a wingman on the outside of a turn must
               rotate on the axis of the flight lead, which means riding up and keeping the
               same visual "gouge" on the leader. When you're flying formation as a wingman
               through the soup or a black-ass night, you'll have no idea whether you're level
               or in a turn. And that's the idea. You just hang on.

Jink           A flying butterfly is hard to catch, because it constantly jinks. Jinking is a
               standard flying technique for evading anti-aircraft ground fire. The idea is to
               rapidly and unpredictably jerk the aircraft in changing directions, to
               frustrate the gunners. (You still need to progress on your basic heading, if
               you're going to a target.)

Join-up        One aircraft joining another in formation. Typical for a pre-planned join-up is
               that the lead is in a standard port turn, while the joining A/C cuts to the
               inside of the turn, gradually approaching on a collision course from the port
               quarter. In close the joining A/C slows the rate of closure, ensures vertical
               separation, and crosses under the lead to the outside of the turn, often to a
               cruise position. A more ad hoc join-up may occur if you've been vectored in to
               pick up another A/C who has a radio or electrical failure, and needs help to
               get safely back to the deck. You would approach from the inside of the NORDO's
               turn, or on his port wing if he's straight and level, using hand signals to
               take the lead, then standard NATOPS procedures to a landing.

"Judy"         On a radar intercept, the pilot or radar operator calls "Judy" when they have a
               lock on the bogey and are taking control of the intercept from the ground
               controller.

Juliet         The letter "J" in radio comm. Used in designating high altitude jet airways in
               the U.S., e.g., J-22, distinguishing these from lower altitude airways
               designated by the letter V, e.g., V-20.

Kilo           The letter "K" in radio comm. Sometimes used in the unflattering appellation
               Kilo-Alpha, a kiss-ass. Yeah, they're in the Navy, too.

Kiss off       Not at all an offensive remark. When a flight leader wants his wingman to
               depart the formation for some pre-briefed task, he will indicate that with a
               hand signal: Fingertips to lips (oxygen mask, actually), then "blow a kiss" to
               the wingman. The briefing might go, "After join-up, signal your state [fuel
               level] and I'll kiss you off to contact Approach."

Kneeboard      Ought to be called a "thighboard," perhaps, this little notepad that
               you have strapped around your thigh, with emergency procedures and
               all kinds of good information on it. You've written down the
               outlines of the flight brief, with call sign, your aircraft number,  Kneeboard
               radio frequencies to be used, and perhaps rendezvous points and
               marshal times. (In a war zone, of course you don't write down any of
               this.) A red light illuminates the kneeboard.

Knot           A knot is a measure of speed. One knot is one nautical mile per hour. (If you
               thought a knot had something to do with ropes, you're right. Ancient sailing
               ships measured speed with a 'log-line' divided by knots into parts equaling 1/
               120 of a nautical mile (about 50 feet). The log-line was passed into the water,
               and the ship's passage of the line would be timed. Since a half minute is also
               1/120 of an hour, a ship passing from one knot to the next in a half minute
               would be going at a speed of one nautical mile per hour, or one knot.)

Landing        The wheels, struts, shocks and actuators of the "Main gear" and the "Nose
   gear        gear." Modern carrier aircraft use a "tricycle" landing gear system, with a
               nose wheel (or two) and two main "mounts." One of the most critical systems on
               the aircraft: failure in the landing gear system is one of the most common
               causes of landing accidents. And the most common failure is pilot-induced: A
               three-point landing, which see.

Landing        See "Pattern".
    pattern

Lift           In order of importance to the naval aviator, this means:
               1. What a Maidenform does for feminine charm;
               2. The mystical force that keeps an aircraft airborne. It works like this: When
               straight and level it keeps you up, in a bank it makes you turn, and when
               you're upside down it makes the stick work backwards. Of course this is pure
               magic, but engineers won't admit it.

Lima           The letter "L" in radio comm. (Pronounced like the Peruvian capital, not like
               the bean.)

Loose deuce    In two-on-one fighter combat, a flexible tactical formation that maximizes the
               section's advantage over the single bandit. While friendly "A" pressures the
               enemy, restricting his defensive options, "B" is free to use the vertical plane
               (in a way that he could not in a one-on-one situation) to position himself for
               an advantage. As he comes in, having gained angle on the enemy, "A" comes off,
               and is in turn free to work out of the plane of the fight to gain further
               angle. As the section aircraft relieve each other in a series of attacks, the
               bandit is never free to break off, and the section gradually gains advantage
               toward the bad guy's six, to be positioned for a shot. At least that's how it's
               supposed to work. (Of course, with new weaponry that can be shot in any
               direction from the fighter, you can forget all this; the fighter doesn't have
               to turn at all, and fighter-piloting becomes a quaint historical footnote.)

LOX            Sounds like the salmon dish, but isn't. It's Liquid Oxygen, an explosive gas
               carried in the aircraft in a small, highly pressurized, LOX container. Navy
               fighter pilots breathe 100% oxygen (in the gaseous form, you understand) under
               pressure at all times while airborne. Usually that works out well, but for
               various ways to kill yourself if you tend toward stupidity see "Oxygen mask."

Lufbery        A stand-off between two fighters that are turning horizontally nose to tail in
    (circle)   the same direction. If the flight characteristics of the two A/C are roughly
               equal, one may not be able to gain an advantage over the other. The Lufbery
               becomes as much defensive as offensive, and the circle can go on forever. Well,
               not really. Since it's hard to rendezvous with a tanker for in-flight refueling
               while you're in a 7 G turn, somebody will run out of gas. Or get bored, or need
               a nap. Being the first to break out of the Lufbery is usually not a good thing.
               You can't just fly off, or the enemy will be on your tail. So you try some
               purposeful maneuver, depending on whether you want to go home or fight on: If
               you have good power and slow-speed characteristics you can go nose high, which
               can make the enemy overshoot unless he joins you in a slow-speed fight; you can
               "split-S" or "high-G barrel roll" underneath if you have sufficient altitude  
               turning the fight in the vertical plane. You can run into the sun (this may
               confuse the opponent's eyes and heat-seeking missiles, but not his radar
               missiles), head into a cloud cover, or dive for the deck and run for home in
               the ground clutter. Ignominious, but if you're out of fuel... (Named after an
               American WWI pilot.)

Macadam        See "Tarmac."

Mach           The speed of sound in a given medium is known as mach 1 in that medium, after
               the physisict Ernst Mach. Speeds greater than mach 1 are supersonic. In dry air
               at sea level at 32° F, mach one is about 742 mph, or 645 knots. At higher
               altitudes the speed of sound drops off considerably because of less dense air.
               The mach number is often used in aviation in preference to airspeed, especially
               at higher altitudes and speeds, because in those regimes it relates better to
               the aircraft's performance. The aircraft's speed gages read out both airspeed
               and mach number.

MAD            [magnetic]"Magnetic Anomaly Detection." MAD gear is the heart and soul of
               anti-submarine reconnaisance. This ingenious gear is carried in a "MAD boom" at
               the tail end of dedicated US Navy ASW (anti-submarine warfare) aircraft, such
               as Lockheed's classic P-2 Neptune and their still-flying-after-50-years P-3
               Orion. The gear measures tiny deviations from the expected magnetic field in
               the sea below, indicating the presence of a large metal body. (Parenthetically,
               the Navy P-2 Neptune's MAD surveys made great contributions to geology in the
               1960s: While surveying the magnetic sea bed environment south of Iceland, US
               Navy scientists discovered proof of symmetrical magnetic reversals on each side
               of the mid-Atlantic ridge. This proved both the Earth's history of frequent
               magnetic reversals   the North and South poles flipping   and the theory of
               plate tectonics or "continental drift," by showing that the ocean bottom had
               spread   and is still spreading   from the mid-ocean ridge.)

Maximum        See CRT for the synomymous "Combat Rated Thrust."
    thrust

"Mayday"       The international radio emergency call for aircraft in distress, equivalent to
               the SOS of Morse code. (Speaking of distress, that's probably the French
               reaction to this call, which is an anglicizing of the French m'aidez   "help
               me." And we know how the French love anglicizations of the sacred tongue.)

Midair         You just need the one word to say "midair collision."

MiG-Master     Name fondly applied to the US Navy's F-8 Crusader, which had the
               highest kill ratio against the Soviet bloc "MiG" (Mikoyan-Gurevich)  Migmaster
               fighters of any US Navy aircraft in the Viet Nam war. Braggadocious
               decal shown:

Mike           1. The letter "M" in radio comm.  2. The microphone.  3. Used in "Twenty
               mike-mike," for 20 mm gun ammo. 4. Your buddy Michael.

Mike-click     Instead of a "Roger" over the air, a quick double click of the microphone
               button is the usual acknowledgement of a routine flight leader's instruction.
               The sound is that "Kh-kh" "static"-sounding thing you can make with the the
               back corner of your mouth. (If you can't make it, I can come and demonstrate,
               but I don't come cheap.)

Military       Or "Military Rated Thrust." Not a uniformed sexual practice, though it does
    thrust     relate to performance. See "MRT."

MLP            "Mirror Landing Practice", or Field MLP (FMLP). Practice for carrier landings,
               using the "Mirror." To hit the precise spot on the flight deck, Navy pilots
               don't flare to ease the rate of descent before touchdown, but drive the
               aircraft into the deck at a constant glideslope, usually 3½-4°. The touchdown
               is very hard, at a rate of descent of about 13 feet per second in the
               fast-landing Crusader (like sitting in a chair being dropped from 6 feet up -
               this is not good for the spine), slightly less in newer aircraft that land
               slower. (So the older pilot's bad back is not just from the several hundred
               carrier landings; it's also from the several thousand carrier-style landings
               ashore.) Carrier landings are extremely difficult, and MLP is to the Navy pilot
               what scales are to a piano student. Just as much fun.

Model          The first version of a military aicraft to be delivered is normally known as
               model "A", as in F-14A. It's almost always a compromise, because some of the
               100 or more manufacturers of components will always be behind schedule, so
               nearly-as-good components are put in in their place in the first version of the
               aircraft. The F-14, F-18, and F-111 are some of many examples where the desired
               engine was not ready for the first model. Thus, the "B" model is generally an
               improvement, but then you run into the desire of component manufacturers to
               develop and sell "improved" versions, as well as the Washington procurement
               brass who love the word "upgrade," and ... but see the entry at "Radome".

Morse code     Navy pilots are still required to learn Morse code, which has some
               entertainment value, if nothing else. The theory is that when you're hopelessly
               lost and have no communication equipment except perhaps you can pick up the
               dots and dashes from a TACAN or ADF station, you'll be able to identify the
               station by its Morse code call letters and aim for it if that seems like a good
               idea. Not very useful for that purpose, but knowing the stuff always seems to
               impress girls. I still remember, in Pre-flite, introducing myself as
               Dit-dah-di-dit  Di-dit  Dit-dah-di-dit  Dit-dah-di-dit  Dit  Dah-di-di-dit 
               Dah-dah-dah. Catchy, eh?

Mount          The landing gear, the wheels and struts. Fighter aircraft have a left and a
               right main mount, and a nose gear. If you're out driving with your hubby, the
               former ace Navy pilot, and he says "Drat it, honey, I've got a vibration in the
               port main mount!", you'll know he's bitchin' about the left rear wheel. If it
               were a front wheel he might say, say, "the starboard nose gear."

MRT            "Military Rated Thrust"   100% power in basic engine. See "CRT."

NATOPS         (Pronounced nay-tops) "Naval Air Training and Operational Procedures
               Standardization." The NATOPS manual is the Navy pilot's bible. One of its great
               achievements is standardizing procedures to the degree that any Navy or Marine
               pilot in any aircraft can join up with another in an emergency situation, and
               through use of visual signals and understood procedures, guide a disabled
               aircraft to a safe landing or ejection and rescue. (See also "S.O.P."). Navy
               pilots drill daily on NATOPS emergency procedures, though of course they
               exercise their right to grouse about it.

Nautical       All aviation and ship activities measure distance in nautical miles. A nautical
    mile       mile is about 15% longer than a statute mile (6,076 feet). There's a good
               reason for using the nautical miles in navigation: It works neatly because it
               equals one minute of arc of a nominal great circle, such as a meridian. Thus,
               one degree of latitude along a meridian equals 60 nautical miles. (90 degrees,
               the distance from the equator to the pole, is therefore 60x90=5400 nautical
               miles, and the Earth's circumference is 60x360=21,600 nautical miles   which is
               about 25,000 statute miles.) One nautical mile per hour is a speed of one knot.

Negative G     The usual force of gravity on Earth, as well as in an airplane, is one
               "positive" G   acting toward the Earth or toward your feet. If you stand on
               your head you're experiencing "one negative G." If you flip your aircraft over
               in flight and fly level upside down you're also experiencing one negative G.
               Most airplanes (and almost all pilots) don't much care for flying in a negative
               G environment. As the pilot you're hanging in the seat harness, with your
               helmet up against the cockpit canopy and your butt off the seat. For the
               airplane, the fuel pick-up system must be designed to pick up fuel sloshing
               around on the top of the fuel tank. More of a challenge is designing the
               airframe to withstand negative G stresses. Generally, the designers count on
               the pilots' preference for the positive G environment, so airframes that may
               have a positive G limit of +9 G will not be stressed for more than perhaps -3
               (negative) G. And in-between, of course, there's zero G.

The Ninety     In a standard VFR landing pattern at the carrier or an air field, the point
               where the aircraft has 90° of turn left before rolling out in the groove for
               final approach. The normal altitude at this point will be about 450 feet above
               touchdown.

No joy         "I don't see it." A radio reply to indicate that you don't have visual contact
               with whatever you're being asked about. The opposite of Tally-ho.

NORDO or       An aircraft that has inoperable communication gear. Help usually swings into
NORAD          action in the form of another aircraft of the same type who will lead the NORDO
               to a safe approach and landing, depending on standard hand signals for
               communication.

Notam          "Notice to airmen." A time- and area-specific notice issued by civilian or
               military aviation authorities, often related to flight restrictions, runway
               closures, or other matters of immediate concern to pilots. If you fly, you'd
               better be familiar with the current Notams.

November       The letter "N" in radio comm. "N" may be added to ship designations to indicate
               nuclear power, e.g., CVAN-65, the aircraft carrier USS Enterprise (though
               lately the "N" has disappeared from carrier designations, since ... who isn't
               nuclear anymore?).

o'clock        Pilots refer to relative direction by a clock code: 12 o'clock is straight
               ahead, 3 o'clock is due right, etc. Six is special. Fighter pilots have a
               phobia about their six.

One-eighty     In the VFR landing pattern, the position downwind (i.e., flying opposite the
               landing direction, the runway or carrier about a mile to port), abeam the
               touchdown point on the runway or carrier, having "dirtied" the aircraft, where
               the pilot traditionally calls the tower (ashore only): "Tower, Gruesome 5, 180,
               gear down," and receives clearance to land. Altitude about 600 feet AGL (above
               ground level).

Ops            Simply "Operations", usually flight ops to the aviator. Aboard the carrier, ops
               normally means "cyclic ops".

Oscar          The letter "O" in radio comm.

Out            Ends a radio transmission (or decisive comment to family member) when no
               response is expected or needed. You don't respond to an "out" unless there's a
               clear need. And by the way: It's never "Over and Out." It's either "over" or
               "out", no matter what you hear in old movies.

Outboard       Pretty much the opposite of "inboard", which see.

Over           Ends your own radio transmission and signals that you're expecting a reply. (If
               you're dating an aviator, don't be nonplussed if an "over" sneaks into the
               conversation here and there. It just means he wants to hear your voice.)
               Compare Out.

Oxygen         Fighter pilots breathe 100% oxygen at all times while airborne. It makes them
    mask       smarter, and God knows they . . . well, who couldn't use a little extra, I ask
               you? The oxygen mask contains a microphone. It takes some getting used to,
               talking against the positive pressure of the O[2] flow. You literally have to
               exhale against the pressure while talking. Removing your oxygen mask in the air
               for comfort is frowned on, but is not uncommon among less brilliant aviators.
               (And isnt' it exactly they who need that little extra?) Removing it at high
               altitude will result in hypoxia, a fatal "high". Removing it to light a cig is
               stupid, but not unknown among said less brilliant aviators. Forgetting to turn
               off the O[2] flow while you do this is apt to be fatal, and creates candidates
               for the Darwin award. (Like racing drivers and mountain climbers, the fighter
               pilot gene pool tends to be self-cleaning.) The drawback is, these clowns
               usually take a perfectly good airplane with them when they go. Oxygen is stored
               onboard as liquid oxygen, for that see "LOX."

Papa           The letter "P" in radio comm. Used to designate Patrol aircraft, such as the
               anti-sub patrol aircraft P-2 Neptune and P-3 Orion. The squadrons that fly
               these have "VP" designations (the "V" is for fixed-wing A/C). Many Navy
               photo-birds carry the tail letters "Papa Papa."

Parade         F-8 Crusaders on parade.jpg A tight flight formation used when in the public
               eye. Looks S.H. Parade formation can be either Echelon, Finger Four, or Diamond
               formations. The wingmen are in close and tucked up tight, often with
               overlapping wingtips. A tiring exercise requiring extreme concentration by
               wingmen, as they need to keep their eyes focused on the flight leader. A
               wingman cannot look forward or in the cockpit while flying a parade formation,
               and has literally no idea where he's going. A feature of parade formation is
               that a wingman on the inside of a turn (i.e., to the left of the flight leader
               in a left-hand turn in a "balanced/finger four" or "diamond" formation) rotates
               down around the axis of the lead A/C, thus keeping the same visual gouge on the
               leader, while wingmen on the outside of the turn pivot on their own axes,
               staying horizontal with respect to the flight lead. A version of this formation
               ("Instrument parade)" is a bit different, and is used to bring a formation
               (usually just one wingman) down through the soup to a landing, a vertigo
               -inducing experience. (In the illustration of a section of F-8s, the wingman is
               a little acute.)

Perch          In the air-to-air gunnery practice pattern, the position about 10,000 feet to
               the side and 7,000 feet above the target aircraft, where the shooter starts his
               shoting run. By extension, in air combat (or romance) an advantageous position
               where you're set up to roll in for the kill.

Pickle         The bomb release button on the stick. "To pickle" is to release the selected
               bomb load. (If you have a twitch in your right thumb you probably shouldn't be
               flying a loaded aircraft.)

Pigeons        Directions to whatever, usually given as a bearing (in degrees magnetic) and
               distance (in nautical miles) to whatever, like "Pigeons 080 at 250." No doubt
               derived from the enviable talents of the homing pigeon.

P.I.O.         Pilot Induced Oscillation. The student pilot really learns about this when
               practicing formation flying. It's the nature of flying that a fraction of a
               second elapses after moving a flight control surface, like an aileron or
               elevator, before the change takes effect and the aircraft actually changes
               direction or elevation. (At higher elevations and/or slower speeds this delay
               is magnified.) So the student pilot, seeing himself go a foot or two high in
               relation to his flight leader, puts in slight forward stick. In a tenth of a
               second nothing seems to be happening so he puts in more forward stick. But now
               it's too much and he invariably overcorrects. In a second or two he's out of
               phase with the needed corrections: PIO, the aircraft begins to 'porpoise.' The
               correction is to stop making corrections. Looks amusing from a distance, but
               not to the unfortunate perpetrator. PIO can be a serious problem for
               inexperienced pilots, and has led to fatal accidents. Aviators with a few
               drinks under their belt may experience PIO out of the aircraft as well, say at
               a squadron party.

Pipper         Wasn't this Al Gore's wife? Well, whatever...   In the gunsight there's this
               elusive floating tiny circle, like in a video game, and your essential job as a
               fighter pilot is to put that little pipper on the enemy's ass and pull the
               trigger. If you do that you get a medal.

Pitch-up       A special way to enter the landing pattern, pretty much limited to the carrier
    break      environment (and there it's wise to clear it with the Air Boss). Entering the
               break at low altitude, the break becomes a hard climbing turn to the downwind
               leg at 600 feet elevation. See the Break link for more on this and other break
               styles.

Playmate       Your playmates are the other members of the same flight. A term that sometimes
               leads to confusion when inadvertently used at home.

Plug           Noun and verb. In in-flight refueling, to successfully penetrate the airborne
               tanker's "basket" with your probe and receive comfort and fuel. The pilot's
               official log book keeps track of his total number of plugs; reminiscent of Don
               Giovanni's catalogue.

Power curve    The curve that describes a particular aircraft's response on a graph of thrust
               (y axis) vs. velocity (x). The curve has a surprising upward tail on the left
               (low speed) side. Maximum power gives max speed, and as you reduce power you
               reduce speed, 'til a point occurs where you're at the minimum "normal" flying
               speed. Turns out you can go slower. You can increase angle of attack and
               compensate for loss of wing lift with an increased vertical thrust vector; in
               other words, you add power to go slower. You're on the back side of, or
               "behind" the power curve. A bad place to be. You can only increase speed to
               normal flying speed by lowering the nose and losing altitude, and if the
               terrain doesn't allow that, as in the landing pattern, your goose may be
               cooked. The standard Navy carrier landing, needing to be as slow as possible,
               gets very close to the back side of the power curve, which makes speed control
               (or angle of attack) extraordinarily critical.

Prang          To impact the airplane on something hard and unplanned, like the ramp or the
               ground.

Preflight      The Naval Aviator would no more skip a thorough preflight walk-around
               inspection of his aircraft than he would forget his wife's birthd . . . uh . .
(inspection)   . no, that wasn't the best example. In any case, even though the plane captain
               has done his preflight inspection, the pilot has ultimate responsibility for
               accepting the aircraft for flight, and will always do a "preflight." When you
               preflight the aircraft you find things like little stress cracks in the skin.
               You bring it to the attention of Maintenance, and they circle it with a grease
               pencil and write "crack" by the crack. Well . . . duh!

Probe          The In-Flight Refueling (IFR) probe. You get fuel from the airborne tanker by "
               plugging" the probe into the tanker's "basket," which dances coquettishly in
               the turbulence at the end of a flailing fuel hose. You do this at 290 mph. It
               would be kind of sensual if it didn't take so much effort. Failure to
               successfully get plugged in has resulted in a more than a few lost birds.

Pucker         There are a lot of ways you could measure an aviator's stress in an airplane.
  factor       The "pucker factor" is the most usual and most graphic. Imagine you're eating a
               lemon. Your mouth puckers. It's just like that, except that under
               life-threatening stress it's the other end of the alimentary canal that
               puckers. Given as a percentage: The aviator at his normally suave self is at
               near zero percent p.f. unless there's a cool blonde in the vicinity. The p.f.
               of a black-ass night carrier landing may reach 75%, while at the top end of the
               scale   like you're getting a fire warning light on that black-ass night in the
               soup, followed by total electrical failure   (I borrow the following from
               extraordinary Crusader pilot Ron Lambe   hell, all 'Sader pilots are
               extraordinary): "with a 100% pucker factor, a pilot could bite a doughnut out
               of his seat cushion with his ass." (Well, Ron wrote "anus", but we know what he
               meant.)

Puddle-jumper  Small private airplanes that used to present a real hazard in the days of
               free-for-all VFR flying. They were often found crossing the final approach path
               to a jet base, and to fast-flying fighters they looked like immobile flies,
               when you could see them at all. The rule was "see and be seen," and every jet
               pilot from "those days" had a few sudden close encounters with them.

Pull chocks    When ready to taxi for take-off, the pilot signals the plane captain to remove
               the chocks that block the aircraft's wheels. So "Let's pull chocks" passes into
               the pilot's everyday speech, meaning "Let's go; let's get out of here." The
               signal (and a pilot can't say "pull chocks" without doing the hand signal with
               it) is like: Both loose fists are pulled apart in front of the body, palms up,
               thumbs extended outward. Every Navy pilot's wife has seen this signal from
               hubby after a couple of hours at a dull social affair.

Pull G's       What's with pilots always "pulling?" They pull G's, pull up, pull left, pull
               right . . .  Why not push G's? Well, it has to do with the control stick. The
               stick in a fighter does what a yoke does in many other aircraft: You pull back
               on it to make the aircraft go up. Thus you pull up. And when you do that, you
               increase the G (gravity) loading on the aircraft and on your body; thus you
               pull G's. To turn left you bank the aircraft left and again pull back on the
               stick. So no matter where you want to go, you get there by pulling. In fact,
               when you go ashore for some R&R, you "pull liberty!" (While a ship also pulls
               in and out of port, that's a different etymology.)

Punch          Or "punch out." To eject from the aircraft. Informally, "Hey, I've been at this
               crummy bar long enough. I'm punchin' (out)".

Quebec         The letter "Q" in radio comm. A favorite of bored teenage naval radio
               operators, who for a century have been sending each other such subtly encoded
               Morse code messages as "4Q" or its only slightly less obvious homophone "QQQQ."
               No doubt the repeated musical rhythm of the morse "Q": dah-dah-dit-dah ("Here
               comes the bride") is the reason for the undiminished attraction of this phrase.
               (Sorry, Quebecois, the Navy pronounces it with a "w," like "Kwu-beck" or
               "Kwee-beck.")

Radial         Each carrier and airfield, via its TACAN station, radiates electromagnetic
               waves like the rays of the sun. These rays, organized as 360 "radials," are
               aligned with magnetic north/south by receiving equipment in aircraft, and the
               pilot is presented with information showing his location relative to the TACAN
               station. If you're on the 270° radial, for example, you're due west of the
               station, and the bearing to the station is due east, or 090°. So the bearing is
               always the reciprocal of the radial; you just add or subtract 180° on the
               compass rosette. (Or you look at your TACAN gage.)

Radome         Simply the dome covering the radar.  On a fighter that translates to the nose
               cone.  And here's what happens:  The designer envisions these clean lines for
               his bird.  Then comes the model "B" upgrade. Probably an improvement. Then "C":
               Maybe an improvement, maybe not. But later models often result in operational
               degradation: Something bigger and better has to be hung on the poor aircraft. 
               By the time the peerless Crusader had gone through model changes as far as "J,"
               it contained everything the admirals and their wives (and of course the
               manufacturer) could think of, and had gained weight in its maturity, which
               seriously degraded its dogfighting ability. (Give me the youthful "Charlie" any
               day.) Most changes were internal, but the radome tells the story:

               [coneA]                   [coneC]                   [coneE]
                  The F-8A:  Little          F-8C:  Bigger radar   F-8E:  Huge radar   and a
               radar   little radome.      bigger nose cone.       Jimmy Durante schnoz!

Rail           1. The rack holding one or more missiles on the aircraft.
               2. "On a rail" or "On rails." A perfect carrier landing, "OK3," smooth, on
               speed, on glide slope and line-up from the top of the groove to touch-down.

RAT            Ram Air Turbine. (Also known as "Emergency Power Pack" and other terms, but
               "RAT" is obviously more colorful.) In the case of electrical or hydraulic
               failure, this small turbine can be deployed into the air stream to provide
               emergency power. It will typically power only the more critical A/C systems,
               and adds drag.

Ready CAP      "Ready Combat Air Patrol."  (Rather a "deck" patrol than an "air" patrol.) See
               "CAP".

Re-heat        British for Afterburner; used in the U.S. for effect.

Relative       The concept that makes airfoils (wings) work. Wind passing across the wing from
   wind        front to rear results in a region of lower pressure at the top of the wing,
               which yields lift and keeps the aircraft airborne. This is only a useful
               concept once you realize that you don't need to wait for a wind to happen; you
               get the same effect, and the same lift, by moving the wing through the air,
               resulting in the same "relative" wind over the wing. When the aircraft is in
               balanced flight, the relative wind on the a/c is always from the front, over
               the nose; and in all cases in the direction the a/c is moving through the air.
               Aircraft carriers are also concerned with relative wind, for somewhat different
               reasons.

Rendezvous     To gather up the several aircraft in a flight into a cohesive formation. If
               flying from the carrier, the several A/C launched independently will proceed to
               the rendezvous point, a location specified in the flight brief. Typical might
               be: "Rendezvous on the three three zero at 25, angels two two." (That's the
               point defined on the ship's 330° TACAN radial at 25 nautical miles from the
               ship, altitude 22,000 feet. And it's a moving point, of course, as the ship
               steams.) The rendezvous circle may be a port 30° banked turn commencing
               outbound on the radial at the given distance. As aircraft of the flight arrive
               at the rendezvous point they join on the the A/C already there, the designated
               flight leader assuming the formation lead on his arrival. At least that's the
               theory.

ResCAP         "Rescue Combat Air Patrol."  See "CAP".

"REST"         What's this? Rest? Of course the Naval Aviator never rests - he flies, he
               drinks, he chases poon, and he dreams about flying, drinking, and chasing poon.
               But he never rests. Must mean something else. Indeed - this refers to a small
               piece of equipment that we used to call a "computer" in the 50s-70s. But this
               little circular slide rule, made of several rotatable plastic disks (picture to
               starboard) had nothing in common with a computer as we know it today. "REST"                                     REST
               stood for "Range, Endurance, Speed, and Time," and the device allowed you to                                     computer
               calculate good stuff like your remaining max range, max endurance, best speed
               or time left until you would fall out of the sky for lack of fuel, if you just
               lined up your altitude and fuel state. It's the rare jock who spent much time
               fiddling with this thing while airborne, unless of course, you had a GIB with
               nothing to do.

Restricted     In the U.S. and territories, and off-shore, certain volumes of airspace are set
   area        aside for special use, commonly military use such as air-to-ground bombing or
               air-to-air gunnery practice. These areas are shown on aviation charts, and you
               don't fly through them without clearance. (Conversely, if you're cleared to
               operate in a restricted area you don't fly out of it without clearance.) Of
               course, since some private pilots display the same level of adherence to
               operating rules as the drivers around you on the freeway, you will not be
               surprised to encounter a Cessna merrily overflying the target as you're about
               to fire rockets, resulting in the transmission: "The Range is Cold! THE RANGE
               IS COLD!" from the Range Master.

Roger          Radio transmission acknowledging an instruction or information. (See "Wilco"
               for contrast.)

Romeo          1. The natural self-image of every Naval Aviator.
               2. The letter "R" in radio comm.

Rotation       1. In flying, this is the point during the take-off roll when you reach flying
               speed; you rotate by lifting the nose (the aircraft's, not the pilot's) to gain
               a flying attitude and lift off. (When being shot from a carrier catapult, the
               rotation occurs after you're airborne!)
               2. A Navy career consists of more or less alternating shore duty and sea duty.
               (If you're a prospective Navy spouse, you ought to be aware of this. On the
               other hand, I feel like I'm "Wikileaking" a secret: Lots of Navy men are
               married only because their fiancée hadn't grasped this.) So a Navy career
               consists of "rotating" from sea to shore duty: "I'm due for rotation in
               February" is a perfectly understandable statement.

Rudder         For many jet pilots the rudder is the forgotten flight control because a jet
               can be flown without paying much attention to it. Fighter pilots, though, make
               tactical use of the rudder: When you're nose high at the top of a maneuver in a
               fight, and don't have airspeed to pull G's to get the nose down quickly, you
               stand on the rudder pedal to induce yaw and wrench the nose down. But you'd
               better know what you're doing: If you barely have flying speed, and a little
               roll moment, and as much G as you can get in heavy buffet, you're at the edge
               of the aircraft's envelope. Stomp on the rudder, throw in a bunch of yaw and
               the wing can easily stall, resulting in departure and ruining your entire
               adventure. (Of course, as a last-ditch defensive maneuver, a departure may not
               be that bad, if you've got a bandit on your tail and you have enough altitude
               to recover. He's sure not going to follow you through that maneuver!)

Saddle         You're "in the saddle" when you're at the bandit's six and in range, ready to
               fire. So don't talk about it, FIRE!

Sader          Along with "Gator," a common nickname for the F-8 Crusader, the greatest
               fighter of its time.

SAM            Surface-to-air missile. Also known as a "telephone pole". A serious
               attention-getter when it's coming at you.

SAR            Search and rescue. A coordinated effort to extract downed aircrew from a combat
               zone. Involves rescue helicopters, close air support A/C to suppress enemy
               activity, and "RESCAP" fighters providing air cover.

Saunter        Radio term advising a pilot to fly at the "max conserve" power setting. This is
               normal on Combat Air Patrol (CAP) station and in holding patterns, where you
               need to save your fuel for more important business. Related terms are "canter"
               for normal cruise speed, "buster" for max basic engine power, and "gate(s)" for
               max combat rated thrust (afterburner).

Scissors       Out-of-phase maneuvers against an enemy aircraft, where the object as usual is
               to get to his six. Each A/C turns into the other after each pass, because if
               you turn away the bandit will be at your six. High-speed scissors are nose
               down, where the key is pulling more G than the bad guy. The approach of the
               deck will eventually decide the exercise. Slow-speed scissors are nose-high,
               where the object is to out-slow the opponent, wallowing into the six o'clock
               position. (This maneuver, like most fighter tactics, operates at the edge of
               the flight envelope: It was out of a slow-speed scissors that I stalled and
               departed an F-8 once, as a fleet trainee pilot, over an overcast and spun into
               it at 11,000 feet. The "S.O.P." said eject at 10,000 feet if you're spinning,
               and the instructor pilot (in the opposing A/C) yelled "eject" over the radio. I
               hung on, though   out of inertia   and pulled out under the overcast, just a
               couple of thousand feet above a residential area. Turned out we were over some
               L.A. suburb, though we were supposed to be in a "restricted area" 50 miles out
               to sea. Well...boys will be boys. That was almost a very ugly day.)

Section        A flight of two aircraft. May operate as an independent flight, or as a part of
               a four-plane division. In a division, the section leader flies as No.3, and his
               wingman is No.4. The section leader is responsible for the section's position
               within the division. The two-plane section is a great tactical tool. See for
               example "Loose deuce."

Shell (out)    To eject from the aircraft: "Ablaze like a Roman candle, he shelled out over
               Hanoi."

Sidewinder     'Winder, for short. The AIM-9C missile, the most successful and reliable
               air-to-air missile made. This heat-seeking (IR) missile is named for its odd
               helical flight path, reminiscent of the motion of the "Sidewinder" rattlesnake
               of the western U.S. deserts. The odd flight path comes from a built-in
               perennial overshoot of the heat source: the missile analyzes the change in IR
               intensity from its nutating seeker head, and corrects toward the source as it
               senses the intensity decreasing, i.e., it has just passed through the source.
               This results in the screw-like flight path around a pure pursuit curve. (Simple
               in concept, but not in manufacture. The Soviets acquired the plans for the
               Sidewinder but were unable to copy it because of the tolerances required in its
               ball bearings.) The 'Winder is fired from 1/2 mile to a mile aft of the bandit,
               and can be fired in a high-G environment, in response to a "growl" in the
               pilot's head set. The missile is not expected to hit the target; rather, when
               abeam the target a magnetic proximity fuse explodes an "expanding rod" warhead,
               which expands in a ring normal to the missile's path and cuts through the
               target A/C. It isn't pretty, of course, but effective. Damage is usually to the
               rear half of the target, often with a chance for the pilot to eject. (There are
               also radar versions of the 'Winder, but the original heat seeker's the
               tactician's bread and butter.)

Sierra         The letter "S" in radio comm. In designations of aircraft, carriers, and
               squadrons, "S" indicates an anti-submarine role. So the S-3 Viking is an
               anti-sub A/C, and CVS-12 ("USS Hornet") is an anti-sub carrier (see that for
               detail). But see "SH" for "sierra"'s most prominent use.

Six            Nirvana or Hades, depending on whose six. If the enemy's at your six (o'clock,
               of course, but "six" is so special that no one says "six o'clock") you're in
               deep doo. Conversely, if you're at his six you're in fighter pilot heaven.
               Either way, someone's had it.

Socked in      WOXOF.

S.O.P.         "Standard Operating Procedures." One of the world's few bureaucratic concepts
               with actual positive value. In Naval Aviation it means air crews follow NATOPS
               :  maintenance crews do the same job in the same way in every squadron, and in
               short, you have complete interchangeability of crews, craft, parts, and
               procedures. (We hear that the worldwide producers of "The Phantom of the Opera"
               musical stage show operate the same way:  The show plays on a number of stages
               around the world, and the productions are identical. Each stage set is
               identical, each performer of a given part plays the part with identical
               gestures and movements. Every cast member is backed by clones who can appear
               quickly at any of the worldwide stages and perform the role if needed. The
               co-players know that the replacement actor will turn and smile in the same way
               at the same point in the performance. A bit eerie. Perhaps what is a good idea
               in military utilitarianism loses some charm in the field of art.)

Sortie         Verb and noun. As a verb it simply means to take off and fly somewhere. But as
               a noun it comes into its own. A sortie is a single flight by a single aircraft.
               So what? Well, it's a bean for bean counting, don't you see? Especially when
               the Air wing is aboard ship, and the squadrons are competing against one
               another, the Skipper gets obsessed with the "Sortie War." We must fly more
               sorties than the other squadrons, because the Skipper's promotion is on the
               line. In the heat of this battle the distinction between "up" and "down"
               aircraft can easily get blurred. But heck, it's only a little unsafe.

Soup           "In the soup" = In the clouds, flying on instruments. (For really bad soup, see
               WOXOF.) A lot changes when you don't have a visual horizon. Navy pilots fly a
               special ("instrument parade") formation in the soup and at night, both as
               normal procedure and to bring an aircraft with failed radios down for a safe
               landing. Communication is typically via hand and head signals. Flying a wingman
               position in the soup leaves you without a clue as to your spatial orientation
               (because you can't take your eyes off the leader to check your instruments),
               and when you break out below the clouds you're as often as not convinced the
               air field or carrier is in a 30° bank. It's not. See Vertigo.

Speed brake    The official term for the 'boards', which see.

Squadron       The essential unit of naval aviation. The squadron operates as one of four or
               five units within an Air Wing. The squadron is headed by the Skipper, a
               Commander who typically advances from having held the Executive Officer
               position in the squadron during the previous carrier cruise. The squadron may
               have 15-18 aircraft, roughly the same number of pilots, and aircrew and other
               personnel totaling 150-200. All in all, squadron life aboard is one of
               cameraderie among the pilots, brought on in part by having common targets for
               bitching: The Navy, the cruise, the ship, the schedule, the food, the water,
               the Skipper ...

Squawk         You're flying along, fat, dumb, and happy, when the radar controller interrupts
               your reverie with "Gruesome Four, squawk code ..." (Here I naturally can't
               reveal the secret codes; knowing them, your life might be in danger.) What the
               controller means is, set the secret code on the little black box on your
               control console, and push the "squawk" button. Doing this makes something
               happen on his radar screen that makes him happy. And if the secret code is
               correct, they don't have to shoot you down. The black box in question (I'll
               reveal only this much) is a transmitter called a "transponder", or, by DOD, "
               IFF", which conveniently tells both the friendly controller and the enemy just
               who and where you are.

Stall          When the airflow over a wing becomes turbulent (the smooth 'boundary layer'
               flow separates from the wing) as a result of too great an angle of attack, the
               wing will stall, or lose the ability to provide lift. This can happen at any
               speed by pulling G's   which increases the angle of attack   in excess of what
               the wing will sustain at the given altitude and speed, though it's usually a
               slow-speed phenomenon. Fighter pilots, who operate tactically in slow speed
               environments where they still need to maneuver the aircraft vigorously, are
               routinely on the edge of stalling. In a fighter a stall often results in a
               violent snap "departure" rather than the gentle, predictable spin common in
               light plane stalls. Inevitably, the term becomes part of the pilot's off-duty
               lingo as well: "Honey, your paté is great, but I'm about to stall here." And in
               the event that an aviator feels he's had enough to drink in the O-Club ... but
               that's too unlikely to contemplate. My experience is he won't talk about
               stalling. He'll just stall. And crash.

State          You're inbound to the boat, and Approach Control contacts you: "Gruesome Two,
               say your state." What should you reply? If you answer "Kentucky" you're on some
               other wavelength. "State" means one thing in the air: "Fuel state", that is,
               "How much fuel do you have?" You answer, reporting your fuel state in thousands
               of pounds: "State 3.5", meaning "I have 3,500 pounds of fuel." (The reason we
               measure the fuel by weight - yes, I know it should be by mass [like Europeans
               who measure in "kilos"] and "pounds" is a measure of force, you don't need to
               write me about it - rather than by volume is that the volume of a liquid, say
               fuel, varies with temperature and pressure, but the mass [again, "weight" is a
               surrogate] remains constant, so it's a more accurate measure of how much energy
               you really have in the fuel tank.)

Stick          The control stick in an airplane, which in addition to allowing control of
               pitch and roll is usually tastefully accessorized with such items as a trigger,
               a "pickle" button, trim controls, etc. Back in the day . . . the stick was
               connected by cables and pulleys directly to the flight controls (ailerons and
               elevator), so as the aircraft flew faster and the aerodynamic pressures on the
               flight surfaces increased, the pressure needed to move the stick also
               increased. This elementary but reliable system was used in military aircraft as
               recent as the Douglas A-4 Skyhawk and the Russian MiG 21, and still functions
               well in modern light planes. But moving a modern jet aircraft by cables would
               require the strength of Hercules, so we don't use cable controls any longer.
               The modern ("Fly-by-wire") system yields no physical feedback from control
               surfaces to the stick, so computer-calculated artificial "feel" adds resistance
               to stick movements proportional to the dynamic forces on the control surfaces,
               to fool the pilot into thinking that all is still as it was, back in the day .
               . .
               And then there's the flesh-and-bones "Stick".

Strike         1. An aircraft damaged beyond repair is struck from the inventory. The A/C is a
               "strike."
               2. A coordinated attack by a number of aircraft. See "Alpha strike."

Sucked         In formation flying, if a wingman is aft of his proper position, he's said to
               be "sucked." (No joke.) How many naval aviator dads haven't turned to their
               lagging child on a family walk with, "Catch up, Billy, you're sucked!" (See "
               acute" for the opposite formation anomaly.)

TACAN          "Tactical Aid to Navigation" radio gear. This great piece of navigation
               equipment gives the pilot exact direction and (slant) distance to the selected
               TACAN transmitter. Every military airfield and carrier has a TACAN transmitter
               operating on an assigned channel, as do commercial airfields and hundreds of
               locations which define Airways.

Tactics        Formally "Air Combat Maneuvering" (ACM), informally "hassling". The
               nitty-gritty of fighter-piloting. This is fighter pilot against fighter pilot.
               Mano a mano. One-on-one, two-on-two, or other kinky configurations. It's what
               the fighter business is all about: Deliver the weapon and neutralize the
               airborne enemy. Just like racers live for racing, fighter pilots live for
               tactics. The weapons have advanced, but the better pilot will still win most of
               the time. The other times, of course, he gets shot down.

Tally-ho       Or just "Tally": "I have the bogey in sight," as in "Tally two bogeys at 9
               o'clock level," or "Hey, Jim, you got a tally on that babe at your three?"

Tango          1. The letter "T" in radio comm. Prominently used in such favorite Navy
               expressions as "Tango Sierra." ("Tough Sh*t," of course, for the uninitiated.)
               2. In aircraft and squadron designations, the letter "T" indicates a training
               role. Thus the T-2 is a trainer A/C. (Some fleet A/C, say the A-4, have a
               2-seat trainer version, in this case the TA-4.) Training squadrons have
               designations as VT-24 (the "V" means "fixed-wing aircraft").

Tanker         [tanking]Airborne refueling is critical for naval aviation. The naval "tanker"
               aircraft needs to operate from a carrier, and to date tankers have been
               specialized versions of naval attack or utility aircraft, carrying the special
               designation "K" before the a/c designator. (The Navy has never designed a
               purpose-built tanker.) Traditional tankers were the KA3-Skywarrior and the A-4
               Skyhawk (external tanks only), later supplanted by the KA-6 Intruder and the
               KS-3 Viking. With the recent retirement of the Vikings, the F/A-18F SuperHornet
               has been outfitted with buddy stores, but this is surely an interim measure,
               and an inefficient use of a top notch fighter. (The Navy seems to have dropped
               the ball on their tanker needs.) At right, a KS-3 Viking tanker, with a good
               view of the receiver's in-flight refueling probe fitting into the basket. The
               receiving a/c happens to be another S-3.

TarCAP         "Target Combat Air Patrol."  See "CAP".

Tarmac         Or "macadam": Loosely, the A/C parking area of an air field, or any paved area
               of the field off the runways and taxiways. Named for the patented bituminous
               tar and crushed stone mix originally used for such paving, and originally known
               as "tarmacadam" after its inventor. (In Britain, still   and correctly   a
               common term for "asphalt.")

Telephone      A graphic term for a "SAM"   a Surface-to-air missile.
    pole

Thrust         Jet engines aren't rated by horsepower, but by pounds of thrust, which is a
               direct measure of force. The direction of the resultant force is usually
               (except for strange birds like helicopters and Harriers) axial and directed
               forward. In other words, it conveniently makes the A/C move forward, overcoming
               drag. A fighter pilot can never have too much thrust. Light the afterburner for
               max thrust.

"Top Gun"      1.  Or "Navy Fighter Weapons School." A much bally-hoo'ed program that began as
               a remedial quick fix to turn F-4 interceptor pilots into fighter pilots. The
               Pentagon dogma of air-to-air warfare from the mid '50s to the mid '60s held
               that the days of dogfighting were over. Air-to-air in the future would mean
               firing missiles at one another at a great distance. While the design of the F-8
               Crusader preceded this Pentagon silliness, the F-4 Phantom program bore the
               brunt of it. While F-8 pilot training centered around close-in air-to-air
               combat tactics, the Phantom pilots learned essentially no dogfighting tactics.
               As soon as the Viet Nam war began, what had been obvious to fighter pilots
               became so clear that even the brass could grasp it: You needed visual ID to
               engage an enemy A/C, which meant close-in dogfighting. Recognizing finally that
               the F-4 pilots needed retraining, the Navy looked partly to the Crusader
               tactical training program for help, transitioning a number of F-8 pilots from
               the VF-124 "Crusader College" to Phantoms to instruct F-4 pilots in air-to-air
               tactics. The short remedial course in tactics established for the Phantom
               pilots in 1969 gradually grew and was given the impressive title "Navy Fighter
               Weapons School", known braggadociously by the Phantom community as "Top Gun".
               By the end of the war the Navy Phantom pilots had risen to be the second-best
               fighter pilots in the Navy, with a kill ratio second only to the F-8 'Sader
               jocks. A great achievement indeed.
               2.  One of the silliest movies ever made, ostensibly about the above, in which
               naval aviators are portrayed as retarded teens, and where just about everything
               the Tom Cruise character does in the air would have resulted in an immediate
               Field Board.

Tractor        What a demeaning task for a combat aircraft: Towing the gunnery practice banner
               . Bad enough even if it weren't for the express purpose of getting shot at.
               (Check those links if you want to know more. I don't want to talk about it.)

Transponder    The transmitter that sends automatic coded ID info to radar operators. See "IFF
               " and "Squawk".

Trigger        Just like a rifle trigger, the trigger on the stick fires the aircraft's guns
               and/or missiles.

Trim           The trim control is usually on the stick, operated by the thumb. Trimming
               adjusts the position of the flight surfaces to hold straight and level flight,
               without changing the neutral position of the stick.

Tuck-under     This is one of those stunts   like an aileron roll off the catapult   that a
    break      young aviator with more balls than brains is just aching to pull off. You come
               screaming into the break (check that link) at the carrier or air field, and not
               wanting to do a standard old break roll to the left, 'cause you're pretty
               special, you break at max roll rate 270 or more degrees to the right, which
               theoretically leaves you in a left bank. Then you pull Gs for all you're worth
               and voilà! you're set up on the downwind leg, ready for landing. Only thing is,
               this is a stunt that takes practice, and you don't have any practice. But
               you're pretty special, so it should work. So when your head bounces off the
               canopy sides in the hard roll, and you roll out after only 230 degrees of roll
               'cause you can't focus your eyes and it all takes a half second, and you pull
               Gs for all you're worth, the airplane will describe an elegant and rapid arc
               directly into a brand new hole in the ground. Well, the t/u break has certainly
               been performed successfully, but the rate of fatal failure by young studs is
               such that it has for practical purposes been banned. No matter, it's a given
               that some young hot-shot future fighter pilot will try it again, with the above
               very expensive result.

Tunnel         You've heard the phrase; high-G aviation is where it comes from. Like other
    vision     body parts, blood moves in one direction in response to gravity: toward your
               feet. This is not good for the brain. The sense that's first affected by loss
               of blood to the brain in a high-G environment is the sense the pilot needs most
               : Vision. As the pilot increases the G loading, the oxygen level in the brain
               drops, and peripheral vision begins to contract. In a sustained high-G turn,
               the circular area of effective sight continues to reduce, until the pilot only
               has a small "tunnel" of vision left. He can see straight ahead, but that's it.
               His peripheral vision will return within seconds after he relaxes the G
               loading. For the consequences of too-high G loading, see "grey-out" and "
               black-out." For how we combat these effects, see "G-suit."

U.A.V.         "Unmanned Aerial Vehicle." Will this remote-controlled "toy" be the end of
               fighter piloting? Quite likely. Fighter pilots are more and more having to face
               up to the fact that their craft, like that of knights on horseback of past
               centuries, is a temporary phenomenon. UAVs, which so far have been specialized
               for reconnaissance or air-to-ground weapons delivery (read: "bombing"), will in
               the future carry super-sophisticated air-to-air weapons. Directed by
               satellites, they will be able to clear whole sectors of enemy aircraft. And if
               the UAV experience to date is an indication, they'll from time to time shoot
               down someone who wasn't supposed to be shot down. But hey, that's the price of
               "progress". . .

Undercast      An overcast seen from above.

Uniform        1. The letter "U" in radio comm. It's used in some aircraft designations to
               indicate "utility," as in the "HU" designations of utility helicopters.
               "Utility squadrons" were formerly known as "VU" squadrons. Those are now
               designated "composite" squadrons, and the former VU-7, for example, is now
               VC-7.
               2. See "Uni" and "Uniform of the day" for the stuff you wear.

Up (status)    An aircraft in safe flyable condition. Yeah, right. See "Down."

Upwind         Simply the direction facing the wind, or a location in that direction: "Let's
               find another table. That cigar smoker is upwind of us." Aircraft like to land
               and take off upwind, i.e., against the wind.

Vertigo        Spatial disorientation. The great hazard of instrument flying. Your body may
               tell you you're in a nose-down left turn. Your instruments say you're straight
               and level. Believe your instruments. Seat-of-the-pants flying doesn't work in
               the soup.

VFR            Visual Flight Rules. Clear weather. Used adjectivally, as in "We were VFR the
               whole way." If it's not VFR, it's IFR. Now, though VFR/IFR can describe the
               weather, the terms really describe the flying rules imposed by FAA in different
               situations or locations. For example: Used to be (through the 1960's) that
               flying in fair weather below 24,000 feet in the U.S. was totally VFR. The rule
               for collision avoidance was "see and be seen." The usual way for a flight out
               of, say, NAS Miramar at San Diego to return to base was to follow
               (approximately) the VFR approach corridors, calling the Initial Point to the
               tower, and screaming down the runway for the break at some convenient speed,
               usually over 400 knots. You looked out for airliners and avoided them visually.
               Then, in the early '70s, FAA restricted flight below 10,000 feet to a max speed
               of 250 knots. (Yours truly and other F-8 Crusader pilots at the time found this
               ludicrous because at 250 knots the 'Sader is barely staggering along, with
               little maneuvering ability to avoid traffic, so there seemed to be a loss of
               safety in the slow airspeed.) FAA then proceeded to lower the "Area of Positive
               Control" (where VFR flight is not allowed) from 24,000 to 18,000 feet, and to
               include low-altitude metropolitan areas as positive control areas. By the end
               of the '70s, you could hardly fly VFR anywhere anymore. Most military flights
               since then have operated like airliners. Gone is the Sierra Hotel break. Gone
               is freedom.

Victor         1. The letter "V" in radio comm.
               2. Designating low altitude airways, below 20,000', used mainly by prop planes,
               e.g., V-22 ("Victor 22").

Vulcan         The standard air-to-air/air-to-ground machine gun found on modern fighters and
    cannon     attack aircraft, helicopter gunships, etc. The Vulcan is an improved "Gatling"
               type gun, six-barrel, electrically or pneumatically driven. The current M61
               type Vulcan fires around 100 rounds per second. (That's a lot of high-explosive
               lead.) This gun will really tear up an enemy aircraft, and it's a real
               attention-getter for enemy ground troops.

Walkdown       Or: "FOD" walkdown. Whether ashore or aboard the carrier, a sizeable crew
               gathers well before flight ops to walk the deck or the flight line, eyes down,
               searching for that stray nut, bolt, rock, paper cup, or whatever else could be
               sucked up into a jet engine. The simple FOD walkdown has saved hundreds of
               millions of dollars worth of aircraft repair. We wouldn't be surprised to learn
               that whoever suggested it got a $50 bonus for the idea.

Whiskey        The letter "W" in radio comm.

"Wilco"        Radio transmission for "Will Comply". Not much used. Normally the simple
               acknowledging "Roger" suffices, but hell, if you want to be decisive, Wilco's
               your word. If you ever hear "Roger, Wilco" in a B movie, you now have something
               to sneer at: It's one or the other. And if you hear, "Roger Wilco Over and Out
               ," leave the flick.

Winder         The Sidewinder air-to-air missile.

"Window"       Used as a radio signal to activate chaff when being painted by enemy radar.
               ("Window" was the original British code word for the chaff invention itself,
               during the second World War.)

Wing-fold      Most carrier-based aircraft can fold their wings hydraulically to save space on
               the deck. (Some, like the S-3 Viking, even fold the tail fin.) It's a brilliant
               idea, though it adds weight to the wing, not to mention new hazards: More than
               one aviator has tried to take off with the wings still folded. Some a/c will
               actually fly and can be landed with the wings folded, but in most you'll wind    [1pix] Wing
               up in the swamp off the end of the runway. On a normal touchdown on the carrier         fold
               you raise the hook, taxi out of the wires, and fold the wings in quick
               sequence, each on a signal from a yellow shirt. (On deck you activate nothing
               without a signal from a yellow shirt.) The F-8 Crusader with wings folded is
               illustrated to the right.

"Wingie"       = Wingman

Wing           Without getting technical, in normal 1 G (straight & level) flight this refers
   loading     to the weight of the aircraft divided by the effective lifting surface. (This
               used to be a simple calculation (wing area only), but in modern A/C the
               airframe body may also provide significant lift.) This is a pretty good measure
               of an aircraft's power-off (or low power) gliding ability (swept-wing jets have
               a notoriously high wing loading, and basically fall from the sky; they just
               don't glide worth a damn), and for fighters it has been a traditional measure
               of turning ability, which is critical in a "dogfighter." However, greater
               engine power can overcome the disadvantage of high wing loading to yield a
               tighter turn radius, because if you're underpowered the drag induced by the
               G-loading will slow the aircraft in the turn, which results in less G available
               and lessened ability to turn.

Wingman        In a multi-aircraft flight, everyone but the flight leader. There's a division
               of authority between the flight leader and his wingmen: Flight leader 100%,
               Wingmen zero. Yet being a good wingman is demanding and is critical to the
               mission. The flight lead is like a dog walker with one or more dogs on leash.
               If you're a bad dog you can really mess up his walk. (It should be said that in
               a large flight there may be several divisions, each of which has a division
               leader and a section leader. These have responsibilities, but are still
               following the orders of the flight leader.)

WOXOF          "Weather: Overcast, Ceiling Obscured, Visibility Zero in Fog." (Pronounced like
               it looks: "woxoff.") You're not getting me up in that.

X-ray          The letter "X" in radio comm.

Yankee         The letter "Y" in radio comm. And of course "Yankee Station," the carrier task
               force's operating area off North Viet Nam which figured heavily in the
               U.S.Navy's air involvement in the Viet Nam war.

"Your          Shorthand in radio communication for "Do the following immediately". Mostly
   signal"     used by shipboard air controllers in such phrases as, "Your signal Bingo",
               "Your signal Charlie", or "Your signal Delta". (Your signal is obviously
               "follow those links" if you want to know what it all means.)

Zero G         The weightlessness of space travel can occur in fighter aircraft too, but it's
               usually a transitory state, as when pushing the nose over from a climb to get
               to a nose-down attitude for descent. If you give the stick a little more
               forward push you'll get negative G's going over the top. (This is a sluggish
               process, and the fighter pilot is much more likely to roll the aircraft over
               and pull positive G to get the nose down, then roll upright again. But once the
               nose is down, if you're high and slow in a "dogfight," the best way to gain
               speed is to "unload" the aircraft to zero G and "stroke" the burner for a few
               seconds, since the aircraft will accelerate better without the G-loading, which
               causes drag.) A major problem with the weightless (zero G) flight environment
               is that liquid fuel pelletizes and doesn't behave normally in the fuel system.
               An aircraft's flight restrictions may include a time limit on operating at zero
               G, perhaps just a few seconds. (Another problem occurs if you've got someone
               with you in the aircraft, like a GIB. It's tough enough for the guy to hang on
               with a pilot who's manhandling a fighter through rapid and unexpected rolls and
               G loads. You throw a few zero or negative G moments into the mix and you're
               likely to have the GIB's latest meal raining all over you.)

Zero/zero      A rocket-powered ejection seat with the capability to safely eject the aircrew
               from zero altitude and zero airspeed. Older, non-rocket assisted ejection seats
               required both a minimum altitude and airspeed to safely eject, since otherwise
               the seat wouldn't reach a high enough altitude for the parachute to deploy and
               slow the user before ground impact. (Instead, the ground would slow the user at
               impact.)

Zulu           1. The letter "Z" in radio comm.
               2. "Zulu time"; also known as "GMT" (Greenwich Mean Time), or "Universal Time."
               It's not clear how London won the right to set the world's time, but the U.S.
               Navy's onboard, and reckons time by "Zulu." To make it perfectly clear, when
               it's 2 p.m. in San Diego the Navy calls it 2200Z unless it's daylight savings
               time, when the Navy calls it 2300Z. Because that's the (standard) time it is in
               London. Get it?

                              ┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
                              ┃Go to Top of Page┃
                              ┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛

                                      [1]
━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━

                             The Pilot And Friends

              A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z

Ace             A fighter pilot who has shot down five aircraft, preferably the enemy. Less
                formally used to describe any pilot with a real or imagined reputation as a
                Stick, including most frequently oneself.

Acey-deucey     Or "ace-deuce" to cognoscenti. Backgammon as played by sailors. The basic
                difference is that the game starts with no pieces on the board, and the dice
                are thrown in a dice chute screwed down to the playing table, as is the board.
                The board, of course, has a wooden lip around to prevent the pieces from
                sliding onto the deck when the ship rolls. It's considered unsporting to use
                any subtle strategy in "ace-deuce," a tradition perhaps stemming from the
                pieces' disinclination to stay in place, much like Alice's croquet equipment.

ACRAC           In days gone by, the "Aviation Cadets' Recreation and Athletic Club" at the
                Naval Air Training Command's NAS Pensacola, Florida. The ACRAC offered the
                lowest legal form of entertainment, and prepared budding Naval Officers for the
                onslaught of young women of adaptable morals. Apparently some offended
                Admiral's wife put a stop to this aspect of budding Naval Officers' training.
                So now they go out in the world unprepared... Pray for them.

ACRAC Annie     Generic term for female groupies congregating around Naval Air training bases.
                See ACRAC.

Admin           When a carrier pulls into a foreign port, the crew gets liberty. If the boat
                will be in port for more than a couple of days, a squadron's gentlemen officers
                need a place ashore to sleep off a drunk, or whatever. A J.O. is given the
                responsibility to rent an apartment (an "admin") for the in-port period. A most
                useful custom.

A.I.O.          "Air Intelligence Officer." Hm. They pass on to the flight crews what the
                politicians want the crews to think is true. At sea they entertain with
                recognition slide shows.

Airedale        Sure, it's a terrier, but in the Navy it means a member of the aviation
                community, officer or enlisted. Usually used by the non-flying Navy, and not
                always with flattering intent.

All hands       Navy talk for "everybody". But the order, "All hands on deck!", beloved by
                movie script writers, is much less common in real life.

A.O.M.          "All Officers Meeting." Some squadron skippers are meeting-addicted and have an
                AOM every morning (actually not a bad custom during heavy flight ops), where
                everyone gets told to straighten out what they messed up the day before,
                etc...  Some skippers are more relaxed (or lethargic) and call an AOM once a
                week. An unscheduled AOM, as in "All officers to the ready room in 15 minutes!"
                always means bad news.

A.P.M.          "All Pilots Meeting." Just what it says: a meeting of all the squadron pilots.
                Often called to straighten out some aviatin' procedure after a DS nugget has
                tried to exterminate himself.

Aviate          Slang for what an aviator does (in the air).

Aviator         Naval Aviator, which see. A pretty special person. Here's someone's summary of
                the type: "The average Navy pilot, despite the sometimes swaggering exterior,
                is very much capable of such feelings as love, affection, intimacy, and caring.
                Of course, these feelings rarely involve anyone else."

Basket leave    A special kind of leave: You fill out your leave request, give it to the
                skipper and go on leave. And if you're not back when you promised, he'll
                probably charge you the leave. But if you are, the papers go in the waste
                basket. Though you'll never hear a Navy man say "waste basket" or anything
                resembling it. It's the sh*tcan.

Belay           "Belay my last!" means "Never mind..." or "I was wrong about that but don't
                actually want to say so."

Blackshoe       A "blackshoe" is anyone in the Navy, other than aviators. Black shoes are
                standard Navy uniform. Aviators, however, wear brown shoes. Two worlds with an
                uneasy truce. In this forum "brownshoes" are naturally considered superior
                human beings. (If you wonder about the reason for this important distinction,
                it's to be found in physiology: Back in the day, you see, when men were men
                etc, aviators flew wearing their regular uniforms with black shoes. Now,
                aviating back then could literally scare the sh*t out of you, and it didn't
                take long before someone figured out that wearing shoes that were already brown
                would avoid a lot of repolishing.)

Blouse          The uniform coat is not a coat, it's a "blouse". On the other hand, the lower
                garment is always "trousers" in the military, never "pants", because "only
                girls wear pants" as we're told by drill sergeants in "Pre-flite". Go figure.

Blues           The Blues flying the FA-18 Hornet1. The Blue Angels; the world's
                standard-setting jet flying team (Navy Demonstration Team). The "Blues" is a
                regular Navy squadron, and the team's pilots are chosen from applicants among
                regular naval aviators for a two year tour of duty. The team of six pilots
                traditionally includes at least one U.S. Marine Corps aviator. They currently
                fly the F/A-18 Hornet.

                2. The "dress blues" uniform, worn for special events during the winter season.
                (See "Whites.")

Boat school     An irreverent term for the U.S. Naval Academy at Annapolis, MD, which has
                provided most of the Navy's rug rank officers for a couple of hundred years.
                Graduates are recognized by a graduation ring the size of a practice bomb.

Boondoggle      A useless and often costly exercise or project. Not just a Navy term, of
                course, but it's used constantly in the Navy because the brass constantly come
                up with new boondoggles. (See "Leapex" for a variation.)

B.O.Q           The "Bachelor Officers' Quarters", fondly remembered as the B.O.Q., or just the
                "Q", is, sadly, an endangered and vanishing species at military bases. They
                were never much to look at: a blockhouse with all the amenities of a Motel-6
                without TV or Coke machine, attended (if at all) by a single steward. But it
                was usually close to the O-club, and you could arrive in your sweaty flight
                suit on an R.O.N. without apologizing for your appearance. The Q's have been
                largely replaced by more upscale, Holiday Inn-looking, "Family Traveler
                Services Facilities" or some such, where I think you have to clean up before
                you arrive. I suspect the change has to do with Admirals' wives, who acquire
                enormous quiet power:

                    (She remembers well when hubby, as a young aviator, used to R.O.N. at
                    airbases scattered across the country, spending the night in those
                    unsupervised B.O.Q.'s, where anyone could come and go without being
                    noticed. . . and where who-knows-what may have been going on . . . "Time to
                    get rid of those old Q's!...")

                Actually   and you heard it here first   most major Navy decisions have been
                made by Admirals' wives.  There's a Ph.D. dissertation in Military History just
                waiting to be written!

Brass           The upper levels of the Navy's officer corps. Admirals, generally. They walk on
                eggshells because their jobs are politically connected. For some, it's a long
                time since they had much to do with the workaday Navy, and it shows.

Brownnose       Often as a gerund: brownnosing. (We've opted for two "n's," though when said or
                written in anger or derision, as it often is, the terser form "brownose" must
                also be acceptable.) The time-honored practice of obsequious, toadying pleasing
                of the boss at any cost. It's been said the fundamental difference between
                brownnosing and ass-kissing is merely depth perception. 'Nuff said. (For a
                quick guide, though, see "Fitness report.")

Brownshoe       See Blackshoe. Officers in the Naval Aviation community (pilots and their
                hangers-on) wear brown uniform shoes. The rest of the Navy wear black shoes.
                This distinction is very important. Just ask any of them. "Brownshoe" is
                naturally a term of opprobrium in the blackshoe community (something about
                bowel control) but a badge of honor among aviators.

Callsign        Each aviator has a chosen callsign, an echo from times past, that he
                theoretically uses for radio calls. The Navy brass have by now decided that
                that won't do, it's too cool and not bureaucratic enough; so pilots rarely get
                to use their personal callsigns. But every now and then, mostly on training
                hops, the flight lead gets to call the flight by his callsign. So if I'm
                leading a flight, I'm Viking one, and the rest of the flight members have the
                call signs Viking two, three, etc. But   and may this tradition never die  
                aviators call each other by callsign as often as by name. Some guys are their
                callsigns; they're never called by anything else. Why, I remember ... Carl was
                always just Droopy, and others who I never called by anything but their
                callsigns are Ace, Wonder, Rattler, Gearbox, Spanky, Cobra, Hoser, Snuffy,
                Moon, Lobo, Ike, Moose, BlackJack, BrownBear, Snake, Taco, Hotdog... etc. If
                you're wondering what inspires these callsigns   is it a personality trait, a
                hobby, a personal peccadillo, a take-off on the name   well, sure, it can be
                any of these or just a moment's inspiration   often a "friend's" inspiration.
                And most of 'em are chosen while totally faced. In any case, it's your handle,
                and you're stuck with it.

                Here's a small sample of Naval Aviator (that means Navy and Marine pilots)
                callsigns, in no particular order, from the F-8 Crusader community of the 1960s
                and '70s. Many of these, like my own, have been used repeatedly, and of course
                there are hundreds of others in use.
                (All of these aviators, I'm glad to say   except a few, I'm sorry to say   are
                still with us):

                                                   Some Naval Aviator callsigns:
                Falcon         Hobo         Buzzard    Cracker   Bear       Black     Truck      Fang      Brillo
                Rookie         Yogi         Ripper     Cowboy    Rusty      Buckeye   Tiger      Swan      Redneck
                Easy           Hunjak       Flaps      Folly     Blue       Blivet    Pork       Bad       Apollo
                Lizard         Saber        Bullet     Warbucks  Bean       Jock      Hounddog   Boomer    Master
                MadDog         Apache       BlackAl    Beamer    Hood       Shooter   Taco       Rapid     Smoke
                Spanky         Smooth       Root       Scorpion  Red        SweetPea  Rebel      Jonas     Admiral
                Hoser          Ginmill      Box        Bugger    Racer      Dude      Snuffy     Lobo      Hotdog
                Cobra          Mickey       Danse      Frog      Stoney     Flips     Ajax       Katah     Gaucho
                Clam           Jaundice     Rabbit     Eagle     Cajun      Xandy     Spider     Razor     Mofak
                Chance         Nickle       Droopy     Amos      Junior     Gunner    Hammer     Digger    Stinger
                Yank           Tuna         Crazyhorse Balls     Gator      Combat    Shadow     Fokker    Mustang
                Lascar         Taz          FatDog     Checker   Willy      Lightnin' Fox        Mongoose  Coffee
                DeputyDawg     Peaches      Dork       Aggie     Satan      Reb       EasyEd     Circus    Gopher
                Troll          Ike          Dallas     Kismet    Cossack    Catfish   Fearless   LuckyJose Fluid
                ColdCat        Bones        Bulldog    Pierre    Tomcat     Muon      Flavius    Scorch    Oompah
                Bolt           Shoe         Gearbox    Senator   Grump      Blackjack Twigs      Empire    Dog
                Ram            Hozay        Gridley    Growler   ClubLeaf   Monk      Pointer    Buster    Rip
                Diamond        Hubie        Menace     Swampfox  Stud       Mo        Swede      Spike     Duke
                PigPen         Zot          Blackie    Thunder   Gypsy      Skate     Simian     Badger    Skipper
                Devil          Fire         Mallard    Zeke      Action     Pineapple Fireball   Rocky     Raider
                Checkmate      Banshee      Weasel     Tank      Trigger    Cosmo     Ski        Florida   SilverFox
                B2             Superheat    Hawk       Tex       Killer     Wonder    Viking     Moon      Turtle
                Ribbit         Fats         Dirtbag    Klondike  Runway     Hook      Buddha     Slammer   Mutton
                Buster         Merlin       Laser      Deacon    Poncho     Lash      Nomad      Bwana     Judge
                Jammer         Toad         Rocks      Zorro     Attila     Grumpy    Lancer     Ratchet   HeadHook
                CityDesk       Dutch        Sam        NeverMiss Satch      Masher    Muskrat    Blade     Dragon
                Tigger         Snake        Mac        Maverick  Puke       Rock      Viva       Sweet     Zap
                Bubba          DancingBear  Quiet      Yankee    Fighter    Stoneface Magic      Mugs      Trees
                TennesseeStud  Baron        Stag       Surf      Moose      Beto      IronMike   Bomb      Torch
                Wedge          Tarzan       OB         Streak    Jet        Jungle    Gas        Tuck      Redeye
                Beeper         Hoss         Fubar      Humbug    Toro       Barfly    Gun        MaxGross  Plaster
                Shark          Padre        Panther    Speedster Fuji       HotRod    Lurch      Reef      CorkTip
                Cougar         Sheepdog     Quaker     Ice       JollyGreen Worm      Poker      Nugget    Slick
                Reptile        Maggot       Animal     Ace       Papi       SickAss   FastEddy   Flash     GrayWolf
                Speedy         Vampire      Shaker     Curly     Bat        Playboy   Reno       Waltzer   Zombie
                Chella         WhiteDove    Hornet     Snail     Green      Crush     Locust     Orange    Jeep
                Finbar         Striker      Tidbit     Spook     T-square   Nodoz     Jinx       Terrible  Thunder
                Cokeman        Beaver       Gray       Yuma      Bruin      Wags      Crane      BabyHuey  Organizer
                Pagan          Wahoo        Mole       Bandit    Whip       Garbonza  BlackCloud Wild      Hotfoot
                Rat            Bingo        Brucelo    Frito     Sapphire   Basic     Bluto      Hummer    Rowdy
                Wizard         Sader        Mako       Rattler   BrownBear  Pnuts     Gasm       Varmint   Track

                And these are just my close friends!

"Carrier        We don't mean a landing on a carrier, though that's obviously a carrier
   landing"     landing. No, this exercise often takes place in an O-Club, or in a local bar
                far, far away from U.S. shores. Being totally faced, one of the nation's finest
                is motivated to reproduce an actual carrier landing sans aircraft. Wobbling to
                his feet, staring bleary-eyed down the long table (or two) where his comrades
                equally blearily await the adventure, the star aviator makes his ball call,
                gesticulates to indicate dirtying the aircraft, and in a burst of besotted
                bravado speeds on uneasy legs toward the "landing area." A head-first leap   a
                bellyflop amidst glasses and bottles   a noiséd slide amidst the breaking
                glassware, and either a successful trap (he stops on the table) or an
                ignominious dribbling off the end. In any case, he's done it; he's The Man.
                (Thinking back, we   the besotted J.O.'s   never could understand why local
                officers' wives, out for a romantic dinner at the Club, would object to such
                innocent expressions of youthful enthusiasm; but they did, and our welcome
                somehow quickly wore thin at various O-Clubs.)

Chief           Chief Petty Officer. It's the enlisted ranks that keep the Navy runnning, and
                it's the chiefs, the top enlisted ranks (E7 E9), that literally make it run.
                While each Navy shop or squadron division or unit is nominally headed by an
                officer, the chief who runs the shop is the day-to-day leader. He came through
                the ranks, has technical expertise, and has the confidence of his men in a way
                the officer assigned above him can rarely achieve. (This is doubly true in the
                aviation community, where the officer, if a pilot, is occupied with his flying
                duties   which the Navy calls "collateral duty.") One of the first things a
                nugget officer has to learn is to give his chief deference and respect. A
                martinet attitude by a junior officer toward his chief will tarnish the young
                officer's reputation and probably result in an instructional session with the
                C.O.  Navy Chiefs provide essential leadership and continuity in organizations,
                and not enough good can be said of them.

C.O.            Commanding Officer of a facility, ship, or squadron. In a Navy air squadron,
                usually a fairly senior Commander (CDR). A squadron C.O. is normally addressed
                as "Skipper." The C.O. of a ship is called "Captain," no matter what his actual
                rank.

Collateral      It grates on naval aviators that their flying duties are labeled "collateral
duty            duty" by the Navy. Their primary duty is considered to be whatever
                organizational assignment they have in the squadron, e.g., personnel officer,
                ordnance officer, etc. The aviators usually figure they've signed up primarily
                to shoot down the enemy, and that doing paperwork is slightly less important.
                But no doubt the Navy knows best. But see Satrapa for an alternate view.

Copecetic       For some reason a favorite word in the Navy. Spelled about eight different
                ways, they all mean Thumbs Up, OK, Checks out, All in order ... (If it were any
                better it would be downright hunky-dory.)

Cover           The military word for any kind of uniform hat. You don't wear it indoors, and
                when you don't wear it you're "uncovered."

Cumshaw         Whatever little stuff you can pilfer or otherwise get your hands on, like the
                snacks and yummies you've got stashed in the flight suit.

Date of Rank    Now Hear This: Nothing in your military experience is likely to be of greater
                importance to you than this: Your Date of Rank! The services have a simple rule
                about who's in charge: The senior officer is in charge! Say you're one of a
                quintet of ensigns assigned to some task (sounds like trouble). One of you has
                to be in charge. The most senior ensign (that's somewhat like comparing
                virginity among whores) will be in charge. And that, you see, depends on one
                thing: the date on which you got your ensign rank. If you have the earlier
                "date of rank" you're senior and you're in charge. When a new officer checks
                into the squadron, you first learn his name, and next his date of rank. If he's
                senior to you he may be the world's greatest Delta Sierra but he'll still be in
                charge. Ten years later he'll still be in charge. That's the Navy way. (See
                also "Seniority" and "The Numbers".)
                 

"Dead Bug"      ┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃                        TOP SECRET - - - - TOP SECRET                        ┃
                ┃                             Not for enemy eyes!                             ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃                          The infamous "DEAD BUG"!                           ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃  This inane exercise or "game", which is best played in a bar, is           ┃
                ┃  testimony to the theory of evolution. We apparently still have some genes  ┃
                ┃  left over from the ape. Though I don't think even an ape would ... no, it  ┃
                ┃  takes a Marine. In any case, many ex-Marine aviators who no longer have a  ┃
                ┃  functioning back can blame it on Dead Bug. It works like this (and this    ┃
                ┃  is second-hand information   from Marine officers   I've never had the     ┃
                ┃  pleasure myself):                                                          ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃  A group of "officers and gentlemen" are gathered in a bar. (Are you        ┃
                ┃  paying attention? This is complex.)                                        ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃  At just the right moment (that would be when everyone's dry), inspiration  ┃
                ┃  strikes one of the gentlemen, who cries out haute voix: "DEAD BUG!" Now    ┃
                ┃  the Marines, who have played this since boot camp, have hair-trigger       ┃
                ┃  reflexes when hearing that incontrovertible command, and in about a        ┃
                ┃  second-and-a-half they're all flat on their back on the barroom floor,     ┃
                ┃  because the last man down naturally buys the round. If he's able to get    ┃
                ┃  up. Actually, it's probably the first man down who'll have the most        ┃
                ┃  trouble getting up. I regret greatly that I haven't observed this          ┃
                ┃  exercise, so you'll have to imagine it for yourself. It would certainly    ┃
                ┃  produce some sudden rearrangement of the furniture akin to a minor         ┃
                ┃  earthquake. And perhaps the loser also wipes up the blood   I don't know.  ┃
                ┃  Nor can I say anything about the best technique, having neither trained    ┃
                ┃  nor competed, but I think it must involve kicking both feet forward        ┃
                ┃  simultaneously and letting gravity do the rest. That would get you the     ┃
                ┃  full benefit of the 32 ft/sec/sec that nature provides. And explain some   ┃
                ┃  of the broken backs. Well, there you have it. Clearly this is most fun     ┃
                ┃  after a few drinks, when the gentlemen are fully faced, though I suspect   ┃
                ┃  the Marines get into the spirit at little expense.                         ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃  (If you're wondering about the classification of this document, the        ┃
                ┃  Pentagon's discovery that an enemy could flatten an entire battalion of    ┃
                ┃  Marines with a bullhorn has given them pause. But, like Dr. Ellsberg of    ┃
                ┃  "The Pentagon Papers" fame, I just thought you should know. Unlike him,    ┃
                ┃  I've warned the enemy off, as you see.)                                    ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┃                        TOP SECRET - - - - TOP SECRET                        ┃
                ┃                                                                             ┃
                ┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛

Delta Sierra    Code for D/S (Dumb Sh*t), a Naval Aviator's favorite term of endearment.

Demerits        Naval Aviators are born, as it were   naval-aviation-wise   at "Pre-flite"
                training in NAS Pensacola. And just as with any newborn, what you drill into
                them at the start will be with them for a lifetime. Take the fear of Demerits.
                You mess up in Pre-flite, you get demerits. (For an example, see "Word.")  Now
                the penalties weren't that horrendous, objectively;  it was the fear that did
                the work. Just the thought of a dressing-down by SSgt Mikitis would make us
                rush to be the first to comply with whatever order...  Now, decades later, he
                is still there with his threat of demerits. I feel him rising up when my love
                asks me to mow the lawn: I mow the lawn. (No disrespect intended to Sgt
                Mikitis, who was a man's man and a great Marine. Gunnery Sergeant Mike Mikitis
                was killed in action in Viet Nam on the 27th of January, 1968.)

D.O.R.          "Drop at Own Request." D.O.R.'s happen at all points in the Navy's flight
                training program. The student pilot has just had enough, or can't get the hang
                of it, or realizes he's about to get washed out, or gets wet feet, or whatever.
                A D.O.R. gets reassigned to ground duties for the duration of his obligated
                service. He may as well get out then, for he probably won't have much of a Navy
                career.

Dream sheet     An exercise carried out for their own amusement by the Navy's Bureau of
                Personnel. Officers are periodically invited to indicate their preferences as
                to their next duty station or assignment. It's not known just what "BuPers"
                does with the dream sheets, but pieces of them have reportedly contributed to
                clogging in the Arlington, VA sewer system.

Dress           Favorite question of the Pre-flite tailor who measured us for our first
    "Right or   uniform. He maintained that he tailored the trousers differently depending on
     Left?"     which side the reproductive equipment favored: "Do you dress left or right?"
                Since none of us knew what he was talking about, he would simply check for
                himself. Bless him and his needs.

"The Duty"      1.  A term that sends shivers down the bravest fighter pilot's spine, since it
                defines a period of time that he won't be available for flying:  He's been
                scheduled an all-day watch as a Duty Officer, and has the sinking feeling that
                a day of his young life is about to be wasted (but then again, several thousand
                have already, so...).  There are several Duty Officer variants out there; for
                the fighter pilot it's mainly the Squadron Duty Officer (SDO) watch that
                terrifies.  See the link for typical illustration.
                2.  "The duty" is also shorthand for "the duty runway." As, for example in a
                flight briefing: "We'll taxi out in order, take the duty together, and launch
                as a section."

DWEST           "Deep Water Environment Survival Training."  The Navy doesn't content itself
                with the 'SERE' course, where you learn to be tortured. In 'DWEST' you get to
                discover how close you can get to drowning without actually losing your life.
                You're dropped into the ocean in full flight gear, as if you've parachuted
                down, and the game is to try to stay alive. For a realistic touch, the Navy
                prefers to test your mettle in waters where there actually are sharks. Now the
                fact is that a number of very fine naval aviators barely made it through the '
                Pre-flite' swim test, and haven't given any thought to swimming since then. So
                for some, the fear factor is real here; he feels he actually could lose his
                life. (You try swimming in steel-toed flight boots!) Fortunately, Navy trainers
                are near-by, though, for the fearful, never near enough. But seriously, the
                first experience of being dragged through the waves by a parachute on a windy
                day, releasing it, finding and boarding your inflatable raft, and establishing
                radio contact, is better done before the emergency actually happens than after.
                All praise to the superb Navy trainers.

Evolution       A word peculiar to the military, with no connection to Charles Darwin. An
                Evolution is an "evolving" exercise, really any exercise. A flight is an
                evolution. A parade is an evolution. A ball game. A hair cut. A trip to the
                head. Pretty much anything that has a beginning and an end is an evolution.

F.A.A.          The U.S. Federal Aviation Administration is the tyrant of flying rules in the
                U.S. Unfortunately this includes military A/C. The FAA has no sense of humor.
                Don't pimp 'em. (The FAA's reputed motto: "We're not happy till you're not
                happy."   suggested by Crusader pilot Jim Ryan)

Faced           More grammatically, 'faced, short for sh*t-faced, but there's nothing
                grammatical about the aviator when he's faced. This is the natural state of the
                young naval aviator (this comes out "nazhal abiator" when you're faced),
                supported by a steady supply of booze. He sometimes comes out of this state
                before or during a scheduled flight, but sometimes not. A real aviator's
                unfazed at being in his faced phase.

Falcon codes    The thing is, much of an aviator's usual language is considered unsuitable for
                over-the-air transmission, so the airborne aviator is limited to officiallly
                approved phrases and subjects. This is clearly unfair to aviators, who have a
                need to express their feelings. But aviators are never at a loss for a
                solution. The problem is solved by a handy code system   the "Falcon codes."
                This numerical code allows the aviator to express his deepest feelings without
                offending anyone. (If you know aviators, you know that when they express their
                deepest feelings they usually offend everyone.) Now the codes, which seem to
                have started in the 1960s, eventually grew to an unmanageable number (perhaps
                as a result of aviators getting caught up in the self-discovery of the '70s,
                with more complex emotional needs), where you needed a cheat sheet on your
                kneeboard to interpret the code. But still, there were a few well-known codes
                that were pretty much all the average aviator needed. For example: "101"
                (You've got to be sh*tting me!) or "103" (Beats the sh*t out of me.) From the
                flight leader you might hear a "114!" (Get your sh*t together,) or "223!" (Get
                your head out of your ass!) Or if you're being verbose on the air, "Hey, 144!"
                (Shut up and fly the f*ing airplane!) Some codes were groundbased, such as, if
                the chaplain should make the mistake of walking into the ready room
                unannounced, "1000." (Cool it, the padre's here.) Well, you get the idea. Most
                of the codes were less printable than what I've included, but if you want to
                know more, just google the subject.

Ferp (FRP)      Know how when you advance from one school to another you go from being BMOC
                (that's Big Man On Campus, to non-Americans) to a lowly freshman and have to do
                it all over again? It's the same in Naval Aviation. After more than 18 months
                of training the flight student has reached his zenith, and finally gets his
                coveted Wings of Gold. He has finished the advanced training phase, is a
                designated Naval Aviator, and has the world by the tail. At that point he's
                assigned to a "Fleet Replacement Squadron"   there's at least one such squadron
                for each specific type of aircraft the Navy and Marine Corps fly   to spend
                another half year or so learning to operate his aircraft type, before being
                assigned to an active squadron. At this point the proud new aviator is a
                beginner again, he knows nothing, he's just a Ferp - an FRP: Fleet (or F*ing)
                Replacement Pilot. (If there's a sudden need for a pilot in a deployed squadron
                he may even become a "must-pump," hurried through the program to fill a
                specific seat.) And as he becomes expert in his new airplane over the next half
                year, as he graduates and is sent to a squadron, he'll start all over again,
                knowing nothing, being just a bleepin' nugget, the FNG in the squadron.

Field Board     What did you do, what did you do, to rate a Field Board? Whatever you did, it
                was stupid and it was probably in an airplane. The squadron skipper doesn't
                care for his aviators doing stupid things in his airplanes. They're too
                expensive. Navy Regulations gives the commanding officer of an aviation unit
                authority to convene what DOD calls a "Field Naval Aviator Evaluation Board
                (FNAEB)" and everyone else calls a Field Board (or just a Board), to deal on
                the spot with airborne Delta Sierras. It may be a matter of breach of flying
                regulations, violation of orders, above-average stupidity, or just good
                old-fashioned incompetence. Whatever, if you did what you shouldn'a oughta have
                done, the Field Board may ground you indefinitely. If the decision is upheld in
                Washington, as it usually is, you may be done with flying forever. A Field
                Board is serious! (By the way, remember the idiotic movie, "Top Gun"? Five
                minutes into the flick all those guys would have been before a board, where
                there would have been no mercy. But I guess it was good fun for the "hoi
                polloi".)

"Fightertown"   Once upon a time, NAS Miramar, at San Diego, California. For decades, the home
                of the US Navy's Pacific Fleet fighter squadrons. In the fighter community
                there was no better address than Miramar. But then... there's this rapidly
                growing city right next door, whose planning commission through the 70's and
                80's was happily approving residential developments off each end of the duty
                runway. So, whether to reduce the flight volume and noise, or to line it up for
                an eventual city takeover, DOD was somehow persuaded to evict the Navy from NAS
                Miramar and turn it over to the Marines. In the late 1990s the Marines brought
                in their cargo planes and helicopters (!) and Fightertown USA became MCAS
                Miramar. RIP.

Final Charlie   Or "Last Charlie". When a pilot meets St. Peter. See Charlie. Crusader pilot
                extraordinaire "Red" Best penned the following verse in honor of aviators who
                have carried out their final order:

                                 LAST CHARLIE

                         As I complete life's final      When I hear the Big Airboss' calldown
                         mission                         And realize His call is for me,
                         And am told to RTB,*            I pray my last ball call is sharp and
                         I know I have friends in Delta  clear,
                         .                               And my grade is OK-3.
                         Old friends I'll be glad to
                         see.

                                 * "Return to base"

Fitness report  The career success of an officer depends on his annual fitness report, which
                expresses the C.O.'s opinion of the officer and how he ranks against other
                officers. For an ambitious climber, the only rational goal, ever in mind, is to
                please the C.O. To do this well it's necessary to analyze what the C.O. likes.
                The C.O. may like a good time: you'll be his drinkin' buddy. Or the C.O. may be
                a military stickler, big on etiquette: you're straight as an arrow, with a
                snappy salute. In all cases it's important not to do good work quietly and out
                of the limelight. If the Skipper doesn't see it, what good has it done? So
                bring your effort out, whatever it is, with fanfare and drama, with poster
                boards and announcements. For all you young officers out there, take this to
                heart if you want to move up! Naturally, the Navy brass consists of those who
                have shown the greatest facility in these skills. They wind up in Washington
                and feel right at home. See also "Brownnose."

FNG             For some reason, most Navy expressions seem to start with the letter "F". An
                FNG is simply a nugget, a rookie. A f*-in' new guy. What else?

Four-eyes       The Navy pilot's name for anyone with glasses.

"Full bird"     Strictly speaking, the O-6 officer rank, which wears the Eagle insignia. The
                Other Services, which have Colonels, use the term to distinguish "full"
                Colonels (COL) from pretenders like Lieutenant Colonels and Kentucky Colonels.
                In the Navy it really means a Captain, but as often it's used (with a smile)
                for "full" Lieutenants (O-3) to separate them from mere Lt(jg) (junior grade).
                "Full Bird" Lieutenant has an impressive ring. At least to the "J.G.'s"

Geedunk         'GHEE-dunk.' Any little shop, preferably with junk food. Every sizeable Navy
                ship has a geedunk, which provides much of a sailor's nutrition.

Gentleman       A fighter pilot. No, really - don't laugh, it's official and therefore true. On
                receiving his officer's commission, the young fighter pilot becomes an "Officer
                and gentleman" by Act of Congress. It says so right in his commission. It may
                be argued that the early Congress that wanted a gentrified officer corps hadn't
                reckoned with fighter pilots, but no matter. To some surprised recipients of
                this honor, the unexpected designation is naturally a source of intense pride.
                In others it engenders internal conflict, while it brings ironic merriment to
                many fighter pilots' friends.

Ghost fart      In the language of Basic Training (i.e. Pre-flite), the dust balls you chase on
                your hands and knees as you're 'palming' the floor in preparation for
                inspection.

GIB             Pronounced "gibb", with a hard G. "Guy In Back", the Navy pilot's term for what
                the Navy more formally calls "Radar Intercept Officer" (RIO) or "Naval Flight
                Officer" (NFO), etc.: the non-pilot in the back in a tandem A/C like the F-4
                Phantom or F-14 Tomcat. To the Navy pilot they're simply GIBs.

Gig line        If you're married to a military man you've probably wondered why he worries
                about lining up his shirt front hem with his fly and the right edge of his belt
                buckle. The answer is simple: Fear of demerits! He just can't let go of the
                subconscious fear instilled in him by drill sergeants during basic training/"
                Pre-flite" that if his 'gig line' is anything but perfectly lined up he'll face
                unknown but disastrous consequences. (Perhaps you remind him of his drill
                sergeant.)

"Gitmo"         The U.S. Naval base at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba (G't'mo). The U.S. has a lease for
                a million years or so, signed by the pre-Fidel Cuban dictator, Batista. The
                base has been a wart on Fidel's nose, and the U.S. has not been receptive to
                Castro's half-hearted pleas to give it up. Hey, it provides jobs and paychecks
                in US$ for a thousand or more locals (some of whom are naturally spies) in the
                town of Guantanamo. To the Navy pilot, Gitmo means a couple of weeks' training
                deployment away from the distractions of home life, where he can concentrate
                fully on such professional development matters as snorkeling in the salt water
                lagoon and getting faced on Rum Goodies every evening in the O-Club bar. Few
                aviators remember much of their stay at Gitmo.

                (Note: The above was written before the "War on Terror". Undeniably, the name
                Guantanamo now leaves a different impression on most people, with its
                ill-reputed terror-suspect prison facility. But yet this shall pass, and Gitmo
                shall rise again in its historical role as the greatest O-Club bar in the
                Caribbean.)

Gouge           A flexible word generally meaning useful specific instruction or information.
                For example, to hold your position in a parade formation, the gouge might be to
                line up the leader's wingtip with the anticollision light. There's also weather
                gouge, briefing gouge, good gouge and bad gouge. If you're wearing the wrong
                Uniform Of The Day, someone gave you bad gouge. "Gouge" may be the most spoken
                word in naval aviation, excluding of course obscenities.

Grabassin'      Messin' around, in an airplane or not. Always said with an apostrophe.

Grampaw         Grampaw       "Jumpin' Jehoshaphat!  Sufferin' catfish!  What was this young
     Pettibone  Pettibone     buck thinking? Wasn't thinking at all, I reckon. Now doesn't the
                              manual tell you that you can't..."
                The irascible old Grampaw Pettibone made his debut in a Navy safety-notes sheet
                in January 1943, drawn by then-Lieutenant Robert Osborne. For decades after,
                Grampaw's crusty reviews of actual D/S flight incidents and his salty but sage
                safety counsel graced the pages of Naval Aviation Week magazine. A few
                well-chosen words from Grampaw Pettibone were more effective safety training
                than hours of the usual "safety officer" lectures.

Greens          An alternative aviators' working uniform with dark green blouse and trou's. Not
                much worn, perhaps because it appears a bit pretentious. To me it always looked
                like a banana republic uniform, needing a heavy mustache, rows of big medals
                and a cigar to really carry off the effect. (See "Khakis.")

Groundpounder   Anyone who doesn't fly, but more specifically a Navy blackshoe officer.

(In) hack       You've PO'd the skipper, and now you're confined to quarters, or if in port, to
                the ship. You're in hack.

Hands           You don't have to be Italian to be a fighter pilot, but it can help in the
                debrief and any time you need to demonstrate your fighter-piloting skills
                without having your airplane handy. Because, to a fighter pilot, hands are
                aircraft, and his gesticulations attempt to reproduce the vast space in which
                the aerial ballet that is air combat takes place: "There we were, I'm rolling
                in from 5 o'clock high ..."  (My right hand, held rigidly flat, palm down, goes
                up to eye-level in front of the right shoulder, and turns hard left and nose
                down.)  "He spots me and breaks hard right ..."  (Left hand hip-high, a little
                out and forward turns hard into the attacking right hand. But I   the right
                hand   am ready, and reverse my turn across his six, going nose high again ...)
                  About here, the limitations of the hands begin to show; they're attached to
                shoulders and refuse to circle around each other as they should. Never mind, we
                reset in a new position and recommence. A fighter pilot really can't talk about
                flying without the use of his "handy" make-believe aircraft. (For the following
                llustrations, credit Lou Drendel, a great aviation artist, for the two
                left-most. He's at www.aviation-art.net . The right-hand picture is of an
                anonymous elderly convention speaker, recounting his glory days while just
                doing what comes naturally.)
                 

                [hands2x] [hands1x] [hands3x]

"Helen"         From Helen of Troy, "the face that launched a thousand ships," we have the
                mythical ultimate standard of feminine pulchritude, "the Helen." This, though,
                has little relevance to the naval aviator, except perhaps when he's faced, in
                which state any female's looks become a good deal improved. So see rather the
                aviator's more practical measure, the "milli-Helen" (illustrated for clarity).

"High Flight"   The world's greatest poem. (To a pilot.) An inspired, ethereal
                impression of flying by Pilot Officer John Gillespie Magee, Jr.,
                a tragic young American Spitfire pilot in the RCAF (Royal
                Canadian Air Force), 1941. (The poem was once dug out for
                political purposes by LBJ's speech writer, but seems to have      High Flight
                survived that.) Instead of describing it, I'll just show it.
                Click on the thumbnail to the right, then use the "Back" button
                to return.
                (Or spend some quality time at my poetry site -
                www.outstandingpoems.com - where you will have arrived.)

Hunky-dory      Pilots love this word for "thumbs up, everything's great," and why shouldn't
                they? It sounds best said with a southern drawl, though its origins lie farther
                west. Let me cite the authoritative web page "Origins of Navy Terminology":
                "The term ... was coined from a street named "Honki-Dori" in Yokohama, Japan.
                Since the inhabitants of this street catered to the pleasures of sailors, it is
                easy to understand why the street's name became synonymous for anything that is
                enjoyable ...."

India           The letter "I" in radio comm.

Irish pennant   Any loose thread on your uniform. These are incredibly stimulating to "
                Pre-flite" (basic training) drill sergeants, who go berserk when they see one.

"I say again"   This is for the benefit of the Navy wife: Your hubby is repeating his point,
                and here, for the thousandth time, comes this inane phrase. Look, don't hold
                him responsible for this silly phrase, it was drilled into him in the Navy. In
                the service, you can't get away from it. The military couldn't function without
                it. It's not meant to be offensive, it just sounds that way. It's meant to . .
                . well, the military has read somewhere that the key to learning is repetition,
                so they mechanically repeat everything of an instructional nature, one sentence
                at a time. And this silly phrase is what they use to announce that they're now
                going to repeat the sentence they just said. I won't try to convey the feeling
                of sitting in a class run on this principle, but I remember "Pre-flite"
                sergeants and instructors even repeating our topic phrase. My feeling was, if
                you get it the first time, you should be allowed to use the repeat time for
                other business, but my experience with sergeants was that they actually
                expected their "dumbsh*ts" to look like they were paying attention to the
                second hearing, too. My guess is, your hubby expects the same.

J.G.            Lieutenant (junior grade). A demeaning title, but a pretty cool time, 'cause
                you're young and attract chicks. You tell them you're a Lieutenant. It's true,
                sort of, and they don't know the difference. But you're still just a bleepin'
                j.g.

J.O.            Junior Officer, meaning officer grades O-1 through O-3, i.e., Ensign,
                Lieutenant (junior grade), and Lieutenant. Very cool. Often unmarried, walk
                with a swagger, and have the world by the tail. They die a lot. Their worst
                fear is being promoted to the uncool LCDR.

Jumentous       Not a widely used term, perhaps, but this word became indispensable locally
                after a J.O. discovered it in an ancient medical dictionary during a slow
                at-sea period. (What the J.O. was doing perusing an ancient medical dictionary
                is unclear, but he was an unconventional J.O.) This fine adjective was found to
                mean "having the odor of horse urine," and since fighter pilots constantly have
                a need to describe something as horsepiss, the term found frequent employment.
                One can only hope this fine addition to fighter pilot speech doesn't get lost.

Khakis          The normal working uniform for naval officers outside Washington, D.C.
                Everything but the black tie is khaki. Because you looked it up here you're now
                one of the few non-Indians who know that it comes from the Hindi (originally
                Persian) word "khak" meaning dust. Thus "dust-colored." (See "Greens.")

Lay of the      When the ship pulls into a new port, the sailors stream ashore, eager to get
land            the lay of the land. But of course she has a limited amount of time, so most of
                them have to make do with less. In any case, this segues naturally to Sick bay.

Leapex          A particularly stupid and useless short-term exercise that for some reason the
                brass has ordered to be done now, but can't reasonably be done now, and
                probably shouldn't be done at all. Named for the proverbial leap through an
                anatomical orifice "where the sun don't shine." An especially egregious form of
                boondoggle.

Lite Com.       Lieutenant Commander (LCDR). The forgotten rank. An unhappy time. A Limbo.
                You're in your 30's, too old to be cool, but you're not given much
                responsibility yet either. The (cool) JO's won't hang with you, but you're not
                invited to the Sr. Officers' functions. The less said the better.

Log             An aviator's log book comes close to being his dearest possession. It defines
                him and his flying career: The number of flight hours, hours in a/c type,
                carrier landings and on which ships, specifically which aircraft he flew on
                which date - from where to where, what type of mission, etc. He'd give up beer
                and pizza for life rather than lose his log book.

"Mary Ann       A classic song about gymnastics:
     Barnes"
                    Mary Ann Barnes was Queen of all the acrobats,
                    She could do some tricks that would give a guy the sh*ts,
                    She could shoot green peas from . . .

                Sorry, if I reveal more, they'll shoot me. Some secrets are sacred. (But man,
                could she do some tricks!) Suffice it to say that all Navy pilots know "Mary
                Ann Barnes".

"Milli-Helen"   The naval aviator's practical measure of feminine beauty. From Helen of Troy,
                "the face that launched a thousand ships," we have the classical standard of
                beauty, the "full Helen." But for practical purposes, aviators operate with the
                "milli-Helen," (one thousandth of a Helen) a face that could theoretically
                launch one ship. It's true that in the typical bar in a foreign port, many of
                the faces confronting the hapless aviator are more in the "micro-Helen" range
                (one thousandth of a milli-Helen, could conceivably launch a cross-spar or a
                mizzen mast), but yet, with a few whiskeys under his belt, these get upgraded
                as his vision blurs.
                 

                [helen] [milli-Hele] [micro-Hele]
                 Helen  milli-Helen  micro-Helen

Missing man     The aviation version of the ancient "missing man" military            embed
   (formation)  parade, where the absence of a fallen general would be                (
                suggested by a riderless horse. At modern memorial services           http:
                or funerals for (usually senior) air corps officers, a                /
                "missing man" formation of aircraft may do a fly-by.                  /
                Civilian government leaders have liked the looks of this so           w
                much that today you can't get a President in the ground               ww.youtube.com
                without involving a missing-man fly-over. This may involve a          /
                formation of four or more aircraft with one spot in the               v
                formation prominently empty, or more commonly in recent               /
                decades, a full formation where one aircraft pulls up                 l8_FqJcFRas?
                (Heaven-ward) out of the formation as it nears the gathered           f               
                throng. A good illustration is offered by (gulp) the Air              s
                Force Thunderbirds:                                                   =
                                                                                      1
                                                                                      &
                                                                                      hl
                                                                                      =
                                                                                      en_US
                                                                                      &
                                                                                      rel
                                                                                      =
                                                                                      0)

Must-pump       Every now and then, operational necessity requires that a replacement pilot be
                shipped to a deployed squadron post-haste. The typical solution is to designate
                a "Ferp" (FRP: Fleet Replacement Pilot) going through final in-type training as
                a "must-pump," in other words, pump this clown through the syllabus and get him
                out to the fleet as fast as possible. Makes for some hectic training days,
                perhaps skipping some extras, but nothing essential gets left out, so it's
                said.

Nads            Short for gonads. Balls.

N.A.S.          Naval Air Station, as in NAS Pensacola. A lesser Naval air installation may be
                a NAF (Naval Air Facility).

Naval Aviator   The proud wearer of the Wings of Gold. These Navy and Marine pilots have one
                thing uppermost in their minds (leaving out for now what's always uppermost in
                a young man's mind): to shoot someone out of the air. (Or in the case of the
                bomber pilots, to blow something up on the ground, which seems less satisfying
                to a fighter pilot because it doesn't quite seem like a fair fight. Perhaps it
                does to a bomber pilot.) To get to legally shoot someone down you pretty much
                have to have a war. Aviators naturally fall into an informal ranking system
                having nothing to do with their military rank: At the top are the macho men who
                have actually shot someone down. Next, those who have at least been in a
                shooting war. And finally the unwashed masses of aviators who've just flown
                around in peacetime. A shooting war makes heroes, so at least a little war is
                needed every decade or so to maintain a sufficient standing crop of heroes. See
                also notes at "Aviator and "Navy property"."

Navy Hymn       The Navy Hymn   "Eternal Father, Strong to Save"   has moistened many an eye,
                since it's invariably played at memorial services, something aviators are all
                too familiar with. But it's a lovely song, and even has a verse (the last)
                dedicated to airmen. Here's a pretty good version:

                     embed(http://www.youtube.com/v/JzaNWO6gufA&hl=en&fs=1&rel=0&border=1)


Navy property   The Naval Aviator gets constant gentle reminders that "his" aircraft is Navy
                property. The skipper may see him off with, "You break my airplane, boy, and
                your ass is grass!" The warning is meant to instill a sense of responsibility,
                and is remembered at least until you're manned up. But the interesting thing is
                that the pilot himself, being part of the weapons system, is also considered
                Navy property! So an aviator who partied too hard last night and is unable to
                fly can be had up for abuse of Navy property.

Nellie,         Ah, how Naval Aviators can surprise with their love of the arts. That lovely
darling         song, Nat King Cole's "Mona Lisa," is so beloved by aviators that it has been
                reborn in the naval musical literature in at least two apparitions: first with
                its original title with the sensitive words "Mona Lisa, Mona Lisa, men have
                laid you,..." and as the liberated "Nellie, darling." Modesty prevents actual
                citations from the latter (except perhaps the first tender line which goes "Oh,
                your ___'s like a ___, Nellie Darling") but it has to do with stovepipes, green
                grass, and bright red somethings. All in all, totally charming; assuming of
                course that your sensibilities are totally debased. But that's assumed.

Nickel          Fighter pilot songs are legendary and legion. Most are unprintable (I'm
(on the grass)  self-censoring here), but that's the way of this breed of men. This well-known
                parody of a revival song starts,

                    Hallelujah, hallelujah. Throw a nickel on the grass; save a fighter pilot's
                    ass.
                    Hallelujah, hallelujah. Throw a nickel on the grass and you'll be saved.

                The minimal spiritual message here still leads fighter pilots to reply, when
                being told of a fellow pilot's final Charlie, "Throw a nickel on the grass."

Night vision    At night, the ready room and the entire carrier is bathed in red light. It's
                well known that our eyes take a while to adjust from white light, so as to give
                acceptable night vision. What happens is that the rhodopsin molecules in the
                rod cells of the retina, which are needed for night vision, absorb energy from
                white light and take on a shape that make them unable to function in dim light.
                It may take as much as 30 minutes for the rhodopsin to return to their useful
                conformation, after being exposed to white light. But red light doesn't have
                this effect, so the aviator is good to go.

Niner           The way to pronounce the number "9" in radio communications.

Nugget          A rookie aviator, especially one on his first carrier cruise. Nuggets naturally
                get most of the dirt jobs in the squadron, like boat watches and integrity
                watches. A nugget usually flies as wingman with the Skipper or one of the
                squadron's senior aviators.

"Numbers"       1. Seniority is everything in the Navy officer corps. If a squadron mate has
                "The Numbers" on you, i.e., he has an earlier date-of-rank (don't fail to check
                this   the most important link in this document), he'll always be the flight
                leader, you'll always be the wingman. Tango Sierra. The Numbers rule. The
                senior officer's in charge.
                2. "The Numbers" is the approach end of a runway where two large numbers are
                painted on the r/w, giving the runway designation. (The designation is the
                approximate magnetic heading of the runway, in tens. A runway on a magnetic
                heading of 220° is runway 22. In the opposite direction the same runway will
                have a heading of 40° and bear the numbers 04.) For a Sierra Hotel VFR fan
                break, the flight lead will brief "Break at the numbers," which theoretically
                gives an impressive tight, circular pattern to touchdown.

O-Club          The on-base Officers' Club. A curious mixture of family dining and drunken
                revelry; though, true, these may go on in different rooms. Actually, the
                debauchery, the glass-breaking, the body-surfing "carrier landings" on tables,
                the fights, the "Dead Bug" contests (if Marines are in the house), the
                injuries, usually happen at an O-club away from one's home base. Basically
                where the squadron wives aren't, and undoubtedly because they aren't. We
                understand that a number of O-clubs are now also admitting petty officers,
                perhaps in an effort to moderate the gentlemen's behavior.

Penetration     1.   Every Navy man who goes ashore for liberty in a foreign port hopes to meet
                interesting locals. He carries in the back of his mind (at least while he's
                sober) the only phrase he's likely to know by heart from the Uniform Code of
                Military Justice (UCMJ), warning of dire consequences in the case of
                inappropriate contact with the locals: "Penetration, however slight, is
                sufficient to complete the offense."
                2.   For a less romantic meaning: When flying, going through a cloud layer to
                get above or below it is a penetration.

Pensacola,      The Valhalla of Naval Aviation and center of Naval Air training, including the
Fla.            charming Pre-flite program. It's where Navy pilots have their birth,
                naval-aviation-wise, and many go back there to await their Final Charlie, or
                perhaps to see if that sweetheart from 30 years ago is still there, waiting.
                Almost every Navy flight student leaves a sweetheart behind in Pensacola. NAS
                Pensacola is also the home of the very fine Museum of Naval Aviation (web site
                link).

Photobeanie     Just an affectionate term for flyers of the photo-birds, reconnaissance
                aircraft that carry cameras rather than weapons. Don't think they're not it the
                heat of battle! Their job is to go in after a strike, when every anti-aircraft
                gunner is awake, alert and mad as hell, and photograph the damage. Fighter
                jocks appreciate them at least a little bit, for without them the brass would
                probably make even worse targeting decisions.

Pilot           To you who read this some years from now, when I am but ashes . . :    You know
                that Air Combat Center on the 5th floor of the Federal Building on Main Street
                in Peoria? The one with the eight hundred 13-year old pilots who operate the
                air combat game controllers? Well, of course that's how air combat should be
                and is fought now-a-days, but back in the day . . . fighter aircraft weren't
                flashlight-sized, nuclear-powered, submarine-launched, laser-armed,
                remote-controlled weapons like today. No, the aircraft were 50-60 feet long
                (!), weighed tens of tons (!!), and floated around on the ocean on
                thousand-foot long ship-like platforms called aircraft carriers, from which
                they launched but could only stay up an hour or two before needing refueling.
                And, unbelievably, in a clear plastic bubble on the front end of these giant
                aircraft sat the ancient version of a "fighter pilot." He was actually up there
                with the aircraft, subject to all the hazards of personal combat! You can read
                about them in military history books, and some aviation museums still have a
                couple of these behemoth aircraft in a back room, though most of the display
                space is naturally taken up with improvements in game controllers, as it should
                be.

Pimp            No, this has nothing to do with whores. To pimp someone means to tease, to
                intentionally irritate. Of course those most often pimped are those who are the
                most pimpable. You usually pimp downward in the presumed pecking order, though
                lateral pimping is common among JOs. Not surprisingly, not everyone responds
                placidly to being pimped, while others are known for their impimpability. (Take
                that, Webster!)

Pisscutter      The naval aviator's everyday khaki uniform hat, known in  Dave
                official parlance as a "fore-and-aft cap". No one who     (Fireball)
                wears it calls it anything but a pisscutter. (Here's      Johnson with
                fighter pilot extraordinaire Dave "Fireball" Johnson      pisscutter
                sporting his.)

Pogey-bait      Candy, often secreted in flight suit pockets, to be rediscovered after months
                of heat and sweat have turned it into some kind of disgusting fossil.

P.O.W.          Younger readers may not be familiar with this term, but it has been, too many
                times in the past, one of the most common terms in our language. A "Prisoner Of
                War"   a P.O.W.   is supposed to have rights under international ('Geneva')
                conventions, but those rights have been more often "honored in their breach."

Pre-flite       "Pre-flite" is the 4 months or so of academic, physical, and military training
                preceding "real" flight training. In "academics" you're taught aeronautics,
                meteorology, avionics, and naval history and tradition, such as the importance
                of leaving a calling card on the silver plate by the door when you're invited
                to the skipper's house for the compulsory social introduction. The "physical"
                syllabus will get you in shape or get you washed out (the requirement to swim
                is particularly traumatic to many). In the "military" program you're abused for
                some reason by US Marine drill sergeants who amuse themselves by making you
                fold your handkerchiefs in exactly 3¼" x 4½" piles for inspection, and making
                you believe this is important. This will make you a better officer. (The
                purpose is of course to find officers who will obey unquestioningly. We swallow
                hard, keep our goals in mind, and do as we're told. Some of us even begin to
                believe the handkerchief piles are important.)

"Q"             The B.O.Q. (Bachelor Officer's Quarter).

Rocket          The seniority number of each pilot in the squadron. The Skipper is Rocket 1,
    number      which means he has his name painted on the cockpit rail of the "01" bird. If
                there are 15 A/C in the squadron, Rocket 15 is S.O.L., because CAG gets
                Doublenuts. If you don't see the importance of all this, see "The Numbers" or "
                Seniority".

R.O.N.          "Remain Over-Night." Military orders to spend the night at some particular
                place before moving on. Naval aviators have an undeserved reputation   probably
                self-generated   for being party animals on R.O.N.'s. The truth is usually
                something like this: You arrive, see about tieing down, fueling and servicing
                your aircraft, drag yourself to the B.O.Q., get out of your stinking flight
                suit, catch a shower, walk to the O-club and nurse a drink or two and eat
                dinner, maybe a few words with the locals, before hitting the sack. Pretty
                exciting. Of course, wyf back home is convinced that hubby's out tripping the
                light fantastic.

R&R             Rest & Recreation. Of course, this term has found its way into the civilian
                vocabulary, but it's of military origin. When a young fighter pilot comes to
                town on R&R, lock up your women. Or offer him a drink.

RTB             "Return to Base," usually used in military TAD orders. After a period of
                performing Temporary Additional Duty somewhere, the orders call on you to RTB.

Rug rank        In the Pentagon, you've got "rug rank" if you're important enough to rate a
                carpet. (Installing your own carpet is a no-no.) In the fleet, an admiral is a
                pretty big deal, but when he gets to Washington he starts all over, like a
                college freshman. He has "flag" rank, but may never reach "rug" rank.

Rules of        Fighter pilots don't like rules.  It's all they can do to remember a few of
flying          these:

                     1. Flying isn't dangerous. Crashing is dangerous.
                     2. Takeoff is optional. Landing is mandatory.
                     3. If you push the stick forward, the houses get bigger. If you pull the
                        stick back, they get smaller. If you keep pulling the stick back, they
                        get bigger again.
                     4. It's better to be down here wishing you were up there than up there
                        wishing you were down here.
                     5. The only time you have too much fuel is when you're on fire.
                     6. The motor runs the air conditioning. If it stops, expect to start
                        sweating.
                     7. When in doubt, hold your altitude. No one has yet collided with the
                        sky.
                     8. A good landing is one you can walk away from. A great landing is one
                        where the aircraft is still useable.
                     9. If it takes full power to taxi in you've landed gear up.
                    10. The probability of survival is inversely proportional to the angle of
                        arrival. Small angle of arrival, large probability of survival, and
                        vice versa.
                    11. Try to make your number of landings equal your number of takeoffs.
                    12. You start with a full bag of luck and an empty bag of experience. The
                        trick is to fill the bag of experience before you empty the bag of
                        luck.
                    13. In skirmishes between objects made of titanium going hundreds of miles
                        per hour and the ground going zero miles per hour, the ground has yet
                        to lose.
                    14. Good judgment comes from experience. Experience comes from bad
                        judgment.
                    15. Keep the pointy end going forward.
                    16. Gravity is not just a good idea. It's the law.
                    17. The three most useless things to a pilot are the altitude above you,
                        the runway behind you, and a tenth of a second ago.

Rum Goody       The specialty of the house at the O-Club bar at Gitmo. This drink bids fair to
                have put more aviators under the table than any other in Naval Aviation
                history, and that's saying a lot. The recipe is top secret. It is: Anejo Rum,
                fresh lime juice, and simple syrup. Ah, but the all-important proportions? I'm
                not telling, but only because I don't know.

Satrapa         Still flying firefighting tankers in California at the age of 60-some, Joe
                "Hoser" Satrapa deserves an entry. Why? This legendary wild man of the air was
                simply the quintessential classic fighter pilot of the 1960-70's, both in the
                Crusader and the Tomcat. While most of us grudgingly managed to accommodate to
                the Navy's notion that the aviator is first a well-bred Officer, and only
                secondarily a fighter pilot (flying is actually listed as "collateral duty" for
                aviators), Satrapa never bought into that. He was a fighter, and he was hired
                to fight. And he showed, time and again, that a real fighter could do things
                with an airplane that the genteel officer who had learned to fly as a
                "collateral duty" just couldn't. A skipper couldn't ask for more in a war than
                a squadron of Satrapas. The paperwork might suffer, but so would the enemy. My
                own view is that the latter is more important!

                (There are hundreds of Satrapa stories extant [Google "Satrapa" for some flying
                stories] but I'll just add a couple of everyday squadron moments. After I'd
                beaten everyone else in the squadron in arm wrestling, someone suggested
                Satrapa. Well, OK, bring him on, he doesn't look all that strong. Long and
                lanky, laconic. No threat. He sat down, his Peter Lorre eyes betraying nothing.
                Someone said "Go", and Mount Etna erupted. My arm was on the table in less than
                a second. It was a matter of focus of total force, as if every other function
                of Joe's body paused and he threw it all into his arm. Same thing in the air.
                In training dogfights he would win or die. Another day, when I had the duty,
                and was sitting prim and proper at the desk (illustration below) at the front
                of the ready room, a sudden soft "whoosh" got my attention. It turned out to be
                sharpened pencil, now stuck in the corkboard a few inches from my face. Joe's
                grin, about fifteen feet back in the ready room, told the story. A master at
                knife-throwing, as much as with guns, airplanes, and whatever other instrument
                of destruction was at hand, Hoser amused himself with his lessers. While I
                might have had some doubt about his ability to miss my face with his missile,
                he didn't. I'm glad he was right.)

Scope           A 'scope' may be a RIO (see GIB) or a BN (bombardier navigator) or an ECMO
                (electronic countermeasures operator). A 'good scope' is a term of respect paid
                by other squadron mates, including their 'sticks'.

Scuttlebutt     A genuine Navy word for the usual way you get information (the straight skinny)
                in the Navy. As to origin, I can't do better than to quote from the site "
                Origins of Navy Terminology": "Butt   a cask or hogshead used in the days of
                wooden ships to hold drinking water. The cask from which the ship's crew took
                their drinking water   like a water fountain   was the "scuttlebutt". Even in
                today's Navy a drinking fountain is referred to as such. But, since the crew
                used to congregate around the "scuttlebutt", that is where the rumors about the
                ship or voyage would begin. Thus, then and now, rumors are ... scuttlebutt."
                (We await the straight skinny on how the word "scuttle"   which means to
                intentionally sink one's own ship   got involved here.)

S.D.O., or      "Squadron Duty Officer." It's a J.O.'s lot to regularly miss a day of
"The Duty"      flying by being assigned as the day's SDO. Not a J.O.'s favorite
                occupation. In case of war the SDO will notify the squadron C.O. That's   HP
                what it says in the watch brief. Spends the entire day manning the desk   has
                in the Ready Room. Answers inane telephone calls; attempts to keep      * The
                order among fellow officers; prevents snoring in the Ready Room.          Duty

                When you have The Duty you're expected to be serious for several hours
                at a stretch, which can be a significant challenge for a J.O.

Secure          In the Navy you don't "close" a thing, or "turn it off," or "finish" it. You
                secure it. It doesn't necessarily mean you tie anything down or lock a door,
                though it could mean that. Some examples may help: "You're secured." (You can
                go home now.) "This fire drill is secured." (The drill is over.) "Secure the
                lights." (Turn them out.) "Flight ops are secured." (That's the last flight of
                the day.) In short, if you're ending something, you're securing it. An
                evolution can be secured; even liberty can be secured. When ashore, an early
                "Let's secure" from the Skipper is welcome.

Seniority       Now here we have the key to the military services.  Whereas many civilian firms
                and organizations operate under the delusion that such qualities as skill,
                knowledge, or effectiveness count in choosing their leadership, the military
                services know better:  The key to leadership is time-on-the-job!  The great
                advantage of this system is that wisdom is so easily determined:  It is that
                which issues from the person with most time on the job.  To determine the
                wisest course of action in any situation, we look to the person with most
                seniority.  Pronouncements from the most senior person present represent
                truth.  In this way we avoid such disturbing moments as disagreement and
                debate.  It's remarkable that more civilian operations haven't discovered the
                beauty of this incontrovertible-truth method, though it's reported that some
                have.  For a Navy application, see Date of rank and "The Numbers".

Sick bay        Whether ashore or at sea, the Navy medical clinic is known as "sick bay." When
                on liberty in overseas ports, the sailors often bring back souvenirs from their
                new-found friends ashore. The doctors and corpsmen in sick bay treat the
                souvenirs with Penicillin.

SERE            "Survival, Evasion, Resistance & Escape" training. They tell me that the guys
                who run this military 'training' course are actually not sadists, but you
                couldn't prove it by me. Of course, they're hired to act like sadists, and I
                always thought they looked a little too much like they were enjoying it. It's
                supposed to prepare you psychologically to be stuck behind enemy lines, and
                maybe teach you a thing or two. It'll certainly teach you something about
                yourself. I went to SERE training in Warner Springs, CA. It worked about like
                this: We were dropped, about a dozen aviators, out in the woods up in the
                hills. We had some minimal survival gear with us: A map and compass, a knife,
                some string, a cup, a poncho. "See ya in three days." So you eat what you can
                find or kill (no fair killing your buddies), and you try to find shelter from
                the cold and rain (the 'survival' part), until one morning you hear the 'bad
                guys' beating the bushes farther down the hill. Now comes the 'evasion' part.
                Plan on getting bloody as you spend the day running frantically through brush,
                tripping on roots, rolling down embankments, getting torn up by thorns. There
                are a lot more of 'them' than there are of you, 'cause you're all alone. In any
                case, there are 'out of bounds' rules, and you will get caught by some highly
                unpleasant goons before the day is out. You get tossed in the back of a truck
                with a couple of armed guards, and you're taken to the prison compound. Here
                you'll be trained in 'resistance.' They want to find out how much pain you can
                take. They question you, and you give them 'name, rank, service number, date of
                birth,' just like the Code of Conduct says. (That information is so that they
                can identify you correctly after you've died of the torture.) But if you think
                this is all play, you've got another think coming. They're not happy with just
                your name, rank, etc.  So they try to encourage you to talk. The worst for me
                was the 'box.' You're jammed for some hours into a small wooden box with your
                legs curled beneath you and your neck bent down by the tight lid. The idea is
                that your legs will lose circulation and become extremely painful and then
                unusable. They're right. Actually, every part becomes extremely painful.
                (Marine pilot Frank Garrick contributes this story: "Jimmy 'Hutch' Hutchinson
                (Marine 1st Louey) was put in the box as per usual. After about   hour, the
                guard put a snake in with him. Jimmy ate the snake. One pissed off guard.")
                Other guys experienced 'waterboarding,' which was no more fun. Some guys just
                broke down. The 'escape' part is mostly theoretical. You're supposed to try to
                get away from the P.O.W. compound, but nine times out of ten you'll get caught
                and get treated to another round of torture. So most of us learned the 'escape'
                part by watching others try, fail, and get re-tortured. That was lesson enough.
                See also 'DWEST' for the Navy's charming water survival add-on.

Sierra Hotel    S/H: "Sh*t-hot", a Navy pilot's favorite expression of admiration. When
                constructed as plural: "Sh*t-hots", it means a customized, tailored, dolled-up,
                patch-bedecked "babe-magnet" flight suit reserved for special social occasions
                in the bar.

SitRep          Standard military jargon for "situation report." You wanna know what's going on
                ... you ask for a SitRep.

Skinny          Information;  The Word;  the truth: the straight skinny.

Skipper         The Commanding Officer, originally of a ship, but now of any Naval unit,
                especially a squadron.

Skivvies        The only authorized word for underwear. Any color but white is suspect.

Snake ranch     This is actually confidential, but I think the cat's out of the bag already, so
                . . .
                When a squadron is ashore between combat deployments, and the bachelor
                gentlemen officers find they have no one to legally shoot at, they naturally
                get bored. In an effort at overcoming this ennui, the gentlemen rent a
                good-sized house from which they can terrorize the neighborhood of solid
                burghers until they are sent back to whatever war we're in. This "snake ranch"
                can be anywhere convenient, though a beach neighborhood is popular. The dream
                is that at the ranch young women will somehow be available to satisfy the
                gentlemen's fancies, and the party's always on. The reality is usually that
                most evenings are spent emptying kegs of beer, both into the gentlemen and out.
                But it's a lot of fun, anyway.

Soft Salute     Use of this salute, more theoretical than real, is limited to late-night revels
                in anonymous bars overseas with anonymous women. At its least artistic, it
                consists merely of extending the two hands directly forward at chest height and
                squeezing whatever feminine body parts happen to get in the way.

S.O.L           The usual abbreviation for being just Sh*t Out of Luck. No self-respecting Navy
                man would ever say just "Out of Luck."

Soul            Charon ferrying souls to HadesWe're not talking about the aviator's spiritual
                dimension, though that is not to be sneered at (see next entry). No, a "soul"
                in the Navy is a very material human body, usually a passenger on a ferry
                flight. The pilot reports his cargo as "eight souls onboard." That's perfectly
                historical ferryman's language, of course: The ancient Greeks knew the
                "ferryman" as Charon ("Kharon"), who ferried the dead across the river Styx
                into the land of Hades. (Clickable classical illustration appended.) The
                "souls" onboard a Navy a/c, such as the COD, are undoubtedly hoping to avoid a
                trip to Hades right at that moment.

Spiritual life  The Fighter Pilot has a reputation   perhaps deserved, perhaps not   of being
                more spirited than spiritual, yet he has always drawn deep spiritual               * [Mutha]
                inspiration from the great religious texts, such as the twenty-third psalm:

Stick (2)       "A Stick" or a "good stick" (short for Stick-and-Rudder Man) is a pilot with a
                reputation for handling the aircraft well. This is one reputation you can't
                buy, though only a small number of peers may be aware of it. It doesn't count
                for much with the Navy brass, who are usually more concerned with whether the
                pilot has done his paperwork. There's also another kind of stick.

Surly bonds     I don't know why you're looking this up, and who knows what it means. Maybe it
                was Barry Bonds after the Giants dumped him. More likely, it's this line ("I
                have slipped the surly bonds of earth") in the only poem a real fighter pilot
                is likely to know much of, though he'll probably only know these few words. But
                look here for the poem: "High Flight" by Pilot Officer John Gillespie Magee,
                Jr., a tragically short-lived American Spitfire pilot in the RCAF, 1941.

TAD             Temporary Additional Duty. Short-term orders, usually away from home base,
                concluding with "RTB" (Return to base) at the conclusion.

Tailhook        The Naval Aviators' professional association. A private, voluntary association,
  Association   not officially connected with the US Navy. A long and great tradition of
                charity and assistance for Navy families and others, punctuated by occasional
                overblown scandals. (The most recent overblown scandal, over which several
                admirals lost their jobs a couple of decades ago, involved some inebriated                              [Tailhook]
                young men saying impolite things to some young women at the Tailhook
                Convention. Some of the women were alledgedly fondled. In the same year, about
                20,000 Americans were murdered on our streets, but the impolite young men got
                about a hundred times as much press. Get perspective, America.)
                The Tailhook Association is on the Web at http://www.tailhook.org.

Two-blocked     In ship's rigging or crane operations, two blocks that are jammed together,
                preventing movement. At Navy uniform inspections: "Two-block your tie" is
                supposed to get you to pull up your tie knot.

Trou's          You don't hear "trousers" in the Navy after basic training or Pre-flite. It's
                too long a word for fighter pilots. Just "trou's."

24-hour clock   The military services use the 24-hour clock for all purposes, with time
   ("military   expressed in 4 digits. I.e., 8 a.m. is 0800, 1:30 p.m. is 1330, and 11 p.m. is
      time")    2300. (For some reason the US military pronounces the hours as "hundreds,"
                e.g., "Sixteen hundred" for 4 p.m., though hundreds have nothing to do with the
                sixty-minute hour. It should be "sixteen sixty." I know, that'll be a lonely
                campaign.) At shore installations the local time zone is usually observed, but
                for non-local communications and orders "Greenwich Mean Time" or Zulu" time is
                used. (See "Bells" for a quaint ship-board time keeping custom.)

UCMJ            The Uniform Code of Military Justice. Adopted as law by the U.S. Congress, the
                UCMJ is the fundamental law regulating rights, obligations and relations in the
                U.S. military services. At least a few of its provisions are occasionally on
                the mind of the Navy man, such as the critical rule on "penetration."

Uni             The Uniform. A uniform. Any uniform. Again, fighter pilots don't like
                three-syllable words.

Uniform of      So here you've got a rule, made up by some admiral's wife, telling fighter
     the Day    pilots which shirt and pants to wear today. Good luck. Satrapa always wore
                whatever he damn well pleased.

WAG             "Wild-ass guess." A fighter pilot's life often depends on a good guess, like
                "Which way's the ship?" An old fighter pilot has survived a lot of WAGs.

Wash out        To fail the training program and be reassigned other duties. The naval flight
                training program has a high wash-out rate. The shock of Pre-Flite gets rid of
                many. In basic flight training, instrument and formation flying are popular
                wash-out points, and in the advanced training syllabus carrier landing is the
                biggie. Plus of course the fatal wash-outs, but that's a different kind of
                reassignment.

Wetting down    An expensive tradition, where an officer who gets a promotion blows about a
                year's worth of raise on an elaborate "Wetting Down" party for squadron mates.
                Perhaps with the idea that he may not live out the year. May as well spend it
                now.

Whites          "Dress Whites." The uniform worn for special occasions during the summer
                season. (See "Blues.")

Wings           Getting his wings is one of any Naval Aviator's two most important
of Gold         achievements. (The other can be what you will.) The "Wings of Gold" are the             * [navwings]
                trophy after the world's most demanding aviation training; they're worn by the
                world's best-trained pilots.

Word            The big "W", the most common demerit in "Pre-flite" training. "Word, failure to
 (failure to    get" is the official term for the offense. It's the poor trainee's
get)            responsibility to 'get the word,' the straight skinny, and to be where he's
                supposed to be and do what he's supposed to do at each moment. Failure to get
                the word is NO excuse. Well, may as well learn it right away   it may save your
                life later, and prepare you for marriage.

Wyf             Pronounced "wiff." Beloved life partner. Raises offspring during long cruises.

X.O.            Executive Officer. Second in command to the C.O. Winds up responsible for
                discipline and administration. Not a tasty job, but you've got to do it if you
                want to become C.O.

Zoom bag        In some quarters, a term for a flight suit.

                              ┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
                              ┃Go to Top of Page┃
                              ┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛
                                      [1]
━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━

                                Index of Terms

              A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z

 
            AAA ("Triple A")      ACLS                  Afterburner           Alpha                 Angle of attack       Attaboy
            A/B                   ACM                   Aileron               Alphabet (radio com.) AOM                   Attitude
            Abaft                 ACRAC                 AIO                   Alpha strike          AOOGA                 Auger in
            Abeam                 ACRAC Annie           Air Boss              Altitude              APM                   Autothrottle (APC)
            A/C                   Acute                 Airedale              Anchors Aweigh        Arrested Landing      Aviate
            Ace                   ADF                   Airway                Angel                 Arresting Gear        Aviator
            Acey-deucey           Admin                 Air wing              Angels                Astern
            Ack-ack               Aft                   All hands             Angled deck           Athwart
 
            Bag                   Barf-bag              Bells                 Blues                 BOQ                   Buffet
            Balanced              Barricade             Below                 Boards                Brass                 Bugout
            Balbo                 Basic engine          Bingo                 Boat                  Bravo                 Bulkhead
            Ball                  Basket                Bird                  Boat officer          Break                 Burble
            Ball call             Basket leave          Black-ass             Boat school           Brief                 Burner
            Bandit                Beach                 Black-out             Bogey                 Brownnose             Buster
            Banner                Bearing               Blackshoe             Bolter                Brownshoe             Button
            Barberpole            Beaver                Blouse                Boondoggle            Buddy store           Buy the farm
            BarCAP                Belay                 Blower
 
            CAG                   Catapult (Cat)        Chocks                COD                   Con                   Cross-over
            Cage (your eyeballs)  Cat Officer           Chopper               Cockpit               Contrail              CRT
            Callsign              CAVU                  Church                Cold (& Hot)          Copecetic             Cruise
            Canter                Centurion             Clara                 Cold cat              Course                Crusader
            CAP                   Chaff                 Clean                 Collateral duty       Cover                 Cumshaw
            CarQuals              Charlie               Clear deck            Combat spread         Crab                  Cut
            Carrier               Chevron               Clearing Turn         Compass               Cross-country         Cyclic Ops
            "Carrier landing"     Chief                 C.O.                  Compass rose
 
            Date of Rank          Debrief               Demerits              Ditch                 Doublenuts            Dream sheet
            Davy Jones' locker    Deck                  Depart                Division              Doughnut              Dress
            Dead bug              Deep six              Diamond               Dog                   Down                  Drink
            Dead reckoning (DR)   Delta                 Dip                   Dogfight              Downtown              The Duty
            Deadstick             Delta Sierra          Dirty                 D.O.R.                Downwind              DWEST
 
            Echelon               Elevator              Evolution
            Echo                  Engagement            Expansion joint
            Eject                 Envelope
 
            F-8 Crusader          Feet wet              Finger Four           Flight deck           FNG                   Fox
            FAA                   Ferp (FRP)            Fire                  Flight Lead           FOD                   Fox Corpen
            Faced                 Field Board           Fitness report        Flight Level          Fore                  Foxtrot
            Falcon codes          Fighter               Flame-out             Flight suit           Formation             Fresnel
            Fan break             Fightertown           Flathatting           Fly-by-wire           Fouled deck           Full bird
            Fantail               Final Charlie         Flat-top              Flying tail           Four-eyes             Furball
            Feet dry              Final checker         (A) Flight
 
            G (force)             Geedunk               "Gitmo"               Grabassin'            Groundpounder         Gunnery
            Gaggle                General Quarters      Glide slope           Grampaw Pettibone     Growl                 Gunsight
            Galley                Gentleman             Go                    Greens                Grumman Iron Works    G.Y.H.O.Y.A.
            Gate                  Ghost fart            Golf                  Grey-out              G-suit
            Gator                 GIB                   Gouge                 Gripe                 Guard
            Gear                  Gig line              G.Q.                  Groove                Gunfighter
 
            (in) Hack             Hatch                 "High Flight"         Hook-to-ramp          HUD
            Hand signals          Head                  Holdback              Hosed                 Hunky-dory
            Hands                 Heading               Holding pattern       Hot (& Cold)          Hurrevac
            Hangar                Head signals          Hood                  Hot CAP               Hypoxia
            Hangar Deck           "Helen"               Hook                  Hotel
            Hassle                Helo                  Hook-skip             Huffer
 
            IFF                   Indexer lights        Irish pennant
            IFR                   Inflight engagement   "I say again"
            Inboard               Instrument parade     Island
            India                 Integrity watch
 
            JBD                   J.O.                  Juliet
            J.G.                  Join-up               Jumentous
            Jink                  Judy
 
            Khakis                Kneeboard
            Kilo                  Kneeknocker
            Kiss off              Knot
 
            Ladder                Lay of the land       Lift                  Loose deuce
            Landing gear          Leapex                Lima                  LOX
            Landing pattern       Leeward               Lineup                LSO
            Last Charlie          Liberty               Lite Com.             Lufbery
            Launch                Liberty boat          Log
 
            Macadam               Maximum thrust        Midrats               Military thrust       Model                 MRT
            Mach                  Mayday                MiG-Master            "Military time"       Morse code            Must-pump
            MAD                   Meatball              Mike                  Mirror                Moon
            Marshal               Mess                  Mike-click            Missing man           Mother
            Mary Ann Barnes       Midair                "Milli-Helen"         MLP                   Mount
 
            Nads                  Navy property         Night vision          Notam
            NAS                   Negative G            Niner                 November
            NATOPS                Nellie, darling       Ninety                Now hear this!
            Nautical mile         Nickel on the grass   No joy                Nugget
            Naval Aviator         Night trap            NORDO/NORAD           Numbers
            Navy Hymn
 
            o'clock               Ops                   Over
            O-Club                Oscar                 Overhead
            OK                    Out                   One-eighty
            OLS                   Outboard              Oxygen mask
 
            Paddles               Pensacola             Pinky                 Plane guard           P.O.W.                Pucker
            Papa                  Perch                 PIO                   PLAT                  Power curve           Puddle-jumper
            Parade                Photobeanie           Pipper                Playmate              Prang                 Pull chocks
            Pass                  Pigeons               Pisscutter            Plug                  Preflight             Pull G's
            Passageway            Pickle                Pitching Deck         Pogey-bait            "Pre-Flite"           Punch
            Pattern               Pilot                 Pitch-up break        Poopy Suit            Pri-fly
            Penetration           Pimp                  Plane captain         Port                  Probe
 
            "Q"                   Quebec
 
            Radial                RAT                   Red Ball              REST                  Romeo Corpen          RTB
            Radome                Ready CAP             Re-heat               Restricted area       R.O.N.                Rudder
            Rail                  Ready Room            Relative wind         Rocket Number         Rotation              Rug rank
            Ramp                  Recognition           Rendezvous            Roger                 Rounddown             Rules of flying
            Ramp Strike           Recovery              ResCAP                Romeo                 R&R                   Rum Goody
 
            Saddle (in the...)    Scuttlebutt           Sidewinder            Socked in             Speed brake           State
            Sader                 SDO                   Sierra                Soft Salute           Spit a wire           Stateroom
            SAM                   Section               Sierra Hotel          S.O.L.                Spotting the deck     Steam
            Sand Crabs            Secure                SitRep                S.O.P.                Squadron              Stick (Control)
            SAR                   Seniority             Six                   Sortie                Squawk                Stick (Pilot)
            Satrapa               SERE                  Skinny                Soup                  Stabilization         Strike
            Saunter               Shell (out)           Skipper               Soul                  Stall                 Sucked
            Scissors              Shooter               Skivvies              Space                 Starboard             Surly bonds
            Scope                 Sick bay              Snake ranch           Spaghetti             Stash
 
            TACAN                 Tango                 Three-point landing   Topside               Trim
            Tactics               Tanker                Thrust                Tractor               Trou's
            TAD                   TarCAP                Tilly                 Transponder           Tuck-under break
            Tailhook              Tarmac                Two-blocked           Trap                  Tunnel vision
            Tailhook Association  Telephone pole        Top Gun               Trigger               24-hour clock
            Tally-ho
 
            UAV                   Uni                   Unrep
            UCMJ                  Uniform               Up
            Undercast             Uniform of the day    Upwind
 
            Vertigo               Victor
            VFR                   Vulcan cannon
 
            "WAG"                 Wave                  Wilco                 Wing-fold             Wire
            Walkdown              Wave-off              Wind                  Wingie                Word
            Wardroom              Wetting down          Winder                Wing loading          WOXOF
            Watch                 Whiskey               "Window"              Wingman               Wyf
            Wash out              Whites                Windward              Wings of Gold
 
            X.O.                  Yankee                Zero/zero
            X-ray                 Yellow Shirt          Zero G
                                  "Your signal"         Zoom bag
                                                        Zulu

              All text on this site   2000-2012 by H.Paul Lillebo

                              ┏━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┓
                              ┃Go to Top of Page┃
                              ┗━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━━┛
[1]
